(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ python main.py
“With reporting by Brody Brown...”
““I look at the way she she loves Stormi and takes care of her.”
““It’s like nursery school — there are so many babies!” Kris Jenner, 62, tells Us Weekly exclusively in the new issue.”
“The momager was of course referring to her nine grandchildren.”
“The Kardashian-Jenner crew grew quite a bit in last few months.”
“Kim Kardashian welcomed her third child — a daughter named Chicago — on January 15.”
“Then Kylie Jenner and Khloe Kardashian became first-time moms (They have daughters Stormi, 5 months, and True, 3 months, respectively.)”
“Kris marvels at how Kylie has adjusted to parenthood.”
““Kylie is more calm than I was,” she tells Us.”
“She doesn’t go anywhere without her.” The businesswoman is equally in awe of Khloe — through she never doubted the Good American denim cofounder’s mothering skills.”


"Brody Brown's report..."
"I look at her, and I look after her."
"It's like kindergarten - too many children! "Chris Jenner, 62, told us exclusively in the new issue of the magazine."
"Mom means her nine grandchildren, of course."
"Kardashian Jenner's team has grown a lot in the past few months."
"On January 15, Kim Kardashian welcomed her third child, a daughter named Chicago."
Later, Kelly Jenner and Carol Kardashian became the first mothers (they have 5-month-old daughter Tommy and 3-month-old daughter truer, respectively)
"Chris was surprised at how Kelly adapted to parenting."
"Kelly is much calmer than I am," she told us
"She can't go anywhere without her." The businesswoman was also in awe of Khloe because she never doubted the parenting skills of the great American cowboy co-founder



Number  1
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Water Luis Sequeira Victoria and Abdul Consolata Boyle Visual Effects...”
“Dorota Kobiela Hugh Welchman Sean Bobbitt Ivan Mactaggart Hugh Welchman Animated Short Dear Basketball Glen Keane Kobe Bryant Garden Party Victor Caire Gabriel Grapperon Lou Dave Mullins Dana Murray Negative Space Max Porter Ru Kuwahata Revolting Rhymes Jakob Schuh Jan Lachauer Adapted Screenplay Call Me by Your Name James Ivory...”
“Guillermo del Toro’s “The Shape of Water” continued its awards show streak, leading the pack with 13 nominations.”
““Dunkirk” followed behind with eight nods and Martin McDonagh’s “Three Billboards Outside Ebbing, Missouri”with seven.”
“All three films earned best picture nominations.”
“The rest of the category was rounded out by “Call Me By Your Name,” “Darkest Hour,” “Get Out,” “Phantom Thread,” “Lady Bird,” and “The Post.”The Academy Awards — hosted by Jimmy Kimmel for the second time — will air live on ABC on March 4.”
“Here is the list of 2018 Oscar nominations Best Picture Call Me by Your Name Darkest Hour Dunkirk Get Out Lady Bird Phantom Thread The Post The Shape of Water Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Lead Actor Timothée Chalamet Call Me by Your Name Daniel Day Lewis Phantom Thread Daniel...”
“Kaluuya Get Out Gary Oldman Darkest Hour Denzel Washington Roman J Israel Esq Lead Actress Sally Hawkins The Shape of Water Frances McDormand Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Margot Robbie I Tonya Saoirse Ronan Lady Bird Meryl Streep The Post Supporting Actor Willem Dafoe The Florida Project Woody Harrelson Three...”
“Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Richard Jenkins The Shape of Water Christopher Plummer All the Money in the World Sam Rockwell Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Supporting Actress Mary J Blige Mudbound Allison Janney I Tonya Lesley Manville Phantom Thread Laurie Metcalf Lady Bird Octavia Spencer The Shape of Water Director...”
“Dunkirk Christopher Nolan Get Out Jordan Peele Lady Bird Greta Gerwig Phantom Thread Paul Thomas Anderson The Shape of Water Guillermo del Toro Animated Feature The Boss Baby Tom McGrath Ramsey Ann Naito The Breadwinner Nora Twomey Anthony Leo Coco Lee Unkrich Darla K Anderson Ferdinand Carlos Saldanha Loving Vincent...”


"Water Louis sequila, Victoria and Abdel Consuela tapboyle visual effects..."
"Dorota kobiela Hugh welchman Sean Bobbitt Ivan MacTaggart Hugh welchman animated short film dear basketball Glen Keane Kobe Bryant garden party winner Caire Gabriel grapperon Lou Dave Mullins Dana Murray negative space Max Porter Ru kuwahata reversing rhyms Jakob Schuh Jan lachauer adapted screenplay" call me your name James ivory "..."
Guillermo del Toro's the shape of water continues its winning streak at the awards ceremony, leading with 13 nominations
Dunkirk followed with eight nods, and Martin MacDonald's three billboards out of Missouri followed with seven nods
"All three films were nominated for best picture."
"The rest of the awards were replaced by" call me your name "," the darkest moment "," go away "," phantom line "," Miss bird "and" post ". The second Oscars, hosted by Jimmy Kimmel, will be broadcast on ABC on March 4
"Here's the list of best picture nominations for the 2018 Oscars. Please call me your name at the darkest moment. Dunkirk goes out Lady Bird mirage line, the shape of water behind three billboards, ebb tide. Missouri chief actor Timothy chalamit, please call me your name Daniel Day Lewis mirage line Daniel..."
"Karuya comes out of Gary Oldman's darkest moment Denzel Washington Roman J Israel ESQ heroine Sally Hawkins water shape Francis mcdorman and three billboards out of the ebb Missouri margotrobi I Tonia sayilsronan lady Kyle Streep supporting actor William Dafoe Florida project woody hallerson III.."
"Missouri billboard Richard Jenkins the shape of water Christopher Plummer all the world's qiansam Rockwell three billboard supporting actress Mary J. blaig confused Alison Jennie Tony Leslie Manville phantom line Laurie Metcalf Lady Bird Octavia Spencer the shape director of water..."
"Dunkirk Christopher Nolan out of Lady Jordan peel bird Greta wig phantom thread Paul Thomas Anderson water Guillermo del Toro shape cartoon boss baby Tom McGrath Ramsey annetto breadwinner Nora Tommy Antonio CoCo Lee Unkrich Dara K Anderson Ferdinand Carlos Saldanha love Vincent..."



Number  2
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Get it from the Apple app store or the Google Play store.”
“Stay up to date with our free mobile app.”
““‘Robert told Caitlyn in secret after the O.J.”
“Simpson was guilty, but joined the defense team to get back at his remarried ex,'” Kim Kardashian reads.”
““It says in Caitlyn’s book, ‘Robert Kardashian knew O.J.”
“Sign up for our Coffee Break newsletter here.”
“Get more celebrity news and photos delivered to your inbox for free on weekdays.”
“In a clip for Sunday night’s “KUWTK,” Kim reads to Kourtney and Khloe excerpts from Caitlyn’s memoir.”
“...had been violent towards her.”
“That’s because Kris had been close friends with Nicole and knew that O.J.”


"Get it from Apple App store or Google game store."
"Keep our free mobile app up to date."
"After O.J., Robert told Caitlin in secret."
"Simpson was guilty, but joined the defense team in retaliation for his remarried ex-wife," Kim wrote
"In Caitlin's book," Robert Kardashian knows O.J. "
"Register for our coffee break newsletters here."
"Let more celebrity news and photos be sent to your inboxes for free on weekdays."
In a clip on Sunday night's kutke show, King reads excerpts from Courtney and Crowe's Caitlin memoirs
“…… "Violence against her"
"That's because Chris and Ni are good friends and know O.J."



**Something goes wrong**
“Then it becomes a media thing – a crisis – and that becomes licence to bill.” And that’s before the whole thing gets wrapped up in a non-disclosure agreement.”
““They want to inflame and create issues that extend the back-and-forth.”
“They’re making money off it.”It’s no mystery, then, that barely a week into the split, the children are already the focus of the battle.”
““If you’re wise enough you can see that websites like TMZ granulate – serialise – everything because it creates entertainment product for them to carry it.”
““Angelina needs some kind of leverage to go for full custody for the kids.”
““They know that if they can get to Harvey first, and he publishes first, they can set the tone because the rest of the media consider TMZ a first-party source,” says one talent manager familiar with the frontlines of Hollywood scandal.”
“What is clear is that in this confrontation nothing is left to chance and the leaks that appear in the media – usually via celebrity website TMZ’s host Harvey Levin, are deliberate and highly strategised.”
““This one is going to end with both of them having their images bruised,” predicts Allison Hope Weiner, a lawyer and journalist who has covered Hollywood for more than 15 years.”
“Pitt was reportedly “lawyering up” after the FBI announced the agency “is continuing to gather facts and will evaluate whether an investigation at the federal level will be pursued”.”
“But the Brangelina marriage crack-up already looks to be heading in the opposite direction, with reports of the FBI looking into “an incident” on a flight the Pitt-Jolie family took on 14 September.”


"Then it becomes a media thing - a crisis - and it becomes Bill's license." This is before the whole thing is surrounded by a confidentiality agreement
"They want to fan the flames, create some problems and make them grow."
"That's how they make money." Then, it's no mystery. It's only a week since the breakup, and the children are already the focus of the battle
"If you're smart enough, you'll find sites like TMZ granulating everything - serializing - because it creates entertainment products for them to carry."
"Angelina needs some kind of chip to fight for full custody of the children."
A talent manager familiar with the front line of Hollywood scandal said: "they know that if they can find Harvey first and publish him first, they can set the tone because other media think TMZ is the source of the first party."
"It's clear that nothing is accidental in this confrontation. The leaks in the media - usually through Harvey Levin, the host of TMZ - are deliberate and strategic."
"This time it's going to end up hurting both of them," predicts Alison hope Weiner, a lawyer and journalist who has been covering Hollywood for more than 15 years
According to reports, Pitt is "looking for a lawyer" after the FBI announced that the agency "is continuing to collect facts and will assess whether it will continue to conduct investigations at the federal level."
"But the breakup of brengelina's marriage seems to have gone in the opposite direction. It is reported that the FBI is investigating the" incident "on a plane in which the Pitt Jolie family took on September 14."



Number  4
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...has a chance with Kris?”
“He is broke, he needs money and he feels his only chance to get back on TV — which is his dream — is to hook up with his old ‘family.’”HollywoodLifers, do you think O.J.”
“Simpson is eligible for parole in just one year and it turns out his first order of business will be to find Kris Jenner and date her!”
“Do you think he has a chance?”
“O.J.”
“Simpson has the hots for Kris Jenner.”
“The former NFL star is currently serving time in prison for armed robbery and battery but his time in prison is possibly coming to an end.”
“Now that O.J.”
“...is about to be up for a parole and a new report claims he wants to date the famous momager because he s always had a crush on her He s supposedly been pining for her while behind bars and...”
“...his crush goes back 30 years...”


“… Is there a chance to be with Chris? "
"He's broke, he needs money, and he thinks his only chance to get back on TV - it's his dream - is to chat up with his former family."
"Simpson is eligible for parole within a year, and it turns out that his first task is to find Chris Jenner and date her!"
"Do you think he has a chance?"
“O.J.”
"Simpson likes Chris Jenner."
"The former NFL star is currently in prison for armed robbery and assault, but his time in prison may be coming to an end."
"Now O.J
“…… Soon to be released on parole, a new report says he wants to date the famous mother because he has been infatuated with her, he is thought to miss her in prison, and.... "
“… His infatuation goes back 30 years... "



Number  5
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Yes, she has been praised and criticised as “outspoken”, but her style never risks being “aggressive” or “combative”, or any of the other words thrown at women who are deemed insufficiently graceful when they disagree with men.”
“Besides becoming an actor, she became a feminist who worked for UN Women as an advocate for political participation and leadership.”
“This must have happened in the 80s and early 90s when she was a young girl; it still happens in the US to every black woman I know who has a mixed-race child.”
“Prosperous and largely white: Meghan’s mother was regularly mistaken for her nanny there.”
“The family settled in Woodland Hills, a prosperous Los Angeles neighbourhood.”
“This union of white Hollywood and black social-spiritual activism made her the offspring of a modern and ever more varied biracial bourgeoisie.”
“...and yoga instructor who focuses on community mental health...”
“Photograph Chris Jackson AFP Getty Images Rachel Meghan Markle for those who have chosen or somehow managed to miss the ceaseless chronicling of her life thus far is the only daughter of Thomas Markle white an Emmy award winning cinematographer and lighting designer and Doria Ragland black a social worker...”
“Women don’t need to find a voice, they have a voice, and they need to feel empowered to use it, and people need to be encouraged to listen.”Meghan Markle and the Duchess of Cambridge at the Royal Foundation Forum.”
“So did the words “I fundamentally disagree”, as in: “What’s interesting is … when speaking about girls’ and women’s empowerment you’ll often hear people say: ‘Well, you’re helping women find their voices,’ and I fundamentally disagree with that.”


Yes, she is praised and criticized as "outspoken," but her style never risks being "aggressive" or "aggressive," and never throws out any other words to women who are considered less elegant when they disagree with men
"In addition to being an actress, she became a feminist, working for UN women, advocating political participation and leadership."
"It must have happened in the '80s and early' 90s, when she was a little girl; it happens to every black woman I know who has mixed blood children in the United States."
"Prosperous, mostly white: Megan's mother is often mistaken for her nanny."
The family settled in woodland hill, a prosperous neighborhood in Los Angeles
"This combination of white Hollywood and black social spiritual activities makes her a modern and more diversified descendant of the mixed race bourgeoisie."
“… And yoga instructors who focus on community mental health... "
"Photos by Chris Jackson AFP Getty pictures by Rachel Megan markel for those who chose or managed to miss out on the constant record of her life, so far the only daughter of Thomas mark white Emmy award winning photographer and lighting designer and author of Doria Raglan triad..."
Speaking at the Royal foundation forum, Megan markel and the Duchess of Cambridge said: "women don't need to find a voice, they have a voice, they need to feel able to use it, people need to be encouraged to listen."
The same is true of "I don't agree at all," such as: "the funny thing is When it comes to girls and women's empowerment, you often hear people say, "well, you're helping women find their voices." I don't agree with that at all. "



Number  6
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Read more from Yahoo Lifestyle:Follow us on Instagram, Facebook, and Twitter for nonstop inspiration delivered fresh to your feed, every day.”
“Selfie sticks at the ready!”
“(Photo: Karwai Tang/WireImage)And while royal watchers are already clamoring for a U.S. tour, it may be prudent to get your travel agent moving just in case Meghan’s homeland doesn’t make the cut.”
“Meghan Markle’s Givenchy dress will be on public display at Windsor Castle starting in October, along with a replica of Prince Harry’s Household Cavalry uniform.”
“The wedding regalia will then move to the Palace of Holyroodhouse in Edinburgh, Scotland, from June 14-Oct. 6, 2019.”
“The exhibition gets underway on Oct. 28 and will run through Jan. 6, 2019.”
“Her embroidered veil and diamond-and-platinum tiara (a loaner from grandma-in-law Queen Elizabeth II) will also be on public display.”
“Palace KensingtonRoyal August 29 2018 When it comes to the Meghan s dress however visitors to Windsor Castle where the newly minted Duke and Duchess of Sussex wed will see the actual dress designed for the royal bride by Givenchy s Clare Waight Keller...”
“The wedding outfits of The Duke and Duchess of Sussex will go on display at Windsor Castle in 2018 and the Palace of Holyroodhouse in Edinburgh in 2019 in a special RCT exhibition A RoyalWedding The Duke and Duchess of Sussex https t co j1N3WZFD50 pic twitter com rKImNLva8w Kensington...”
“The Royal Collection Trust’s A Royal Wedding: The Duke and Duchess of Sussex exhibit will also feature an identical version of the Household Cavalry frock-coat uniform worn by the groom on the couple’s big day.”


"Read more about Yahoo's lifestyle: follow us on instagram, Facebook and Twitter to provide fresh inspiration for your feed every day."
"Selfie is always ready!"
(photo: Karwai Tang / WireImage) although Royal observers are already clamoring to travel to the United States, it's better to move your travel agency in case Megan's homeland doesn't make it. "
Megan Markle's Givenchy dress will be on public display at Windsor Castle in October, along with a replica of Prince Harry's family cavalry uniform
"The royal wedding will then move to Holly house in Edinburgh, Scotland, from June 14 to October 6, 2019."
"The exhibition started on October 28 and will last until January 6, 2019."
"Her embroidered veil, diamonds and platinum headdress (lent to her by Queen Elizabeth II's grandmother) will also be on display."
"Kensington Royal Palace on August 29, 2018, when it comes to Megan's dress, however, visitors to Windsor Castle, the newly cast Duke and Duchess of Sussex will see the actual dress designed for the royal bride by Claude waite Keller of Givenchy..."
"In 2018, the wedding costumes of the Duke and Duchess of Sussex will be displayed at Windsor Castle. In 2019, a special RCT exhibition of the royal wedding will be held at Holyroodhouse palace in Edinburgh. The wedding costumes of the Duke and Duchess of Sussex will be displayed at http t Co j1n3wzfd50 pic twitter com rkimnlva8w Kensington..."
"The Royal Collection trust is a royal wedding: the exhibition of the Duke and Duchess of Sussex will also show the same version of the family cavalry robe, coat and uniform worn by the groom on the wedding day."



Number  7
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“From the archives, stories about celebrity and paparazzi:AdvertisementDavid Lazarus: Bieber has a point on paparazziCalabasas wrestles with the Bieber effectEditorial: You have a problem with the paparazzi?”
“Times staff writers Christie D’Zurilla and Amanda Covarrubias contributed to this report.”
“A two-mile stretch of the highway was closed for hours in both directions near Corral Canyon Road after the crash occurred shortly after noon.”
“The lanes were finally cleared and reopened shortly after 9 p m Jenner whose apparent transition from male to female has drawn intense media coverage in recent days was being followed by paparazzi when the collision occurred but it s doubtful he was trying to outrun them said L A”
“County Sheriff s Sgt...”
“Philip Brooks.”
“AdvertisementBrooks described a chain reaction involving four cars:A woman driving northbound in a Toyota Prius slowed down or stopped for reasons that were unclear.”
“An elderly woman driving a Lexus sedan rear-ended the Prius.”
“Jenner, who was driving a black Cadillac Escalade sport utility vehicle that was hauling a trailer carrying an off-road vehicle, then rear-ended the Lexus.”
“The impact propelled the Lexus into oncoming traffic, where a Hummer traveling southbound slammed into the Lexus.”


"From the archives, about celebrities and paparazzi: ads David Lazarus: Bieber has a little bit of an opinion on paparazzi Calabasas' fight with Bieber editorial: do you have a problem with paparazzi?"
The times writers Christie de suleira and Amanda kovarubias contributed to this report
"Shortly after the accident, at noon, a two mile stretch of freeway near Koral Canyon road was closed for hours in both directions."
"Shortly after 9 p.m., the driveway was finally cleared and reopened. Jenner's apparent shift from a male to a female in recent days has attracted intense media coverage. At the time of the crash, the paparazzi had been following him, but it was doubtful whether he was trying to overtake them Los Angeles police said
"Sheriff Sergeant..."
"Philip Brooks."
Brooks describes a chain reaction involving four cars: a woman driving a Toyota Prius northward slows down or stops for an unknown reason. "
"An old lady in a Lexus hit the Prius."
"Jenna drove a black Cadillac Escalade SUV, pulled an SUV trailer, and then hit Lexus."
"The impact pushed Lexus into oncoming traffic, and a Hummer travelling South hit Lexus."



Number  8
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Judiciary spokesman Mlenga Mvula has now confirmed that Madonna had been granted an adoption order by Justice Fiona Mwale.”
“The twins will join David and Mercy, the two children previously adopted into the US by Madonna amid some controversy.”
“Their father was in court to observe proceedings, while their mother is understood to have died a week after giving birth in 2012 from caesarian section complications.”
“The children, previously reported to be twin girls named Stella and Esther, could leave Malawi with the singer shortly after spending the last two years in the Home of Hope in Mchinji.”
“The American pop star, who has already adopted two Malawian children and has a biological son and daughter, has seen her adoption request approved after attending court in person.”
“Madonna has been granted permission to adopt four-year-old twins from Malawi, after she appeared in court to hear a judge rule in her favour.”


Justice Department spokesman mlenga mvula confirmed that Madonna had received an adoption order from judge Fiona mwale.
"The twins will join David and mercy, who have been adopted by Madonna to the United States in some disputes."
"Their father watched the proceedings in court, and it is understood that their mother died of complications of a cesarean section a week after giving birth in 2012."
"It is reported that the children are twins named Stella and Esther, who may leave Malawi with the singer shortly after spending their last two years at McKinley's hope house."
"The American pop star, who has adopted two Malawian children and has a son and daughter, saw in court that the adoption application was approved."
Madonna has been allowed to adopt four year old twins from Malawi after hearing a ruling in her favor in court



Number  9
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I don’t know what [job] really creates a safe space for a woman to have time out, prolong the human race, and return to work in a very supportive way.’”
“‘It would be so lonely if he wasn’t there,’ she said about working with her leading man.”
“The Irish-Ethiopian beauty has reportedly signed on to feature in upcoming sci-fi adventure Ad Astra.”
“The film tells the story of a man’s journey across a lawless and unforgiving solar system to find his missing father, a scientist who poses a threat to all mankind.”
“The flick will be directed by James Grey and also rumoured to be lined-up for a part is silver screen is veteran Tommy Lee Jones.”
“Details about and Pitt – also on board as a producer – and Negga’s role are being kept under wraps for now.”
“Last year Negga, 35, attracted international attention when she received an Academy Award nomination for her role in the historical drama Loving.”
“Although she missed out on the Best Actress gong at the ceremony in February, she’s clearly not stuck for work.”
“IFTA winner Negga, who initially rose to fame on home shores in RTE’s Love/Hate and E4 series Misfits, is currently starring in season two of AMC’s comic book adaptation Preacher.”
“The actress appears opposite her other half, British boyfriend Dominic Cooper, 39, in the drama.”


"I don't know what (work) really creates a safe space for women to have time to rest, extend human life expectancy, and return to work in a very supportive way."
"If he's not there, it's too lonely," she said of working with the hero
"It is reported that the Irish Ethiopian beauty has signed up to play the leading role in the upcoming sci-fi adventure film" Astra. "
"This film tells the story of a man who travels through the lawless and merciless solar system to find his missing father, a scientist who poses a threat to all mankind."
"The film will be directed by James Gray and it is said that it will also play veteran Tommy Lee Jones on the screen."
"The details about Peter - and also as a producer - and the role of nega are being kept secret at the moment."
"Last year, 35 year old negain was nominated for an Oscar for his role in the historical drama love, which attracted international attention."
"Although she missed Gong Linna, the best actress at the February awards ceremony, she was obviously not trapped in her job."
"The winner of IFTA, negga, first became famous in RTE's" love / hate "and E4 series" out of place "and is currently starring in AMC's second season of" missionaries. "
In the play, the actress is opposite her partner, Dominic Cooper, 39, her British boyfriend



Number  10
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““And rumor number two: no, we’re not pregnant.””
“JENNIFER ANISTON NOT PREGNANT, EXPECTINGJUSTIN AND JENNIFER’S LINGERIE SPREEThe couple wasn’t romatically linked until late May, and when the two were photographed together for the first time in early June, Bivens’ mother denied that her daughter and Theroux had split.”
“...and Mrs. Smith” together.”
“But while Aniston may have played a similar role in the breakup of Justin Theroux and his girlfriend of 14 years, Aniston specifically requested a meeting to clear the air with her boyfriend’s ex, reports say.”
“According to Grazia magazine, Aniston had a “tearful” meeting with Theroux’s ex, stylist Heidi Bivens, at the Mercer Hotel last week.”
“The two had a glass of wine as they spoke, sources say.”
“Theroux was nowhere in sight.”
““Jen has always been sympathetic to Heidi because she’s heard from Justin just how devastated she is about their break-up,” a source told the magazine.”
“Jen told Heidi that she understands what a painful time she has been going through and explained that she wanted her to know hand on heart that she would never steal another woman s man Aniston and Theroux met while filming Wanderlust in Georgia last fall a comedy about a...”
“...couple how moves to a rural commune when they find themselves unemployed...”


"Rumor two: No, we're not pregnant."
"Jennifer Aniston is not pregnant and is looking forward to Justin and Jennifer's underwear carnival. The couple didn't have a relationship until the end of May. When they were first photographed together in early June, bevens's mother denied that her daughter and Cyrus had separated."
“… With Mrs. Smith
Although Aniston may have played a similar role in Justin serrux's breakup with his girlfriend of 14 years, Aniston specifically asked to meet her boyfriend's ex girlfriend to clarify the issue, the report said
According to Grazia magazine, Aniston had a "tearful" meeting with Heidi Bivens, a former stylist at the Mercer hotel last week
"The source said they had a drink while they were talking."
"I can't see seru."
"Jane has always sympathized with Heidi because she heard from Justin how sad she was about their breakup," a source told the magazine
"Jane told Heidi that she understood what a painful time she had been through, and explained that she wanted her to know for herself that she would never steal another woman's man, Aniston and Cyrus, who met when they filmed vagabond last fall in Georgia
“… When they find themselves out of work, how do they move to the rural commune? "



Number  11
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This particular report was seemingly concocted simply because Pitt is coincidentally working with a young actress who played his estranged wife in a movie, noted Gossip Cop.”
“Ever since Brangelina split happened, a few websites including In Touch, Hollywood Life are consistently reporting many stories on these two Hollywood A-listers and their current relationship status.”
“Brad Pitt is crushing over a 21-year-old Angelina Jolie-lookalike!”
“According to a recent report by In Touch, the 53-year-old Hollywood actor is falling for 21-year-old actress Ella Purnell, who has portrayed the younger version of Angelina Jolie in Maleficent (2014).”
“Also read: Is there a squabble going on between Angelina Jolie's sons Maddox and Pax?”
“She was recently cast in the lead role of Starz's upcoming TV series "Sweetbitter," which is being produced by Pitt.”
“Hence, In Touch claimed that Pitt has been smitten by Purnell's performance in the movie so he cast her in his new series.”
“"He's so enchanted," the source told In Touch.”
“"Brad had Ella in mind from the get-go.”
“He went out of his way to cast her," the source added.”


"This particular story seems to have been fabricated just because Pete happened to work with a young actress who plays his separated wife in a film," the gossip police said
"Since the breakup, some websites, including in touch and Hollywood life, have been reporting on the story of the two Hollywood stars and their current relationship."
Brad Pitt is fascinated by a 21-year-old Angelina Jolie
"According to a recent contact report, the 53 year old Hollywood actor fell in love with 21-year-old actress Ella Purnell, who plays the young Angelina Jolie in maleficent (2014)," she said
Read another: is there a quarrel between Angelina Jolie's sons, Maddox and parks? "
She recently starred in Stuart's upcoming TV series, sweet and bitter, produced by Pete
As a result, contact magazine claimed that Pete was fascinated by her performance in the film, so he chose her in his new series
"He's so charming," the source said in contact magazine
"Brad thought of Ella from the beginning."
"He threw her out on purpose," the source added



Number  12
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Over the 25-year span of this timeline, a consistent pattern emerges.”
“DeRogatis’s timeline covers the entire span of Kelly’s life, including his major career milestones and unrelated legal issues, but I’ve narrowed the focus of this timeline to specifically cover the sexual misconduct accusations against Kelly.”
“And in our post-#MeToo, post-Time’s Up, post-Harvey Weinstein world, and given the sheer volume of allegations against Kelly, it seems reasonable to raise the question of why he’s been able to continue working so much.”
“At Coachella in 2018, rapper Vince Staples repeatedly referred to Kelly as a “child molester” in an interview with Complex.”
“His music appeared in Pitch Perfect 3.”
“In 2018, he toured with singer Charlie Wilson (there were some protests).”
“In 2017, he finished an arena tour with a few cancellations.”
“(Through a lawyer, Kelly has denied all accusations, saying he would “work diligently and forcibly to pursue his accusers and clear his name.”)Yet despite decades of lawsuits and allegations, Kelly’s career marched steadily on.”
“Since the story broke, multiple women have added their own testimonies of abuse at R. Kelly’s hands, including his ex-wife.”
“In 2017, he was accused of creating an abusive “sex cult” of very young women, whom he allegedly isolates, brainwashes, and abuses physically and emotionally.”


"In this 25 year time span, there is a consistent pattern."
"Klotis's schedule covers all of Kelly's life, including his major career milestones and unrelated legal issues, but I've narrowed the focus of this schedule to cover charges of sexual misconduct against Kelly."
"In our post Mayo era, post time, post Harvey Weinstein era, given so many charges against Kelly, it seems reasonable to ask why he can continue to work so much."
"In cochella in 2018, rapper Vince staples repeatedly referred to Kelly as a" child molester "in an interview with complex magazine."
"His music comes in perfect pitch 3."
"In 2018, he toured (with some protests) with singer Charlie Wilson."
"In 2017, he completed an arena tour, but cancelled several times."
"(through lawyers, Kelly denied all the charges, saying he would" diligently and forcefully pursue the plaintiff and clear the charge. ") However, despite decades of litigation and accusations, Kelly's career has moved steadily forward. "
"Since the report came to light, many women have added their abusive testimony to R. Kelly, including his ex-wife."
"In 2017, he was accused of creating an abusive" sex cult "for very young women, who he said were segregated, brainwashed and physically and emotionally abused."



Number  13
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RadarOnline.com has all the details – click through for more.”
“The glamorous couple was in great spirits as they boarded a yacht in the French principality.”
“Photo Credit: TheMegaAgency.com View GalleryKris Jenner and Corey Gamble turned on the style in Monaco.”
“Photo Credit: TheMegaAgency.com Reality TV Kris Jenner And Corey Gamble Party In Monaco – See The Photos ShareClick to share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)'Momager' looks glamorous on board yacht with boyfriend and friends.”
“Kris Jenner And Corey Gamble Party In Monaco – See The Photos 'Momager' looks glamorous on board yacht with boyfriend and friends.”
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”


“ RadarOnline.com The site has all the details - click to see more. "
"This charming couple was in great spirits when they boarded the yacht in the Duchy of France."
"Photo source: TheMegaAgency.com Check out gallerykris Jenner and Corey Gamble's style in Monaco
"Photo source: TheMegaAgency.com The Party of Kris Jenner and Corey gamble in Monaco - share photos on Facebook (open in a new window) share on twitter (open in a new window), "momager" and her boyfriend and friends look amazing on the yacht. "
"Chris Jenner and Corey Gambo's party in Monaco - look at the picture 'Mom' and her boyfriend on the yacht looking very attractive."
"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”



Number  14
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tomlin and Fonda took the opportunity to criticize President Donald Trump, but Parton refused to join in, maintaining a dignified silence.”
“Awful, awful fires.”
“...and Gomorrah the Biblical cities synonymous with vice darkness and impenitent sin...”
““California just keeps on being hit by disaster after disaster as foretold in the Bible,” the Grammy Award-winning entertainer and businesswoman told guests at Dolly Parton’s Stampede, a dinner and entertainment evening.”
““Pestilence, and epidemics, and crime, and disease.”
“And you know what?”
“They don’t even realize what is happening to them.”
“They are so corrupted they can t even see what is right in front of their eyes First they had the drought that lasted years and years killing off billions and billions of dollars in crops and making the soil so incredibly dry that a large rainstorm could easily turn...”
“...into a major flood...”
““Then they had the fires.”


"Tomlin and Fonda took the opportunity to criticize president trump, but Patton refused to join and kept a dignified silence."
"Terrible, terrible fire."
“…… Gomorrah, the biblical City, is synonymous with evil, darkness and unrepentable sin... "
"As the Bible predicts, California has been suffering one disaster after another," the Grammy award-winning artist and businesswoman told guests at Dolly Parton's stampede at dinner and entertainment parties
"Pestilence, epidemic, crime and disease."
"Do you know?"
"They didn't even realize what was going on."
"They are so corrupt that they can't even see what's in front of them. First of all, they suffered from years of drought, resulting in billions of dollars of crop failure, making the soil extremely dry, and a rainstorm is easy to turn over... "
“… It's a big flood... "
"And then they had a fire."



Number  15
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A tribute was expected.”
“The show will be staged at the ornate main branch of the New York Public Library and will be the introduction of new designer Nicola Glass.”
“Longchamp will also celebrate in Paris with a September event at the Opera Garnier, according to a company statement, as it has expanded in recent years from leather goods into ready-to-wear apparel.”
“It was a big American-themed year for the house with the opening of a Fifth Avenue flagship store, a collaboration with Shayne Oliver and Kendall Jenner as its new face.”
“NEW ARRIVALSThe family-owned Longchamp is having its cake and eating it, too, as the company marks 70 years in business with its first full-scale runway show in New York.”
“Pop-ups in New York, Minnesota’s Mall of America and elsewhere are planned.”
“The latest will be available for immediate purchase on SavageX.com.”
“She debuted the line in May with sizes ranging up to size 44DD in bras and 3XL in apparel.”
“It’s Rihanna after all.”
“No matter.”


"We're looking forward to a salute."
"The exhibition will be staged in the magnificent main and branch libraries of the New York Public Library, and a new designer, Nicolas glass, will be introduced."
The company will also celebrate in September at Opera Garnier in Paris, where it has expanded from leather products to garments in recent years, according to a statement
"For house, this is a big day with the theme of America. The opening of the Fifth Avenue flagship store and the cooperation with Shane Oliver and Kendall Jenner have become its new face."
"The newcomer family's Longchamp company held its first all-round runway show in New York, marking that the company has been in business for 70 years."
"Pop ups in New York, Minnesota's American shopping malls and elsewhere are planned."
"The latest available SavageX.com Website. "
"She launched the collection in May, with bras up to 44dd and dress sizes 3XL."
"Rihanna, after all."
"It doesn't matter."



Number  16
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That's the only way I think either one of us would probably describe it, if she was sitting here."”
“"But now, here we are, going on three years later and every day that goes by, it just feels like a stronger bond between the two of us and it constantly feels like it's going to the next level.”
“...kind of clinging to each other to get through this Shelton continued...”
“And I think if Gwen and I were being honest right now talking about this I think in the back of our mind that we both kind of thought this is a rebound deal because we re both coming out of a low spot in our lives and we re...”
“...said on the upcoming episode of NBC s Sunday TODAY with Willie Geist...”
“When I was going through my divorce and just hit rock bottom just like anybody does when they go through something that devastating it s a miracle that I met somebody that was going through the same exact thing that I was at the exact same moment in time Shelton...”
“She and Shelton went public with their relationship that November.”
“Stefani filed for divorce from Gavin Rossdale, with whom she shares three sons, the following month.”
“Shelton divorced fellow country star Miranda Lambert in July 2015 after four years of marriage.”
“Almost three years after they stepped out together as a couple, Blake Shelton is reflecting on his relationship with Gwen Stefani, saying the two share a bond that gets stronger every day.”


"If she sat here, I think any of us would have described it that way."
"But now, we are here, three years later, moving on, every day is in the past, and we feel that the bond between us is getting stronger and stronger, and we constantly feel that the relationship between us will go to a higher level."
“…… In order to get through this, Sheldon went on to say
"I think if Gwen and I talk about this honestly now, I think deep down in our hearts, we all think it's a rebound trade, because we're all out of the bottom of our lives, we are..."
“… Today, on NBC's Sunday show, I said to Willie gaster
"When I went through divorce, I fell to the bottom just like anyone who went through a devastating thing. I met someone who went through the same thing at the same time as me. It's a miracle, Sheldon..."
"In November of that year, she and Sheldon made their relationship public."
Next month, Stefani filed for divorce from Gavin Rossdale, who has three sons
"After four years of marriage, Sheldon divorced Miranda Lambert, a country star, in July 2015."
"Almost three years after they've been together as a couple, Blake Sheldon is rethinking his relationship with Gwen Stephanie, and he says it's getting closer and closer."



Number  17
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“...created and maintained by a third party and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses...”
“Which is why it might be surprising to some onlookers that, according to the Daily Mail, Prince Harry has declined to seek a prenuptial agreement before he marries Meghan Markle today in Windsor.”
“But we spoke to two royal experts who said nobody should be shocked at this news.”
“When it comes to the royals, prenups are simply not done.”
“This is not a celebrity marriage, it’s a royal marriage.”
““I don’t think members of the royal family sign prenuptial agreements,” says Katie Nicholl, author of .”
““It’s commonplace with celebrity marriage, but this is not a celebrity marriage, it’s a royal marriage.” Nicholl says that Prince William and Kate Middleton also did not sign a prenuptial agreement, despite the very public divorce between William and Harry’s parents, Prince Charles and Princess Diana.”
“And even though three of the Queen’s four children have divorced, none apparently had a prenuptial agreement.”
“Yes, there is a large sum of money in the balance for this marriage, but the true, staggering wealth belongs to the Queen, so it wouldn’t be divided up if Meghan and Harry did end up divorcing.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
“… Created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address... "
Prince Harry refused to seek a prenuptial agreement before Windsor and Megan markel got married today, which is why some onlookers were surprised, the Daily Mail reported
"But we interviewed two royal experts and they said no one would be shocked by the news."
"When it comes to the royal family, the prenuptial agreement is not complete at all."
"It's not a celebrity marriage, it's a royal marriage."
"I don't think members of the royal family sign prenuptial agreements," says Katie Nicoll, the author of the book
"Celebrity marriage is common, but it's not celebrity marriage, it's royal marriage." Nicole said Prince William and Kate Middleton also did not sign a prenuptial agreement, although Prince William and Harry's parents, Prince Charles and Princess Diana, publicly divorced
"Although three of the Queen's four children have divorced, it is clear that none of them have a prenuptial agreement."
"Yes, there's a lot of money in the balance of the marriage, but the real amazing wealth belongs to the queen, so if Megan and Harry do eventually divorce, the wealth won't be divided up."



Number  18
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I booked the tour for October so I could have at least four months to just really bond and see their fingers and s— like that,” he said.”
“I was like, ‘What the f— is going on here?’ One of the great memories.”Besides talking about his oldest daughter’s music skills, the Grammy Award winner said his family will be joining him on tour.”
““She’s 5, and she understands the concept of a hook.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Beyoncé Shares First Photo of Twins Sir and Rumi Carter“She kept doing that ‘boom shakalaka, boom shakalaka.’ I was like, ‘Oh, she understands the concept of a hook,'” he said.”
“Five minutes of her doing that.”He also touched on the hook that went viral after the song was released in early July.”
“Five minutes!”
““I was like, ‘Oh, s—.’ I haver [her full freestyle] on my phone.”
““She got the headphones and she climbed on the little stool, and then she just started rapping,” JAY-Z said.”
“He just came out, like, Sir.”Image zoom Credit: Beyoncé InstagramThe father of three also revealed how the couple’s firstborn, 5-year-old daughter Blue Ivy, ended up rapping a freestyle on his new album, 4:44, while they were in the recording studio together.”
“He carries himself like that.”


"I've ordered a tour in October so I can have at least four months to really get together and look at their fingers and S - like that," he said
"I thought," what's going on? In addition to talking about his eldest daughter's musical skills, the Grammy winner said his family would tour with him
"She's five years old, and she knows the concept of hooks."
"Related video: Beyonce shared the first picture of the twins, jazz and rummy Carter," she said all the time. "Bang, bang, I thought," Oh, she understands the concept of hooks, "he said
"The five minutes she did it." He also mentioned the hook that became popular after the song was released in early July
"Five minutes!"
"I said, 'Oh, s -' I have her freestyle on my cell phone."
"She took the headphones, climbed up the stool, and started rap," Jay-Z said
"He just came out, like, sir." Image zooming credit: Beyonce instagram's father of three also revealed that the couple's eldest son, five-year-old daughter blue ivy, ended their studio collaboration with freestyle rap on his new album 4:44
"He always does."



Number  19
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...adopt because the kids are growing up and don t need her as much...”
“...magazine Angelina s planning to adopt another child once she s done filming and promoting Maleficent 2 They also added that the adoption may be the result of Empty nest syndrome because Angelina thinks it s the right time to...”
““He doesn’t need anymore.” Rumors began that Jolie was looking to adopt after a a source told OK!”
““Brad only wants what is best for his kids and he wants to give the kids he does have as much attention as possible,” our source added.”
““But Brad has no interest in competing with his ex in an adoption war or trying to keep up with her in that weird way.”All Brad cares about now is making sure he’s looking after his own kids.”
““Angie always talked with Brad about expanding their family even more so Brad would not be surprised or upset if Angelina continued to adopt children,” our source went on to say.”
“He has enough kids to worry about.”When it comes to reports that Angelina may be looking to adopt again, Brad is neither shocked, nor does he even care.”
““He loves everyone of his children and does not feel the need to grow his family any bigger.”
““Brad has no desire to adopt any more children at this point in his life,” our source said.”
“A source close to the actor told us EXCLUSIVELY that his family is as big as he’d like it to be.”


“… Adoption is because the children are growing up and don't need her much... "
“… Magazine Angelina plans to adopt another child. Once she has finished filming and promoting maleficent2, they add that adoption may be the result of empty nest syndrome because Angelina thinks it's time... "
"He doesn't need it anymore." There is a rumor that Julie is going to adopt a good news person
"Brad just wants the best for the kids, he wants to give them as much attention as possible," our source added
"But Brad is not interested in competing with his ex for an adoption war or trying to keep up with her in that strange way." Brad's concern now is to make sure he can take care of his children
"Angie always talks to Brad about expanding their family size so that Brad won't be surprised or upset if Angelina continues to adopt," our source continued
"He has enough children to worry about." When it comes to reports that Angelina may adopt again, Brad is neither shocked nor concerned
"He loves everyone in the children and doesn't feel the need to make the family bigger."
"Brad doesn't want to adopt anymore," our source said
"A source close to the actor told us exclusively that his family was as big as he wanted to be."



Number  20
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...claims both hilarious and not true...”
“...pregnant too with another purported source alleging there s talk of a baby on the way She and Affleck are said to be both very happy in spite of the unusual circumstances which is a clear contradiction from the cover...”
“Garner and Affleck also have not “called off” their divorce.”
“Gossip Cop can exclusively bust these untruths.”
“The latest cover of Star features photos of Garner and Shookus that were taken from side angles, giving the false illusion of protruding stomachs.”
“These misleading pictures are being used to sell an entirely fabricated narrative about Affleck impregnating both women.”
“It s evident right in the sub headline inside the issue that this is all bogus with the magazine writing Sources Say Ben Affleck May Be Gearing Up For New Babies With Both His Girlfriend And His Ex Wife Garner...”
“...is not Affleck s ex wife as they are still legally married and the use of the word may indicates the outlet doesn t have any legitimate confirmation to back up its claims...”
“In fact the publication goes on to contend Affleck could be expecting a child not only with Lindsay but also with Jen Notably neither may nor could appear on the cover where it s declared Shookus and Garner are both...”
“...pregnant The tabloid lures readers in with what appears to be an announcement but then changes course in the actual story which is apparently about the possibility that they re both carrying the actor s babies...”


“… Claims are funny and untrue... "
“…… She is also pregnant. Another alleged source claimed that someone said she and Affleck had a child on the road. It is said that both she and Affleck are very happy, although the situation is unusual, which is obviously contradictory to the cover.... "
"Ghana and Affleck did not 'Cancel' the divorce either."
"The gossip police can get rid of these lies."
The latest cover of starry sky features images of Ghana and shawkes from the side, giving the impression of a bulging stomach
"These misleading photos are used to sell the complete fabrication that Affleck made two women pregnant."
"Obviously, in the subtitle of this issue, it's all fake. It is reported that Ben Affleck may be preparing to have a baby with his girlfriend and ex-wife Ghana... "
“…… Not Affleck's ex-wife, because they are still legally married, the use of the word "may" indicates that the store does not have any legal confirmation to support its claim... "
"In fact, the journal continues to argue that Affleck may be pregnant not only with Lindsay, but also with Jane, especially if it is neither possible nor possible to appear on the cover, declaring that both shocos and Ghana are..."
“… The pregnant tabloid lures readers in what seems to be an announcement, but then changes the route in the actual story, which is obviously about the possibility that they all carry the actor's baby... "



Number  21
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Guardian Service...”
“It was replaced by Luis Fonsi and Daddy Yankee’s Despacito, which Bieber also features on.”
“His album Purpose spawned a series of colossal hit singles, including What Do You Mean, Love Yourself, and Sorry, which until recently was the most streamed song of all time globally.”
“!”With the tour now finished, the statement closes a chapter of his career.”
“!”He signed off by apologising for any grammatical errors: “I THINK THERES SOMETHING SPECIAL ABOUT IMPERFECTIONS!”
“I wanna be a man that learns from them and grows from them.!”
“... What I’m not gonna do is be ashamed of my mistakes.”
“I let bitterness, jealousy and fear run my life.!!!!”
“I have let my insecurities get the best of me at times, I let my broken relationships dictate the way I acted toward people and the way I treated them.”
“...m not alone has kept me going...”


"Guardian Services..."
"Instead, it was Louis fonsey and Yankee dad's despair, and Bieber appeared in the film."
"His album mission has spawned a series of hit singles, including what do you mean, love yourself and sorry. Until recently, it was the most popular song in the history of the world."
"!" with the end of the tour, this statement ends a chapter in his career. "
"! he finally apologized for any grammatical mistakes:" I think imperfection is special! "
"I want to be a person who learns from them and grows from them."! "
"... I will not be ashamed of my mistakes."
"I let pain, jealousy and fear dominate my life."!!! "
"I let my insecurities take up most of my time, and the relationships I break up determine the way I treat others and the way I treat them."
“… I'm not alone. Let me keep going... "



Number  22
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“And now all of the photos she posted are gone ,and the only ones that remain are one shot of the two of them on his Instagram.”
“Savannah Chrisley apparently doesn’t know best when it comes to relationships.”
“RadarOnline.com has exclusively learned the 19-year-old reality star has been dumped by her NBA player boyfriend, Luke Kennard, after only two months of dating!”
““Luke broke up with Savannah, and she is crushed,” a source close to situation revealed.”
““While they were on their recent trip to the Cayman Islands he decided that she was not the type of woman he wanted to be with anymore.”
“He basically told her that he was done.”But the proof is in the pictures !”
“As fans know, the Chrisley Knows Best teen queen has been posting non-stop photos of her and Kennard, 21, all over her social media pages (which include Instagram, Twitter and Facebook) since the two first became an official couple at the end of June.”
“As Radar previously reported, Kennard left his longtime girlfriend, hometown beauty Anna Castro, to be with Chrisley.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Now all the photos she posted are gone, only one of his two photos on instagram is left."
"Savannah crisley obviously doesn't know when to fall in love."
“ RadarOnline.com The website exclusively learned that the 19-year-old reality star was dumped by NBA player boyfriend Luke Kennard after only two months of dating! "
"Luke and Savannah broke up and she was crushed," a person familiar with the matter said
"When they recently went on a trip to the Caymans, he felt that she was no longer the kind of woman he wanted to be with."
"He basically told her he was done." But the evidence is in the picture! "
"Fans know that since the two became formal lovers for the first time at the end of June, the" krisley knows the best teen Queen "has been posting photos of her and 21-year-old Kennard on social media pages, including instagram, twitter and Facebook."
"As radar reported earlier, Kennard left his old girlfriend and hometown beauty Anna Castro to be with crisley."
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”



Number  23
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us here!”
“It starts at the groin and goes down to the ankle.”
“A vascular surgeon spoke EXCLUSIVELY with HollywoodLife.com about the answer.”
“Angelina Jolie, 42, has seemed to have a thin figure with eye catching bulging veins on her arms and legs, but is it something she should keep an eye on?”
““The large vein on her forearm is the Accessory cephalic vein,” vascular surgeon, Dr. Larisse K Lee EXCLUSIVELY shared with HollywoodLife.com.”
““Angelina is a physically thin woman, so that’s why you’re seeing those veins protrude the way they are on her hands and arms.”
“Being that she is a thinner build, when she flexes her muscles that’s when those veins are more pronounced and you can see them more.”
“The vein that you’re seeing on her leg is the great saphenous vein.”
“I don’t see anything that would be pause for concern with Angelina.” Well, that’s definitely good news!”
“HollywoodLifers, what are your thoughts on what the surgeon had to say?”


"Tell us!"
"From the groin to the ankle."
A vascular surgeon interviewed Hollywood life about the answer
"Angelina Jolie, 42, looks thin and has striking veins in her arms and legs, but is that what she should pay attention to?"
"The great vein in her forearm is the accessory cephalic vein," vascular surgeon Dr. larisse k-lee told us exclusively
"Angelina is a very thin woman, so you'll see the veins in her hands and arms protruding like they are now."
"Because she's slim, when she bends her muscles, those veins are more obvious, and you can see more."
"The vein you see in her leg is the great saphenous vein."
"I don't see anything stopping because I'm worried about Angelina." Well, that's absolutely good news! "
"Hollywood stars, what do you think of what surgeons say?"



Number  24
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Red Sox fans everywhere are shaking their fists in rage.”
“But cosidering this is the woman who dated Casper Smart for years, we don't think being independently wealthy is high on her list of requirements.”
“In fact, sources close to J-Lo and A-Rod say that we can expect to hear wedding bells in the very near future.”
““Those in J.Lo’s inner circle see her relationship with A-Rod going the distance,” a source close to Lopez and Rodriguez tells Entertainment Tonight.”
““They definitely see marriage potential here.”
“J.Lo loves that they have so much in common," the insider adds.”
“"They’re both parents and they’re both successful in business.”
“Their lives, while busy, really complement each other.”Well, if the source is to be believed it certainly sounds like J-Lo may soon become Mrs. A-Rod.”
“So what is it that has her so enamored with the former Yankee?”
“Many have cited Alex's many professional successes as among the main reasons that Jen is so drawn to him.”


"Red Sox fans all over the country are waving their fists in anger."
"But given that this lady has been with Caspar smart for many years, we don't think that getting rich on her own is her first requirement."
"In fact, sources close to J-Lo and A-Rod say we can look forward to hearing the wedding bell in the near future."
"Those in J.Lo's inner circle see her relationship with A-Rod," a source close to Lopez and Rodriguez told entertainment tonight
"They certainly see the potential for marriage here."
"J.Lo likes that they have so much in common," the person familiar with the matter added
"They're both parents and they're very successful in business."
"Their lives are busy, but they complement each other." Well, if the source is reliable, Luo Guancong will sound like Mrs. lot soon
"So what makes her so infatuated with the former Yankee?"
"A lot of people think that Alex's success in his career is one of the main reasons why Jennifer is so attracted to him."



Number  25
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Whatever makes each of them happy, we’ll fully support.”
“She has such an incredible soul.”
“When celeb couples are this cute, it’s hard to let them go — which is why we’ve got our fingers crossed there’s more in store for Zayn Malik and Gigi Hadid.”
““[They] just lost the romance with each other and wanted to try to be alone.”
“They are going to use this time to see if they should continue to be broken up or get back together down the line.”
“There is still a chance if they end up missing each other.”
“So there is still hope, but they definitely need time away [from each other],” a source close to the couple tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY, following the couple’s confirmation of their breakup on March 13.”
“After rumors ran rampant earlier this morning, Zayn, 25, and Gigi, 22, released separate statements on social media, confirming the heartbreaking split after over two years of dating.”
“Zayn tweeted, “Gigi and I had an incredibly meaningful, loving and fun relationship and I have a huge amount of respect and adoration for Gigi as a woman and a friend.”
“I’m grateful to all of our fans for respecting this difficult decision and our privacy at this time, we wish this news could have come from us first.”


"Whatever makes them happy, we will give them our full support."
"She has an incredible soul."
"When celebrity couples are so cute, it's hard to get them to leave - that's why we pray for more opportunities for zayn Malik and Gigi Hadid."
"(they) just lost their romance and wanted to try to be alone."
"They will use this time to see if they should continue to break up or come back together."
"If they miss each other in the end, there's still a chance."
A source close to the couple told reporters: "so there is still hope, but they definitely need to be away (from each other) for a while." Hollywood Life exclusive report, after the couple confirmed their breakup on March 13
"This morning, after rumors were rampant, Zane, 25, and Gigi, 22, respectively issued statements on social media confirming the breakup of the couple, who had been in love for more than two years."
"My relationship with Gigi is very meaningful, full of love and fun, and as a woman and friend, I have great respect and adoration for Gigi," zayn tweeted
"I'm very grateful to all our fans for respecting this difficult decision and our privacy at this time. We hope that the news will come from us first



Number  26
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““But they are a bad storm and you’d best believe there aren’t any blue skies hovering over them.””
““Bey and Jay are two flawed people who make everyone believe they’re perfect,” spilled a source.”
“The couple also relocated from the Big Apple to a pricey Beverly Hills spread in a bid to shore up their rocky union.”
“Beyonce Gives Birth To Twins With Jay ZAs The ENQUIRER has reported, their marriage has been rocked by a notorious paternity scandal involving a New Jersey man, Rymir Satterthwaite, claiming he is Jay-Z’s love child.”
“The video even ended with Bey flinging her wedding ring to the ground!”
“Beyoncé put the spotlight on her eight-year troubled marriage in a promotional clip for her blockbuster 2016 album, “Lemonade.” Swinging a baseball bat, Beyoncé called out her tycoon husband for multiple affairs.”
“Now, with any ugly love child scandal and endless cheating allegations surrounding Jay-Z, a billion-dollar split appears more likely, insiders said.”
“The 35-year-old singer and hip-hop mogul husband Jay-Z have secretly split twice and were “literally signatures away from a divorce” together, sources told The National ENQUIRER.”
“Megastar Beyoncé is privately trapped in a nightmare marriage!”


"But it's a serious storm, and you'd better believe there's no blue sky hovering over it."
"Bei and Jay are two flawed people who make everyone believe that they are perfect," a source said
"The couple also moved from big apple to an expensive place in Beverly Hills to support their rocky alliance."
Beyonce and Jay ZAS have given birth to twins, and their marriage has been rocked by a notorious parent-child scandal involving a New Jersey man, remille satsvait, claiming he is Jay ZAS' beloved son, inquirer reported
"The video even ends with Bei throwing his wedding ring on the floor!"
"Beyonce focused on her eight years of marriage in her 2016 hit album lemonade. Beyonce is waving a baseball bat, and the tycoon's husband is yelling to deal with a lot of things. "
"Now, with any ugly Aiko scandal and endless fraud charges surrounding Jay-Z, a billion dollar breakup seems more likely," insiders said
"The 35 year old singer and hip-hop tycoon's husband, Jay-Z, have split up secretly twice, and they are" far away from divorce "together," the source told the national inquirer
"Superstar Beyonce fell into a nightmare like marriage in private!"



Number  27
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For him, things are very much over.””
“But those days are over.”
“When Season 11 of his reality show Sister Wives debuted in late 2016, “TLC was less than impressed by the ratings,” an insider revealed, explaining that premiere viewership of 1.8 million “was not enough” for the network.”
““So Kody told them he’d be willing to have the network slash his family’s pay from $180,000 for each adult to $180,000 total if it meant they could make Season 12.”
“He put everything on the line to convince them it could still work.”But, he couldn’t deliver and now his wives are turning on him.”
“They’ve been struggling for the past few years, and Kody’s three “spiritual marriages” have all fizzled out.”
““His only real connection seems to be with [legal wife] Robyn now,” an insider revealed to Life & Style.”
““The other wives have all but given up on him.”
“They mostly see him as an ex-husband who turns up to help with the children.”But, Kody doesn’t want to accept that it’s all coming to an end.”
““He’s been blaming everyone for the current state of the show — except himself,” the insider admitted.”


"For him, it's all over."
"But those days are over."
"When his reality show" wife and sister "premiered at the end of 2016, an insider revealed that" TLC was not very impressed by the ratings. "He explained that the 1.8 million ratings" for the network "was not enough
"So Cody told them that if that meant they could get into season 12, he would let the TV station cut his family's income from $180000 per adult to a total of $180000."
"He put everything aside to make them believe it still works." But he couldn't give birth, and now his wives are betraying him
"They have been struggling for the past few years, and Cody's three" spiritual marriages "have all failed."
"His only real connection now seems to be with (his legitimate wife) Robin," a person familiar with the matter told life and fashion
"Almost all the other wives gave up on him."
"Most of them think he's an ex husband to help with the baby." But Cody didn't want to accept that it was coming to an end
"He has been blaming everyone for the status of the show - except himself," the person familiar with the matter admitted



Number  28
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Back in July 2016, three members of The Spice Girls sparked rumours of a reunion after posting a video which hinted at a possible tour.”
““Getting Victoria to agree has been a coup for everyone involved, given she has always been the person holding back on a reunion,” the source added.”
““As it stands, they will be working together on a series of projects, which will include an album and a TV special celebrating the Spice Girls.”
“Advertisement“The five of them have been locked in secret talks since the summer, and finally they are all on-board for a 2018 reunion,’ a source told The Sun.”
“A new report has claimed that all five original members of The Spice Girls – Mel B, Victoria Beckham, Emma Bunton, Mel C and Geri Halliwell – have been taking part in secret talks about the group’s possible return since the summer, with a 2018 date now agreed for a reunion.”
“The group reunited for a live tour from 2007-08, while they last performed together at the closing ceremony of the 2012 London Olympic Games.”
“The pop group originally formed in 1994, before splitting in 2000 following the recording of three studio albums.”
“The Spice Girls have reportedly agreed to a reunion in 2018 which will see them record both a new album and a one-off TV special.”


"As early as July 2016, three members of the spice girls group released a video suggesting that there might be a tour, which triggered rumors of reunion."
"Getting Victoria to agree with this is a great idea for all concerned, because she has always been a hindrance to the reunion," the source added
"As it stands, they will work on a series of projects, including an album and a TV special to celebrate the spice girls."
A source at "ad" told the sun that the five of them started secret talks this summer, and finally they were all on board for the reunion in 2018
"A new report says that five former members of the spice girls group - Mel B, Victoria Beckham, Emma Bunton, Mel C and Gary harryville - have been in secret talks about the possible return of the group since this summer and have now agreed a date for their reunion in 2018."
"In 2007-08, when they last performed together at the closing ceremony of the 2012 London Olympics, they got together again for a live tour."
The pop band was first founded in 1994 and disbanded in 2000 after recording three studio albums
"It is reported that the two spice girls have agreed to reunite in 2018, when they will record a new album and a one-time TV special."



Number  29
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We are also private people.”Aww, you guys!”
“We have an amazing life which we are very respectful of.”
“But according to a new totally unconfirmed report, Victoria Beckham has been growing increasingly frustrated with hubby David’s new female pal.”
“A so-called insider snitched to The Sun that Victoria, 43, is reportedly not a fan of David’s friend Lady Mary Charteris.”
“Lady Mary’s well-connected!”
“(Credit: FameFlynet)Read more: Duchess of Cambridge shows off her blossoming baby bumpWhy, you ask?”
“Well the source alleged it’s all because Lady Mary loves a good party and Victoria worries about that rubbing off on David, 42.”
“The insider said: “David has spent time partying with Mary at events into the early hours of the morning.”Apparently David was introduced to Lady Mary through his good friend Dave Gardner, who is engaged to Hollywood actress Liv Tyler.”
““Victoria is very worried that she is not the best influence on David,” continued the insider.”
““They met at Glastonbury but Victoria is not fond of her.”Posh ‘n’ Becks have been married since 1999 (Credit: FameFlynet)Oh dear.”


"We are also private." Ah, you guys
"We have an amazing life and we respect it very much."
"But according to a new completely unconfirmed report, Victoria Beckham is increasingly disappointed with her husband David's new girlfriend."
"A so-called insider told the sun that Victoria, 43, is not reported to be a fan of David's friend, Mrs. Mary Chatterley."
"Mrs. Mary is very well connected!"
(source: fame flynet) read more: The Duchess of Cambridge shows off her blooming pimples. Why
"Well, according to the source, it's all because Mrs. Mary likes a good party, and Victoria worries that it will affect David, 42."
"David went to the party with Mary until early in the morning," the person familiar with the matter said Apparently, David was introduced to Mrs. Mary through his good friend, Dave Gardner, who is engaged to Hollywood actress liv Taylor
"Victoria is very worried that her influence on David is not the best," the person familiar with the matter continued
"They met in Glastonbury, but Victoria didn't like her." The bosh Becks have been married since 1999 (source: fame flynet) Oh, my God. "



Number  30
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“II which hits cinemas November 16”
“Robert was much more comfortable chatting about his dog with Ellen than he was during an interview on The Today Show on Wednesday where he deflected questions about whether or not he and Kristen are back together The cast are currently promoting the final instalment of Twilight Breaking Dawn Part...”
“Animal lover Robert Pattinson reveals how his rescue dog became a pampered pooch overnightThere are many reasons to be a fan of Robert Pattinson, but just in case there are people who still need swaying, he has provided another.”
“The Twilight star showed how much of an animal lover he is during an interview on the Ellen DeGeneres which is set to air on Friday.”
“The 26-year-old chatted about his rescue dog Bear to host Ellen – who is also a huge supporter of animal rescue.”
“Scroll down for video Animal lover Robert Pattinson chatted about his rescue dog Bear when he and Taylor Lautner L were interviewed by Ellen DeGeneres Robert revealed that he saved Bear who was five weeks old at the time from a kill shelter in Louisiana the day before he was...”
“...about to be euthanized...”
“And Bear’s life changed in an instant as he went straight from the shelter and onto a private jet to Los Angeles – which Robert revealed is not his ‘way of usual travelling’.”
“Once he landed, Bear was tucking into some fancy meats that he was given by his doting new owner, and Robert joked that he had actually turned into a Hollywood diva dog by accident.”
“Diva dog: The Twilight star revealed that he accidentally spoiled the dog after saving him from a kill shelterLiving the dream: When he arrived at the Four Seasons in Los Angeles Bear was fed prosciutto instead of dog foodHe said: ‘We were staying at the Four Seasons afterwards.”


"II on November 16"
"In an interview on Wednesday's today show, Robert was more comfortable talking about his dog than he was in the interview. In the interview, he dodged questions about whether he and Christine are back together. The actors are currently promoting the final episode of Twilight Breaking Dawn... "
"Animal lover Robert Pattinson revealed that there are many reasons why his rescue dog became a pampered puppy overnight because of a fan Robert Pattinson, but in order to prevent someone who still needs to swing, he offered another one."
"The Twilight star showed how much he loves animals in an interview on Friday's" Ellen DeGeneres. "
"The 26 year old man told the story of his rescue dog bear to the owner, Alan, who is also a huge supporter of animal rescue."
"Rolling down the video of animal lover Robert Pattinson chatting with Taylor Lautner L in an interview with Ellen DeGeneres, Robert revealed that he saved the bear who was five weeks old when he was from a killing shelter in Louisiana the day before he was..."
“… About to be euthanized... "
"Bear's life changed in an instant. He got on a private plane directly from the shelter and flew to Los Angeles - Robert revealed that this was not his" usual way of traveling. "
"As soon as the bear landed, he ate some fancy meat from his beloved new owner. Robert joked that he had become the dog of Hollywood Diva by chance."
"Diva dog: The Twilight star revealed that he accidentally spoiled the dog after he rescued it from the hunting shed. Dream: when he came to the four seasons hotel in Los Angeles, the bear was fed ham instead of dog food. "We stayed at four seasons later," he said



Number  31
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us below!”
“This hasn’t been an easy decision, however, as we part ways, we do so with lots of love and admiration for each other.”HollywoodLifers, are YOU surprised to hear that Nick and Vanessa have called it quits?”
“Here’s why.”
““Nick [Viall] and Vanessa [Grimaldi] never had a chance of actually making it work.”
“They are incredibly different and that was clear from day one.”
“Nick is all about living in LA, being part of the Bachelor scene and making a career in entertainment.”
“That is his focus — not Vanessa,” a source close to the former couple tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“News of Nick and Vanessa’s split emerged earlier today, more than five months after viewers watched their proposal on The Bachelor finale.”
“And after that finale aired, Nick and Vanessa spent a lot of their time together in LA.”
“But she wasn’t happy about that.”


"Tell us next!"
"It was not an easy decision, however, when we separated, we were full of love and admiration for each other." Hollywood stars, are you surprised to hear Nick and Vanessa break up? "
"That's why."
"Nick [Villar] and Vanessa [Grimaldi] never had a chance to really do that."
"There's an amazing difference between them, and it's obvious from the first day."
"Nick wants to live in Los Angeles, become a bachelor and get a career in entertainment."
"That's his point, not Vanessa," a source close to the former couple told reporters
"Nick and Vanessa broke up earlier today, more than five months after the audience saw their proposal in the singles finale."
Nick and Vanessa spent a lot of time in Los Angeles after the last episode
"But she's not happy about it."



Number  32
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I think a few months in I realized, “God, I can’t wait to get to work.”…Anything we had to do with each other, we just found a lot of joy in it together and a lot of real teamwork.”
“‘Because of the film, we ended up being brought together to do all these crazy things, and I think we found this strange friendship and partnership that kind of just suddenly happened.”
“Although Aniston and Theroux are no longer together, the pair said in their joint statement that they intend to continue to foster their ‘cherished friendship’.”
“In a statement released to the Associated Press, they revealed that they had ‘lovingly’ made the decision at the end of 2017 after nearly three years of marriage and roughly seven years as a couple.”
“Jennifer Aniston and Justin Theroux splitJennifer Aniston and Justin Theroux announced their divorce on Thursday.”
“So is Jennifer Aniston getting back together with Brad Pitt?”
“She good,’ a Twitter user under the pseudonym C.Rush shared.”
“Meanwhile she has a yoga body and a Smart Water deal w/ 0 kids in sight.”
“‘Y’all really think Jennifer Aniston about to go sniffing around Brad Pitt when he got 10 kids and an alcohol addiction?”
“The Allied actor, however, has been battling some demons.”


"I think a few months later, I realized, 'my God, I can't wait to go to work'..." No matter what we do with each other, we find a lot of fun together and a lot of real teamwork. "
"Because of this film, we were finally called together to do all these crazy things, and I think we found this strange friendship and partnership, just like it happened all of a sudden."
"Although Aniston and seru are no longer together, they said in a joint statement that they intend to continue to cultivate their" cherished friendship. "
"In a statement to the associated press, they revealed that they made this decision" lovingly "at the end of 2017 after nearly three years and about seven years of marriage."
"Jennifer Aniston and Justin seru broke up. Jennifer Aniston and Justin seru announced their divorce on Thursday."
Is Jennifer Aniston and Brad Pitt back together? "
"She's very good," said a twitter user, alias C. rush
"At the same time, she has a yoga body and a smart water deal, no children in sight."
"Do you really think Jennifer Aniston would sniff around when Brad Pitt had 10 kids and was addicted to alcohol?"
"However, allied actors have been fighting some demons."



Number  33
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“(Besides “illegal business controls America.”)”
“What message do you think Theroux is trying to send here?”
“But this is the first time they’ve ever been photographed together.”
“The Daily Mail points out that Theroux and Plaza have known each other for some time; Theroux appeared on an episode of Plaza’s show Parks and Recreation in 2012.”
“You can see all of that here.”
“He also had a Supreme sticker on his bike.”
“Plaza, 33, was wearing a Barbour jacket with a “March for Our Lives” sticker on the back, and Theroux, 46, was wearing a black Supreme hoodie with the words “illegal business controls America” on the back.”
“The two were spotted walking around downtown on Sunday and going into Theroux’s West Village apartment.”
“The Daily Mail published several photos of Theroux and Plaza together this morning.”
“She must be.”


"(except" illegal business controls the United States. ")
"What do you think Theroux wants to convey here?"
"But this is the first time they've been photographed together."
The daily mail points out that Theroux and plaza have known each other for some time; Theroux appeared in a 2012 program of Plaza, parks and entertainment
"You can see it all here."
"He also has a top sticker on his bike."
"Plaza, 33, is wearing a Barbie jacket with a" March for our lives "label on the back, and Theroux, 46, is wearing a black supreme hoodie with the words" illegal business controls America "on the back."
"They were found walking downtown on two Sundays and walking into the West Village apartment in syrux."
The daily mail published several photos of Theroux and Plaza together this morning
"She must be."



Number  34
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“— Zendaya (@Zendaya) August 12, 2017White Supremacists Well Cared 4 In trump Admin.He’s LOUD N PROUD 2NUKE N.KOREA,But a Girl-Scout Could Have Made MORE MACHO SPEECH ABOUT RIOT — Cher (@cher) August 12, 2017”
“— John Legend (@johnlegend) August 12, 2017It's sad what's going on in Charlottesville.”
“Virginia Governor Terry McAuliffe declared a state of emergency as the violence from the white nationalists' gathering erupted in the small college town.”
“Meanwhile, we've seen people from all different walks of life stand in solidarity in the aftermath of the violence and outright (alt right) hate.”
“From high ranking politicians from both the Republican and Democratic parties, to citizens all across the country who took to the streets to protest, to various celebrities who took to social media, they all had one common message: white supremacy has no place in the United States of America.”
“Check out some of the tweets:Related A timeline of the violence in CharlottesvilleI know there's a lot going on in the world.”
“The best place for me to go today is church, so I don't move with emotions I move with spirit.”
“...pic.twitter.com/fKe4FNpyAB — Diddy (@Diddy) August 13, 2017What's going on in Charlottesville Va is HEARTBREAKING....I refuse to believe that this is the direction that our country is going in.”
“— Kevin Hart (@KevinHart4real) August 12, 2017We have nazi sympathizers and white nationalists in the White House.”
“Condemn them too.”


"- zendaya (@ zendaya) white supremacists were well taken care of in trump on August 12, 2017. He's the noise and pride of North Korea, but a girl scout could have delivered a more macho speech on the riots on August 12, 2017
"- Legend of John (@ johnlegend) what happened in Charlottesville on August 12, 2017 is really sad."
"Virginia Governor Terry McAuliffe declared a state of emergency because of the outbreak of white nationalist violence in this small university town."
"At the same time, we see people from all walks of life united in the aftermath of violence and outright (far right) hatred."
"From top officials of the Republican and democratic parties, to citizens protesting on the streets all over the country, to celebrities on social media, they all share a common message: white supremacy has no place in the United States of America."
"Look at those tweets: the timeline of the Charlottesville violence." I know a lot of things are going on in the world. "
"For me, going to church today is the best place, so I don't go with emotion, I go with spirit."
“... pic.twitter.com/fKe4FNpyAB -What happened on August 13, 2017 in Charlottesville, Virginia, was heartbreaking I refuse to believe that this is the way forward for our country. "
"Kevin Hart (@ Kevin hart4real) on August 12, 2017, we had Nazi sympathizers and white nationalists in the White House."
"Blame them, too."



Number  35
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The actor only has visitation rights to see their children, but all six of them are living with Jolie under one roof.”
“The single mom has joint custody of her kids with Brad Pitt.”
“...gets to spend time with her six children...”
“Last week Radar Online quoted their source Walking around with her shopping cart makes her feel normal again National Enquirer on the other hand wrote Walking around with her shopping cart makes her feel happy But regardless of where Jolie wants to shop the most important thing is that she...”
“Gossip Cop also stressed the fact that there’s no truth to the claims made by the sister sites because even their statements contradicted each other.”
“The trio wanted to buy food at the store, but immediately left Target after they learned that it was no longer available.”
“Meanwhile, Jolie was also spotted at Target with her two kids, Shiloh, and Vivienne in August.”
“She has just completed a series of successful projects, namely, “First They Killed My Father” and “The Breadwinner,” which generated huge sums of money.”
“However, there’s also no truth to such rumors because the actress’ net worth is roughly around $160 million.”
“The tabloid claimed that Jolie has opted to buy discounted items at Target because of her money problems.”


"The actor has only the right to visit his children, but all six of them live under the same roof with Julie."
"This single mother raised her children with Brad Pitt."
“… With her six children... "
"Last week, radar Online quoted their source as saying that it makes her feel normal to walk around with a shopping cart. On the other hand, the national inquirer wrote that it makes her feel happy to walk around with a shopping cart, but no matter where Julie wants to shop, the most important thing is that she..."
"The scandal police also stressed that the statements of sister websites are not true, because their statements are even contradictory."
"The three wanted to buy vegetables in the store, but when they learned that they were out of stock, they immediately left tajit."
Meanwhile, Julie was also found at the target company with her two children, Shiloh and Vivian, in August
"She has just completed a series of successful projects, namely" they killed my father first "and" the breadwinner ", generating huge amounts of money."
"However, such rumors are not true, because the actress's net worth is about $160 million."
"The tabloid claimed that Julie chose to buy discount goods in target because of her financial problems."



Number  36
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That’s something that is really annoying to them.’”
“‘While [the operation] was inevitable, they think her plan to do the nude spread is over the top.”
“Nevertheless, the family have been publicly supportive of her decision to transition, which was completed in January according leaked extracts from her memoir.”
“The headline-making ‘I am Cait’ shoot was said to have taken the Kardashian clan by surprise at the time and led to tension between Jenner and Kim, 36, as a result.”
“Jenner first announced her transition in an interview with Sawyer in April 2015 and revealed her new look in a Vanity Fair spread the following July.”
“Jenner's rep knew nothing about it.”
“DailyMail.com has approached representatives for Jenner and the Kardashians for comment.”
“‘But she says she will do everything in her power to stop the shoot if she can.'”
“‘She knew the surgery was inevitable and it was bound to happen,’ said the source.”
“Kardashian momager Kris, who is said to have known about Jenner’s surgery in advance, has vowed to stop the shoot from going ahead, according to the insider.”


"It's really annoying to them."
"Although (surgery) is inevitable, they think her plans to spread nude are excessive."
"Nevertheless, her family publicly supported her decision, which was completed in January, according to leaked extracts from her memoirs."
"It's said that the headlines of" I'm Cain "surprised the Kardashian family at that time, resulting in tension between Jenner and Kim, 36."
"Jenna first announced her transformation in an interview with Sawyer in April 2015, and exposed her new look in Vanity Fair magazine in July the following year."
"Jenner's representative knew nothing about it."
"The daily mail has contacted representatives of Jenna and Kardashian for advice."
"But she said she would do her best to stop the shooting."
"She knew surgery was inevitable, it was inevitable," the source said
"According to people familiar with the matter, Kardashian's mother, Chris, said she knew Jenna's operation in advance and vowed to stop the filming from continuing."



Number  37
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I wonder if it was his way of saying to [Kris] what I think she was saying to him when she married me: a big f— you,” she wrote.”
“Caitlyn went on to speculate whether part of Robert’s motivation behind defending Simpson was to obtain some form of revenge against his ex-wife Kris Jenner, who was close friends with Brown Simpson.”
“Kim and Kourtney Kardashian travel to Cleveland to visit Khloé Kardashian who spends much of time there with her boyfriend Cavaliers player Tristan Thompson but they re interrupted by a news alert about Caitlyn s then unreleased memoir The Secrets of My Life...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““It says in Caitlyn’s book Robert Kardashian knew O.J.”
“Simpson was guilty, but joined the defense team to get back at his re-married ex,” reads Kim, 36.”
““Robert told Caitlyn in secret after the O.J.”
“...murder trial that he believed his friend was guilty.”“That’s not true!” interrupts Khloé, 33.”
““Like, what?”“Like, to sell a book, you’re gonna make something up?” says Kourtney, 37.”
““Dad so believed in him,” Kim says.”


"I don't know if that's the way he said to [Chris], as I think she said to him when she married me: a big f-you," she wrote
"Caitlin goes on to speculate whether one of Robert's motives in defending Simpson is to take some form of revenge on his ex-wife, Kris Jenner, who is a close friend of brown Simpson."
"Kim and kurtany Kardashian went to Cleveland to visit heloe Kardashian. Kardashian and her boyfriend, Cavaliers player Tristan Thompson, spent a lot of time there, but they were interrupted by a news report about Caitlin's then unpublished memoir, the secret of my life..."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Caitlin's book says Robert Kardashian knew O.J."
Kim, 36, said: "Simpson is guilty, but he joined the defense team in retaliation for his remarried ex-wife."
"After O.J., Robert told Caitlin in secret."
“… A murder trial in which he found his friend guilty. " "That's not true! "Interrupted khlo é, 33."
"For example, what? "For example, if you want to sell books, you have to make something up? Courtney, 37, said
"Dad trusted him very much," Kim said



Number  38
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Humans are humans, and when you connect with somebody on a spiritual level it doesn’t matter.”
“By the way, love is fluid.”The singer added “Whether there’s been rumours with one specific person or not, that’s all that matters.”
“Lovato also had brief flings with Trace Cyrus (Miley’s older brother) in 2009 and Joe Jonas, her self-proclaimed “BFF,” in 2010.”
“According to Pop Sugar, she dated The Cab frontman Alex DeLeon from 2008-09, and later based the breakup song “Catch Me” on him.”
“She’s Had Relationships With Several Male CelebritiesLovato, like most notable celebrities, have dated other people in the industry.”
“— ste(screeching into the wilderness)ph (@stphfrndz) September 11, 20172.”
“The bad news is that it isn't me.”
“...a girlfriend...”
“...miss demi lovato had the biggest upgrade i ve ever seen pic twitter com brbZs8igJW lindsey cryingwithmila September 11 2017 The thought of Demi Lovato having a girlfriend is possible the greatest thing to enter my head keels keeley_cjd September 11 2017 The good news is that Demi Lovato has...”
“...the rest of Twitter s reactions below...”


"People are people, and it doesn't matter when you connect with someone on a spiritual level."
"By the way, love is fluid," the singer added, "whether there are rumors with a particular person, that's all the question."
Lovato also had a brief relationship with tres Cyrus (Miley's brother) and Joe Jonas (she calls herself "BFF") in 2009
According to the pop song sweetheart, she dated taxi leader Alex Draine in 2008-09, and later adapted her Breakup Song catch me based on him
"She has dated several male celebrities. Like most celebrities, Lovato has dated other people in the industry. "
"- ste (screaming into the wilderness) pH (@ stphfrndz) September 11, 20172."
"The bad news is not me."
“… "Girlfriend..."
“… Miss Demi Lovato has the biggest upgrade I've ever seen pic twitter com brbzs8igjw Lindsey cryingwith Mila September 11, 2017 Demi Lovato's idea of having a girlfriend is probably the greatest thing to get into my head keels Keeley September 11, 2017 the good news is that Demi Lovato has... "
“… Other twitter reactions below... "



Number  39
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He just has the blond wig and the pointy ears.””
““Still, that backpacking trip, just having that freedom, was one of the best times in my life,” Kerr recently reflected.”
“During the week I spent in the city no matter what I was doing even something as simple as sitting at a cafe sipping a flat white New Zealand s richer version of a latte I felt a palpable remove...”
“Of the city’s many charms — its burgeoning restaurant scene, its absurdly picturesque scenery, the mellow Kiwi hospitality you experience everywhere you go — it is Wellington’s physical isolation that makes it such a singular place.”
“York 15 from Los Angeles 14 hours from Hong Kong and Tokyo...”
“Wellington or Wellywood as it s been christened since Jackson set up his studio empire in the suburb of Miramar is one of the most remote capitals on the planet some 28 hours by plane from London 23 from New...”
“...that first made Bloom a star a decade ago...”
“She spent the majority of her nonworking time in Wellington New Zealand s capital where her husband Orlando Bloom was filming The Hobbit Peter Jackson s two part prequel to the epic The Lord of the Rings trilogy the films...”
““Ever since, I’ve wanted to get back to New Zealand.”For seven months, beginning last December, Kerr, 29, got her wish.”
“Modeling, for Kerr, has been its own sort of adventure, one she will be the first to acknowledge as a stroke of good fortune not to be taken for granted.”


"He's just wearing a gold wig and pointed ears."
"Still, that backpacking, with that kind of freedom, was one of the best times of my life," Kerr recently reflected
"During the week I spent in the city, no matter what I was doing, or even something as simple as sitting in a cafe sipping a New Zealand latte, I could feel an obvious movement..."
"Among the city's many charms - its emerging restaurant scene, picturesque absurdity, the mellow hospitality of kiwifruit that you can experience everywhere - Wellington's isolated geographical environment makes it such a strange place."
"York 15 14 hours from Los Angeles to Hong Kong and Tokyo..."
"Ever since Jackson established his studio empire in the suburb of Miramar, Wellington or wheelywood has been named as Wellington or wheelywood. It is one of the most remote capitals on earth. It takes about 28 hours by air from London and 23 hours from New York..."
“… Bloom became a star for the first time ten years ago. "
"She spent most of her off-duty time in Wellington, New Zealand, where her husband Orlando Bloom was filming two prequel epic" Lord of the rings "trilogy films by hobbit Peter Jackson..."
"Since then, I've always wanted to go back to New Zealand." In the seven months since last December, Cole, 29, has fulfilled her wish
"For Cole, modeling is an adventure in itself, and she'll be the first to admit that it's a blessing that's not taken for granted."



Number  40
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Stronger together @samasghari ‍♀️‍♀️ A post shared by Britney Spears (@britneyspears) on May 3, 2018 at 1:24pm PDTSo that's how the pop princess gets her insane abs!”
“You just have to watch it to believe it (also their situp kisses are too cute).”
“"Stronger together," Spears wrote in the caption.”
“Whoa!”
“Asghari actually bench presses Spears, and in another crazy move, she does a plank while perched on his back as he's doing pushups.”
“Let's just say that if you attempted this in the gym with your partner, it probably wouldn't go this smoothly.”
“The pop singer and her boyfriend Sam Asghari take hitting the gym together to a whole new level, and prove just how in shape they really are.”
“We thought J-Lo and A-Rod were fitness couple goals ... until we saw this incredible video that Britney Spears just posted on Instagram.”


"Stronger together @ samasghari" ♀️ ‍ ♀️  Britney Spears (@ BritneySpears) shared a post at 1:24 pm on May 3, 2018, which is how the pop princess gets her crazy abs
"All you have to do is look at it and believe it (and their sit ups are so cute)."
"Stronger together," spears wrote in the title
"Wow
"Asgali is actually a bench pressing a spear, and in another crazy move, she made a plank and perched on his back as he did push ups."
"If you and your partner try to do this in the gym, it may not go so well."
"The pop singer and her boyfriend Sam asgali went to the gym to work out to a whole new level, proving how good their bodies are."
"We thought J-Lo and A-Rod were goals from the fitness team... Until we saw this incredible video Britney Spears just released on instagram. "



Number  41
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“In a nearly two hour long interview released on Tuesday with Charlamagne tha God from iHeartRadio sThe Breakfast Club Kanye talks about what led to his rift with JAY Z expressing the disappointment he felt when the 48 year old rapper and his wife Beyonce did not attend his 2014”
“...wedding in Italy to Kim Kardashian West...”
“"I was hurt about them not coming to the wedding.”
“I understand they were going through some things, but if it's family, you're not going to miss a wedding," he says.”
“"I gotta state my truth."”
“"You just start coming up with all types of crazy things in your head," Kanye adds, noting that he started to feel "like the cousin that you can't bring around."”
“When asked if he knows why JAY-Z and Beyonce skipped the nuptials, Kanye says he never asked them.”
“"I'm not sure, I'm past it, but at the time I was hurt about it," he replies.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"On Tuesday, Kanye, the breakfast club, gave a nearly two-hour interview to charlamagne tha God from iHeart radio, talking about the reasons for his discord with jay z, and expressing the disappointment of 48 year old rapper and his wife Beyonce when they didn't attend the wedding in 2014."
“… The wedding of Kim kardashan in Italy... "
"I'm sad that they don't come to the wedding."
"I know they went through something, but if it's family, you won't miss the wedding," he said
"I have to be honest."
"You just start thinking all kinds of crazy things in your head," Kanye added, beginning to feel like "a cousin you can't bring."
"Asked if he knew why Jay-Z and Beyonce didn't attend the wedding, Kanye said he never asked them."
"I'm not sure, I'm past, but I was sad at the time," he replied



**Something goes wrong**
““Lindsay shared her opinions, but it was clear that they are not buying a house together.””
““Ben is looking to buy a family friendly house,” a source previously told PEOPLE in October 2017.”
“Inside Ben Affleck and Jennifer Garner's Divorce on the One-Year Anniversary of Their FilingBen Affleck and Jennifer Garner are moving on with their lives a year after filing.”
“The duo filed to end their 10-year marriage on April 13, 2016, nearly two years after they originally announced their split.”
“The divorce isn’t yet finalized but is progressing, sources have said, as the two have been in mediation with leading L.A. divorce lawyer Laura Wasser to settle privately.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Since then, they have continued to happily co-parent their three children, Violet, 12, Seraphina, 9, and Samuel, 6, and spent Easter weekend together with them in Hawaii, where Affleck has been shooting his new movie Triple Frontier.”
““They’re doing well, and are both committed to providing a supportive environment for their kids,” a source close to Affleck tells PEOPLE.”
““They continue to remain cordial to one another.”
“There is a lot of love and respect there.”Image zoom Credit: Pascal Le Segretain/Getty; The day before the holiday, the whole family made a group trip to Sea Life Park in Oahu.”


"Lindsay agrees with her, but it's clear they didn't buy together."
"I was going to buy a house suitable for families," a source told people in October 2017
"On the first anniversary of Ben Affleck and Jennifer Garner's divorce, Ben Affleck and Jennifer Garner continue their lives after a year of divorce."
"They applied to end their 10-year marriage on April 13, 2016, nearly two years after they first announced their separation."
"The divorce has not yet been finalized, but it is in progress, the source said, because the two have been mediating with Laura Wasser, a famous divorce lawyer in Los Angeles, to make a private settlement."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Since then, they have continued to happily raise their three children, violet, 12, Serafina, 9, and Samuel, 6, and spend the Easter weekend with them in Hawaii, where Affleck has been filming his new film triple borders
"They do a good job and are committed to providing a supportive environment for their children," a source close to Affleck told people
"They continue to have a friendly relationship."
"It's full of love and respect." Photo source: Pascal Le segreat / Getty; the day before the festival, the family went to the marine life park in Oahu



Number  43
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Click here to upload yours.”
“We pay for videos too.”
“Neri was previously married to Grammy Award-winning composer Osvaldo Golijov.”
“6 Neri was previously married to Grammy Award-winning composer Osvaldo Golijov Credit: Getty"Their friendship has not turned into romance … as both are cautious and this is, again, more of a professional friendship, but Brad is very interested in spending more time with Neri, she is fascinating."”
“This is best described as a professional friendship.'”
“They said: "Brad and Neri instantly hit it off because they share the same passion for architecture, design and art.”
“While Brad and Neri's relationship isn't a full blown romance just yet, a source told Page Six there is definitely potential there.”
“Brad launched the foundation in the aftermath of Hurricane Katrina, and its efforts have since moved from beyond New Orleans to countries around the world.”
“...and builds affordable and energy efficient homes for communities in need...”
“6 Neri s expertise in environmental design made her the ideal candidate to work with Brad whose foundation creates energy efficient homes Credit Getty Images Getty 6 Brad is known for his interest in architecture founding the Make It Right Foundation in 2007 Credit Getty Images Getty The charity designs...”


"Click here to upload your."
"We also pay for video."
"Neri was married to Grammy winning composer Oswaldo golihoff."
"Six years ago, Neri married Grammy award-winning composer Oswaldo golihov. Credit: Getty "their friendship didn't turn into romance It's more like a professional friendship because both of them are cautious, but Brad is very interested in spending more time with Neri. She's very charming
"This is the best professional friendship."
"Brad and Nelly are the same at first sight because they share a passion for architecture, design and art," they said
"Although Brad and Nelly's relationship is not over yet, a source told sixth edition that their relationship does have potential."
Brad launched the foundation after Hurricane Katrina, and its efforts have moved from New Orleans to countries around the world.
“…… And build affordable energy-efficient housing for communities in need... "
"6 Neri's expertise in environmental design makes her an ideal partner with Brad. Brad's foundation created energy-efficient housing. " Image of Getty 6. Brad is known for his interest in architecture, creating the right foundation for "2007 credit Getty image Getty charity design.".



Number  44
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Not Letting Body-Shaming Affect Her[Featured Image by Nicholas Hunt/Getty Images for imPRint]”
“Mariah Carey Allegedly Forcing Children Into Spotlight Against Will: Diva’s Parenting Skills QuestionedMariah Carey: Star Has Skinny Mirrors All Over Her House?”
“That’s the sensational claim that’s been made in an article by Star Magazine.”
“Apparently, Carey is so upset about her weight gain that she refuses to let Tanaka see her unless she’s fully clothed and made up.”
“But Gossip Cop, a site that’s well known for debunking celebrity rumors, is claiming that the story is nothing but fake news.”
“As Gossip Cop reports, Star Magazine has alleged that Mariah Carey gained 60 pounds during the summer and she has been hiding her body from her backup dancer-turned-boyfriend.”
““Bryan has told Mariah that he loves her no matter what she weighs, but Mimi still won’t let him see her without clothes on,” their reported insider said.”
“The article goes on to say that Mariah has had special mirrors and lighting installed in her home which make her look thinner than she really is.”
“She has reportedly done this because she thinks that making changes to her home would be easier than changing her body.”
“But Gossip Cop contacted Mariah’s press rep who has denied that these rumors are true.”


"Don't let physical humiliation affect her."
Mariah Carey is accused of breaking her will and forcing her children into the spotlight: the heroine's parenting skills are questioned Mariah Carey: are thin mirrors all over the star's house
"This is a sensational statement put forward by star magazine in an article."
"It's clear that Kelly is very upset about her weight gain and refuses to let Tanaka see her unless she's dressed and put on makeup."
"But the gossip police website, known for debunking celebrity rumors, claims that the story is just fake news."
Mariah Carey, who gained 60 pounds in the summer, has been hiding her body from her backup dancer boyfriend, according to star magazine, gossip police reported
"Brian told Maria that he loved her no matter how heavy she was, but Mimi still wouldn't let him see her undressed," according to reports, people familiar with the matter said
"The article goes on to say that Maria has installed special mirrors and lighting in her home, which makes her look thinner than she really is."
"It's reported that she did it because she thought it was easier to change her home than her body."
"But gossip police contacted Maria's press representative, who denied the rumors were true."



Number  45
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Of course our hearts go out to the brave women who have told their stories,” Guthrie said.”
““We know he’s working on his family, we know that for sure.”
“...in touch with his former colleagues on the morning news program...”
““Yeah, we keep in touch with him,” Hoda Kotb, who replaced Lauer as co-anchor alongside Savannah Guthrie, told The Hollywood Reporter for its 35 Most Powerful People in New York Media 2018 issue.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Image zoom Credit: Peter Kramer/NBC/NBC NewsWire/Getty“I mean look, this is one of those complex situations,” admitted Kotb, 53, who received a congratulatory text from Lauer when she was named co-anchor in early January.”
““I’ve known him since I started working at NBC [in 1998].”
“When I was sick with breast cancer, he was the first to call.”
“He helps and helped in ways that … you know, he was incredible in that way.”Though Kotb has fond memories of Lauer, 60, she isn’t discounting the stories of the women who came forward and accused the previous NBC anchor of sexual misconduct.”
““There is that Matt and then there’s the Matt that the accusers speak of.”


"We certainly sympathize with the brave women who have told their stories," Guthrie said
"We know he's supporting his family, and we're sure of that."
“…… Contact his former colleagues in the morning paper program... "
"Yes, we've been in touch with him," Hoda Kotb told Hollywood Reporter in the first issue of the 35 most power people in New York media 2018, replacing Raul as Savannah Guthrie's co anchor
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Photo scaling credit: Peter Kramer / NBC / NBC Newswire / Getty" I mean, it's a complicated situation to admit that Kotb, 53, who received a congratulatory text message from Raul when she was appointed co anchor in early January
"I've known him since I started working at NBC (1998)," he said
"He was the first to call when I had breast cancer."
"He helped a lot of people You know, he's incredible. " Despite her fond memories of 60 year old Raul, Kotb does not deny the stories of women who have come forward to accuse former NBC anchors of sexual misconduct
"There's that Matt, and there's Matt the plaintiff mentioned."



Number  46
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The publication says they’d like to marry “as soon as this summer” in theHamptons because she wants to be “in nature and near the water when she says ‘I do.’” For how Carino proposed and all about her ring, see what Lady Gaga’s rep reveals to Gossip Cop.”
“Lady Gaga and Christian Carino are already “scouting wedding locations,” reports Life & Style.”
“For the exclusive on the amazing home she’s buying, see what a Swift confidante leaks to Gossip Cop.”
“The publication notes the singer loves Alwyn, London, and being able to “fly under the radar there” without having to deal with the paparazzi.”
“Taylor Swift is moving to London to be closer to her British boyfriend Joe Alwyn, reports OK!.”
“For inside details about his proposal and their upcoming wedding, see what Rodriguez’s rep admits to Gossip Cop.”
“The magazine reports Lopez’s “fairy tale” wedding will cost $3 million and will likely take place at the Palace of Versailles.”
“Alex Rodriguez proposed to Jennifer Lopez recently in Paris, and now the singer’s in full wedding planning mode, reveals In Touch.”
“For the one object he’s surprisingly keeping, see what a Pitt pal tells Gossip Cop.”
“The magazine notes the mementos are “antiques, artwork and jewelry,” including a $50,000 gold watch Jolie gave him on their first wedding anniversary.”


"The magazine says they want to get married in Hampton" as soon as this summer, "because she wants to be" in nature, close to the water when she says' I do. '" "About how carrino proposed and her ring, see what Lady Gaga's representative revealed to the gossip police."
"Lady Gaga and Christian Carino are already" looking for a wedding location, "life & Style reports
"An exclusive report on the amazing house she's going to buy. See what a quick confidant reveals to the gossip police."
The magazine noted that the singer loved London's Alvin and was able to "fly under the radar there" without having to deal with paparazzi
Taylor Swift will move to London to be closer to her British boyfriend Joe Alvin, according to reports
"For the inside details of Rodriguez's proposal and their upcoming wedding, see what Rodriguez's representative admitted to the gossip police."
The magazine reported that Lopez's "fairy tale" wedding will cost $3 million and is likely to be held at Versailles Palace
"Alex Rodriguez recently proposed to Jennifer Lopez in Paris, and now the singer is in a comprehensive wedding planning mode, revealing that he is in contact."
"For one of his surprisingly reserved objects, look at what a friend of Pete's said to the gossip police."
According to the magazine, the souvenirs are "antiques, works of art and jewelry," including a $50000 gold watch that Julie gave him on their first wedding anniversary



Number  47
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More bio…”
“The main reason for their fight is said to be Jake’s attitude after he got other roles.”
“Is it because of Zooey’s pregnancy mood swings?”
“Share thisActors Zooey Deschanel and Jake Johnson are feuding on the sets of the TV series New Girl.”
“The show had to pay the price because of their fight.”
“Zooey and Jake’s quarrel gets heavy for the showOne of their co-stars says that,“can’t stand each other”So Jake and Zooey are not in good terms with each other and because of their behavior, it is affecting in the drama series as well.”
“Thus the TRP of the show is going low.”
“The producers of the show are having a headache because of the actors.”
“Relationship between Jess and Nick also lead the show to sufferIn the finale of the fourth season of New Girl, there is a reunion between the characters of Jake Johnson and Zooey Deschanel.”
“But the actors’ are not ready to patch up.”


"More creatures..."
"It is said that the main reason for their quarrel is Jack's attitude after he gets other roles."
"Is it because Zoe's mood swings when she's pregnant?"
"To share that, actors Zoe Deschamps and Jack Johnson are at odds on the set of the TV series new girl."
"Because of their fight, the performance has to pay the price."
"The quarrel between Zoe and Jack became very fierce because of the play. One of their partners said," I can't stand each other. "So the relationship between Jack and Zoe is not very good because of their behavior, which also affects the series."
"As a result, the Trp of the show is going down."
"Because of the actors, the producers of the show have a headache."
"The relationship between Jesse and Nick also affects the ending of the fourth season of the new girl, the reunion of the roles of Jack Johnson and Zoe Deschamps."
"But the actors are not ready to fix it."



Number  48
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“At all events, Breathe is an affecting account of the quiet courage needed to battle the deadly spores of discrimination and condescension that came with polio.”
“There is a chilling scene in which Cavendish and his friends are taken to see a facility in Germany that turns out to be some Kubrickian living morgue white brightly lit with patients entombed in state of the art medical...”
“But you have to give Breathe time to let its charm and its heartfelt decency grow on you.”
“The film is about an important figure in the history of how we think about and respect disabled people – the wheelchair-use pioneer and polio survivor Robin Cavendish (whose son Jonathan is the movie’s producer).”
“Andy Serkis makes his debut as director, working from a robust screenplay by William Nicholson.”
“Andrew Garfield plays Cavendish a rather dashing fellow in the 1950s who zooms around the place in his sports car and plays a splendid game of cricket hitting a six that breaks the teacups set out by the clubhouse and...”
“...roguishly calling out Sorry He spots a beautiful young woman among the spectators Diana Blacker played by Claire Foy...”
“It’s love at first sight, and marriage soon afterwards, and then a rather memsahib-like existence for her in Kenya (pronounced Keen-ya) because Cavendish is a “tea broker” there.”
“But then one day Cavendish feels faint and collapses he has polio is paralysed from the neck down and after he is brought back to England the medical establishment curtly tells Diana not to expect her husband to live any...”
“...more than a few months and only as a prostrate patient who must be passive and obedient...”


"In any case, breath is a touching work about the calm courage needed to fight the deadly spores of discrimination and condescension brought about by poliomyelitis."
"There is a gruesome scene in which Cavendish and his friends are taken to a facility in Germany, where there used to be living mortuaries of some kubrians. Under the bright light, patients are buried in the most advanced medical equipment..."
"But you have to give yourself a little time to breathe and let its charm and its inner dignity grow on you."
"The film tells us how we see and respect an important figure in the history of disabled people - Robin Cavendish, a pioneer wheelchair user and polio survivor (whose son Jonathan is the producer of the film)
Andy selkis made his debut as a director. His play was directed by William Nicholson
"Andrew Garfield's Cavendish is a pretty cool guy in the 1950s. He drives around the place in a sports car, plays a wonderful cricket game, plays a six-point ball, breaks the tea cup in the club, and then..."
“…… Jokingly shouting sorry, he found a beautiful young woman in the audience, Diana black played by Claire foy... "
"It was love at first sight, and soon after she got married, she lived a life similar to Memsahib in Kenya (pronounced keen ya), where Cavendish was the 'tea broker'"
"But then one day Cavendish felt dizzy and fainted. He suffered from polio and paralysis below the neck. After he was brought back to England, the medical institution told Diana briefly not to expect her husband to live..."
“…… For more than a few months, as a prone patient, he must passively obey... "



Number  49
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It features a diamond from Botswana accompanied by two smaller diamonds from Diana’s jewelry collection, which the Prince said he wanted to include “to make sure she’s with us on this crazy journey together.”CNN’s Judith Vonberg contributed to this article.”
“Harry and Markle first met for a drink in July 2016 on a blind date, brokered by a mutual friend, whose name they would not reveal, but “it was definitely a setup,” Markle said in the interview.”
“The pair, who will get married in St. George’s Chapel at Windsor Castle, announced their engagement in November.”
“On that occasion, Harry told reporters that he knew Markle was “the one” from “the very first time we met.”PHOTO: Chris Jackson/Getty Images Prince Harry and Meghan Markle announce their engagement to the press.”
“The couple attended their first royal event together in the city of Nottingham earlier this month, where they were met by well-wishers.”
“On Wednesday it was revealed that they will spend their first Christmas as an engaged couple with Queen Elizabeth and other members of Britain’s royal family at the Sandringham royal estate.”
“PHOTO: Jeremy Selwyn/WPA Pool/Getty ImagesPHOTO: Christopher Furlong/Getty Images Harry and Markle meet well-wishers in Nottingham during their first royal event together earlier this month.”
“The couple will live in Nottingham Cottage in the grounds of London’s Kensington Palace, the official residence of the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge.”
“The couple opened up for the first time about their relationship in an interview last month when Harry told the BBC that his late mother, Princess Diana, would have been “over the moon” about the pair’s engagement.”
“A second date was followed by a camping trip to Botswana.”


It features a diamond from Botswana and two smaller diamonds from Diana's jewelry collection. The prince said he wanted to include these diamonds "to make sure she was on a crazy journey with us." Judith von Berg of CNN wrote for this article
"Harry and markel first met for a drink at a blind date in July 2016, mediated by a mutual friend. They didn't want to reveal each other's name, but," markel said in an interview, "it's definitely a trap."
The two will be married at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle and will announce their engagement in November
"At that time, Harry told reporters that he knew that markel was the" one "in" our first meeting. " Photo: Chris Jackson / Getty Images Prince Harry and Megan markel announce their engagement to the media. "
Earlier this month, the couple attended their first royal event in Nottingham, where they were blessed
"It was reported on Wednesday that they would spend the first Christmas after their engagement with Queen Elizabeth and other members of the British royal family at Sandringham Royal estate."
"Photo: Jeremy selwin / WPA pool / Getty im agesPHOTO:Christopher Furlong/Getty -Earlier this month, Harry and Marcel met the benefactor at their first royal event in Nottingham
The couple will live in Nottingham house at Kensington Palace in London, the official residence of the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge
"Last month, Harry told the BBC that his late mother, Princess Diana, would be very upset about their engagement, and the couple made their relationship public for the first time in an interview."
"After the second date, I went camping in Botswana."



Number  50
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“Gomez Goes To Rehab As Friends Fear Another Drug RelapseSelena's Hell!”
“Gomez Goes To Rehab As Friends Fear Another Drug Relapse Justin Bieber footing the bill for her party lifestyle!”
“Selena Gomez checked into a treatment center, and RadarOnline.com has the exclusive details about her latest rehab stint.”
“Justin Bieber’s 25-year-old girlfriend spent the last two weeks of January in a New York area treatment center and a source explained that those close to her were afraid of a drug relapse.”
““Selena’s inner circle is afraid she is back on drugs and racing toward a breakdown,” the insider told Radar.”
“The singer’s party lifestyle was enabled by her boyfriend, the informant claimed.”
““The label just gave her another huge advance which, mixed with Justin’s resources — he’s covering her security and transportation — has led to some pretty heavy partying…even for her.”Gomez cut off her mother, Mandy Teefey, in the middle of her latest breakdown.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"Gomez went to rehab because his friends were worried about a relapse in Selena's hell!"
"Gomez went to rehab because her friends were worried that Justin Bieber would take drugs again and pay for her party life!"
Selena Gomez is in a treatment center RadarOnline.com The website has exclusive details of her recent drug treatment. "
"Justin Bieber's 25-year-old girlfriend spent the last two weeks of January at a New York area treatment center, and a source explained that people around her were afraid of drug relapses."
"Selena's inner circle is worried that she's on drugs again and is about to collapse," people familiar with the matter told radar
"The singer's party lifestyle was driven by her boyfriend, the source claimed
"This label gave her another huge step forward, and Justin's resources - he was responsible for her safety and transportation - led to some pretty heavy parties Even for her Gomez cut off her mother, Mandy Tiffany, in her recent collapse



Number  51
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hey, maybe since the two have been spending nearly every night together on tour, this was a surprise for them too!”
“This close succession of pregnancies seems to have fans confused, especially since Bey is currently on a joint tour with hubby Jay-Z and has live shows lined up for months to come!”
“The singer’s fans seem convinced she is once again expecting!”
“See their tweets on the matter and Beyonce’s slim-fitting bodysuit below!”
“During a July 15 performance in Paris, France, Beyoncé, 36, was absolutely glowing!”
“The singer looked phenomenal as she took to the stage in a chic white bodysuit, and a pair of denim shorts.”
“Over her shoulders she slung a colorful sequin jacket, as she effortlessly danced around the stage.”
“Despite this – fans were completely convinced: Bey is preggers again, and they were not afraid to let their opinions be heard.”
“Members of the Beyhive did NOT hesitate on calling their queen out via social media.”
“In a series of tweets, fans demanded the singer to come clean about her potential baby news.”


"Hey, maybe because they're touring together almost every night, it's a surprise for them too!"
"This series of pregnancies seems to confuse fans, especially because Beibei is currently on a joint tour with her husband Jay-Z, and there will be live performances in the next few months!"
"Fans seem to believe she's looking forward to it again!"
"Take a look at their microblog about it and Beyonce's one-piece suit below!"
"Beyonce, 36, was absolutely brilliant at a performance in Paris, France on July 15!"
The singer appeared on stage in a chic white tights and denim shorts and looked great
She hung a colorful sequined jacket on her shoulder and danced on the stage with ease
"Nevertheless, the fans are totally convinced that Bei is pregnant again and they are not afraid to let their opinions be heard."
"The members of beehive did not hesitate to call out their queen through social media."
"On a series of tweets, fans asked the singer to confess her potential baby news."



Number  52
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This report is similar to the one earlier this year that stated Katie Holmes and Jamie Foxx were spotted strolling along the beach hand-in-hand in Malibu.”
“The couple was also seen walking along the beach while Foxx had his arm around the beauty.”
“The action star has steadily starred in film after film, yet has been at the center of several dating rumors.”
“As the International Business Times reports, “The actor was mistakenly linked to an Australian journalist and then was associated to his Mission: Impossible 6 co-star and Crown actress Vanessa Kirby.”All rumors until now have been stamped out as false.”
“However, the latest claims include those stating that members of the Church of Scientology have once again been playing matchmaker for the Top Gun star and that Cruise has reportedly been secretly dating over the past little while.”
“Interestingly enough, Tom has reportedly been using a disguise to enjoy dates with the ladies, much like Katie Holmes did in the initial stages of her romance with Jamie Foxx.”
“A source told the publication about Cruise’s tactics to keep his love life out of the spotlight.”
““Tom’s back on the dating scene, but nobody knows it’s him.”
“His face is way too recognizable for him to stroll into the bars, so he has his makeup artist create a silicone mask.”
“Seems like Tom took his Mission: Impossible role to heart.”


"This report is similar to a report earlier this year that said Katie Holmes and Jamie fox were found walking hand in hand on the beach in Malibu."
"The couple were also seen walking along the beach while Fox was holding a beautiful woman."
"The action star has made steady appearances in film after film, but has been the center of several dating rumors."
As the International Business Times reported, "the actor was mistakenly associated with an Australian journalist and then with his mission: crown actress Vanessa Kirby, CO star of impossible 6." So far, all the rumors have been considered false
"However, the latest claims include those claiming that members of the Church of Scientology are once again playing matchmaker's number one star and cruise is said to have been secretly dating for some time in the past."
"Interestingly, it is reported that Tom has been using disguise to enjoy dating with women, just as Katie Holmes did in the early days of her romance with Jamie fox."
"A source told the Wall Street Journal that cruise had taken some strategies to keep his love life out of the spotlight."
"Tom started dating again, but no one knew it was him."
"His face was so recognizable that he couldn't walk into the bar, so he asked the makeup artist to make a silicone mask."
"Tom seems to have taken his mission: the impossible role to heart."



Number  53
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Craig Barritt/Getty Images]”
“...of the ABC dance competition...”
“Dancing With the Stars is in the process of putting together the list of contestants for the next show, and reportedly, former Today show host Billy Bush wants to do whatever he has to do to be on that list, even if that means taking a pay cut.”
“Since he was fired from Today, Bush has not had a job, and allegedly took a killing on his New York City townhouse he bought when he thought he’d be moving to New York for Today.”
“DWTS has been the place that stars go to either take a victory lap, or say they are sorry through dance, says the Inquisitr.”
“Billy Bush left Today with many of his co-workers angry with him, after a video was released of him palling around with Donald Trump, talking about grabbing women against their will, and what you can do when you are entitled.”
“Just after his exit, DWTS was showing interest in Bush, but at the time, his agent brushed them off, perhaps assuming that other offers would come rolling in, but they haven’t.”
“‘Desperate’ Billy Bush Begging To Be Cast On ‘DWTS’ https://t.co/CPQNpIXobq via @radar_online — Wackymoe (@wackymoe) February 10, 2017Radar Online is saying that “disgraced former Today show host” Billy Bush is desperate to salvage what is left of his career with a spot on DWTS.”
“A production insider associated with DWTS says that Bush is begging to be on the cast of DWTS Season 24 RELATED REPORTS BY INQUISITR Billy Bush Today Show Colleagues Comment On His Suspension The Real Reason The Today Show And NBC Won t Be Taking Billy Billy Bush Lawyer Says...”
“Bush s Career May Have Ended In 2005 If He Dancing With The Stars Assumes Billy Bush Is Done Wants Him To And Billy Bush supposedly is willing to do whatever he needs to do to get a spot on the cast...”


"[Craig Barrett / Getty pictures]
“… ABC dance competition
"Dancing with stars is sorting out the list of contestants for the next show, and it is reported that former" Today Show "host Billy Bush wants to do whatever he has to do to get on the list, even if it means a pay cut."
Bush has been unemployed since he was fired today. It is said that he bought a villa in New York City. At that time, he thought he would move to New York today
"DWT has always been a place for stars to go, and they either circle around the victory or dance to express their apologies," the prosecutor said
"When Billy Bush left today, many of his colleagues were angry with him because after a video was released, he was with Donald Trump talking about catching women against their will and what you have the right to do."
"Just after he quit, DWTS showed interest in Bush, but at that time, his agent rejected them. Maybe he thought there would be other offers, but they didn't."
"Desperate Billy Bush asks to join DWTS https://t.co/CPQNpIXobq Through @ radar_ Online wackymoe (@ wackymoe) on February 10, 2017, radar online said that "disgraceful former today show host" Billy Bush desperate to save the rest of his career and take a place in DWTS
"A production insider associated with DWTS said that Bush asked to join the cast of DWTS season 24, and a colleague of" Today Show "commented on his suspension. The real reason why" Today Show "and NBC didn't accept" Billy Bush "said the lawyer
"Bush's career may come to an end in 2005. If he dances with stars, assuming that Billy Bush wants him to do something, Billy Bush should be willing to do whatever he needs to do in order to get an actor's position..."



**Something goes wrong**
“They’ll just have to settle for slugging some of that Vitamin water she endorses.”
“A lot of happily attached women would love a taste of that healthy carefree life.”
“Credit: Glenn Harris / PR PhotosBoth Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston have films out that premiere at the Toronto Film Festival later this month, and US is breathlessly reporting that the ex husband and wife might run into each other – gasp!”
“Aniston , Pitt and his girlfriend Angelina Jolie were sort-of supposed to meet at a charity dinner they were all listed as co-hosting during the Oscars in February.”
“Aniston went to the event for an hour, but Pitt and Jolie were no-shows, which wasn’t surprising as there were 10 other hosts listed and not all of them came to the event.”
“Brad and Angelina went to the Independent Spirit Awards instead, where Angelina first showed off her pregnant belly in a tight black dress.”
“Now exes Brad and Jennifer, who split up in January, 2005 after four and a half years of marriage, might see each other again at this film festival.”
“I’m sure they’ll be cordial to each other if they end up even speaking.”
“Maybe someone behind the scenes will work to ensure they don’t cross paths though:Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston could reunite at this year’s Toronto International Film Festival, when the exes are debuting their new flicks just two days apart.”
“Pitt, 44, is among the stars who will walk the red carpet gala at the festival for the North American premiere of his Coen Brothers’ flick Burn After Reading on Sept. 5.”


"They can only be content to drink some vitamin water that she supports."
"Many women who are attached to happiness will like a healthy and carefree life."
Credit: Glen Harris / PR photo Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston both have films premiering at the Toronto Film Festival later this month, while the United States is panting for reports that ex husband and ex-wife may collide - gasp
Aniston, Pitt and his girlfriend Angelina Jolie, who were supposed to meet at a charity dinner, were all co hosts of the February Oscars
"Aniston went to the event for an hour, but Pete and Julie didn't attend, which is not surprising, because there are still 10 hosts on the list, and not all of them came to the event."
Brad and Angelina went to the independent spirit award, and Angelina showed her pregnant belly for the first time in a tight black dress
"Now, Brad and Jennifer, who split up in January 2005 after four and a half years of marriage, may meet again at this festival."
"I'm sure they'll be very friendly if they end up talking."
"Maybe someone behind the scenes will try to make sure they don't get into trouble, but Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston may be reunited at this year's Toronto International Film Festival, when the two ex girlfriends will premiere their new film two days apart."
Pitt, 44, will attend the North American Premiere of the Cohen brothers' movie burning after reading on September 5



Number  55
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Follow Be on Facebook, Twitter, Pinterest, Tumblr and Instagram...”
“Send it to tips@yahoo7.com.auWant more celebrity, entertainment and lifestyle news?”
“Got a story tip?”
“Despite claims the pair were "married in Missouri" recently and him also being romantically linked to Neri, the actor has remained tight-lipped on his true relationship status.”
“Source: Instagram / camenzinoNews surrounding the dad-of-six's love life has been rife with speculation, with many fans hoping his divorce from Angelina Jolie would result in him reuniting with his former wife, Jen.”
“Brad Pitt and Neri Oxman have also been rumoured to be dating.”
“While there has been no word on the truth of the claims, Be has reached out to Brad's people.”
“Source: GettyThe alleged affair happened around January when Brad was "enjoying the single life" and it was then that he and met the woman in her twenties who says their encounter has resulted in her getting pregnant.”
“Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston had reportedly becomeAngelina and Brad, pictured here in 2015, announced their separation in September 2016.”
“Apparently, she's saying that they didn't use protection and he never left her a way of getting in touch, which is why she's come forward," an insider told the mag.”


"Follow Facebook, twitter, pinterest, Tumblr and instagram..."
"Send it to me tips@yahoo7.com.auWant More celebrity, entertainment and life news? "
"Any news?"
Despite claims that the two were recently "married in Missouri" and that he has a romantic connection with neili, the actor has been tight lipped about his true emotional state
"Source: instagram / camenzinonews has been full of speculation about the love life of the father of six, and many fans hope that his divorce from Angelina Jolie will reunite him with his ex-wife, Jennifer."
"Brad Pitt and nery Oxman have also been rumored to be dating."
"Although there is no information about the truth of these claims, Bei has contacted Brad's people."
"Source: Getty's so-called extramarital affair happened around January when Brad was" enjoying a single life "when he met the 20-year-old woman, who said their experience led to her pregnancy
"Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston are reported to have become Angelina. This photo was taken in 2015, and Brad announced his separation in September 2016."
"Obviously, she said they didn't use protection and he never gave her a way to contact, which is why she came forward," an insider told the magazine



Number  56
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
““It would be the ultimate revenge romance!”We pay for juicy info!”
“He’s like a younger, hotter Brad and she’s confessed to a couple of girlfriends that she’d be up for a fling with him,” a source said.”
““Angie’s incredibly flattered and enjoying Garrett’s attention.”
“But insiders said Hedlund and Jolie have shared an electric chemistry since she cast him in her 2014 drama Unbroken.”
“PHOTOS: Angelina Jolie Takes Shiloh Christmas Shopping Amid Divorce CrisisIronically, Hedlund’s first big-screen role was with Jolie’s ex, Brad Pitt, in 2004’s Troy.”
““It’s Garrett who’s making all the moves!”The blue-eyed hunk dated actress Kirsten Dunst for four years after they met on the set of 2012’s On the Road.”
““It’s gone from exchanging the odd email to texting several times a day and planning to meet up for dinner,” revealed a source.”
“Sources close to the 42-year-old single mom told RadarOnline.com that friends think she and Hedlund, 33, are a perfect match!”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"This will be the ultimate revenge romance! "We pay for interesting information!"
"He's like a younger, hotter Brad, who has admitted to several girlfriends that she'll play with him," a source said
"Angie is flattered and enjoys Garrett's attention."
"But according to people familiar with the matter, helende and Julie have had a common electrochemical reaction since they starred in uninterrupted in 2014."
"Photo: Angelina Jolie takes Shiloh to Christmas shopping during the divorce crisis. Hedron's first big screen role was with Julie's ex girlfriend Brad Pitt in 2004's "Troy."
"All the movements are made by Garrett! "The blue eyed man dated actress Kirsten Dunst for four years, and they met in" on the road "in 2012
"It's gone from texting several times a day to planning to get together for dinner," a source said
Sources close to the 42 year old single mother told reporters RadarOnline.com Website friends think she and 33 year old helende are a perfect couple



Number  57
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““The problem is she comes across as someone completely out of touch — and selfish!””
““It’s driving everyone crazy, but she’s trying to find something to cling to right now — and her mother’s heritage is it,” spilled another tipster.”
“While those in Angie’s camp are sympathetic, they’re also annoyed with her new linguistic preference because most of them don’t speak the language — and don’t plan on learning it anytime soon!”
““But this French thing, it’s all about trying to feel close to her late mother.”Angelina Jolie Divorce Crisis — Down To 77 Lbs!”
““Angie is extremely sentimental at the moment — meeting up with her estranged dad after years is proof of that,” disclosed a confidant.”
“...fluent in the language as well...”
“A snitch told The National ENQUIRER the 41 year old mother of six whose maternal grandfather was French Canadian has become obsessed with all things French and has made sure the children she shares with her ex Brad Pitt are...”
“Angelina Jolie is going back to her roots — and demanding everyone around her speak French!”


"The problem is that she gives the impression that she's totally unrealistic - and selfish!"
"It drives everyone crazy, but now she's trying to find something to cling to - and that's her mother's tradition," another informant said
"While Angie's camp sympathizes with her, they are also annoyed by her new language preference because most of them don't speak it - and don't plan to learn it soon!"
"But this French thing is all about being close to her late mother." Angelina Jolie is facing divorce crisis - weight down to 77 pounds
"Angie is very sentimental now - as evidenced by meeting her estranged father years later," one confidant revealed
“… The language is also fluent... "
"An informant told the National Enquirer that the 41 year old mother had six children, her grandfather was French Canadian, she was obsessed with all French things, and made sure that the child she shared with former Brad Pitt was..."
"Angelina Jolie wants to go back to her roots - and ask everyone around her to speak French!"



**Something goes wrong**
“Earlier this month, sources close to the couple told PEOPLE exclusively the duo are planning a long-term future together.”
““So much for my attempted photobomb,” he captioned the photo, adding the hashtags #HiMyName IsAlex and #TrustMeIAmBackThere.”
“He also showed off a selfie of Lopez — who appears to be makeup-free — and joked about being “blocked” in the photo.”
“Rodriguez also shared his own festive photos on Instagram, posting a cute photo (taken by Lynda) of the couple lounging next to their Christmas tree.”
““Hot!” replies the athlete-turned entrepreneur, 42, as Lopez pans around the home’s yard to show off the sunny weather.”
““So this is what Christmas Eve in Miami’s like, huh?” she asks the retired baseball star in the video.”
“...with ex Cynthia Scurtis lounging in the pool...”
“Image zoom Credit Lynda Lopez Instagram Image zoom Jennifer Lopez Alex Rodriguez and Family Credit Jennifer Lopez Instagram The Shades of Blue star also gave fans a peek at their holiday feast decor in a video she posted showing A Rod who s dad to Natasha 13 and Ella 9”
“MERRY CHRISTMAS,” wrote Lopez, who co-parents her twins with ex-husband Marc Anthony.”
““Hope everyone had a peaceful Christmas full of joy and laughter, surrounded by all your loved ones… sending everyone lots of love and good wishes for this holiday season!!!!”


"Earlier this month, according to people familiar with the matter, the two are planning a long-term future."
"That's the end of my photo bomb attempt," he says, adding "himyname isalex" and "trustmeiambackthere" under the title of the photo
"He also showed a self portrait of Lopez - Lopez seems to have no makeup - and joked that he was" banned "in the photo."
"Rodriguez also shared his own festive photos on instagram, posting a lovely picture (taken by Linda) of the couple lying lazily beside the Christmas tree."
"Hot! The 42 year old entrepreneur, an athlete, replied that Lopez was walking around the yard of his home, showing off the sunny weather
So this is Christmas Eve in Miami, right? "She asked retired baseball stars in the video."
“… Former Cynthia scutti is lying in the pool... "
"Image zooming credit Lynda Lopez instagram image zooming Jennifer Lopez Alex Rodriguez and family credit Jennifer Lopez instagram the shadows of blue star also let fans see their festival decoration in a video she released, showing a rod who is the father of Natasha 13 and Ella 9."
"Merry Christmas," Lopez wrote, adding that she and her ex husband Mark Antony were co parents of the twins
"I hope everyone has a safe Christmas full of joy and laughter, surrounded by all your relatives Send infinite love and good wishes to everyone in this festival!! "



Number  59
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It's not confirmed whether it was Margot's role, but it certainly looks that way as there aren't that many female parts in the movie.”
“"It shows that if you don't get something… it might lead to something else," she said.”
“She also had no trouble finding a silver lining about being passed over.”
“Olivia insisted the woman who beat her out for the part did a great job: "I thought she kicked so much ass in that movie."”
“"And then I found out later they actually said old."”
“...she continued.”
“I didn't get the part but I'm a very sophisticated person.'"”
“I like that feedback.”
“I thought, 'oh, that sounds nice.”
“"The funniest thing I heard recently was, I heard that I was too sophisticated [for the part].”


"It's not sure if it's Margot's character, but it looks like it is because there aren't so many female characters in the film."
"It shows that if you don't get something It could lead to something else. "
"She also effortlessly found a glimmer of hope to be surpassed."
Olivia insisted that the woman who beat her to the role did a good job: "I thought she kicked so many ass in that movie."
"I found out later that what they said was actually old."
“…… She continued
"I didn't get the part, but I'm a very sophisticated person."
"I like the feedback."
"I thought," Oh, that sounds good. "
"The most interesting thing I've heard recently is that I've heard that I'm too experienced."



Number  60
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“Gomez Goes To Rehab As Friends Fear Another Drug RelapseSelena's Hell!”
“Gomez Goes To Rehab As Friends Fear Another Drug Relapse Justin Bieber footing the bill for her party lifestyle!”
“Selena Gomez checked into a treatment center, and RadarOnline.com has the exclusive details about her latest rehab stint.”
“Justin Bieber’s 25-year-old girlfriend spent the last two weeks of January in a New York area treatment center and a source explained that those close to her were afraid of a drug relapse.”
““Selena’s inner circle is afraid she is back on drugs and racing toward a breakdown,” the insider told Radar.”
“The singer’s party lifestyle was enabled by her boyfriend, the informant claimed.”
““The label just gave her another huge advance which, mixed with Justin’s resources — he’s covering her security and transportation — has led to some pretty heavy partying…even for her.”Gomez cut off her mother, Mandy Teefey, in the middle of her latest breakdown.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"Gomez went to rehab because his friends were worried about a relapse in Selena's hell!"
"Gomez went to rehab because her friends were worried that Justin Bieber would take drugs again and pay for her party life!"
Selena Gomez is in a treatment center RadarOnline.com The website has exclusive details of her recent drug treatment. "
"Justin Bieber's 25-year-old girlfriend spent the last two weeks of January at a New York area treatment center, and a source explained that people around her were afraid of drug relapses."
"Selena's inner circle is worried that she's on drugs again and is about to collapse," people familiar with the matter told radar
"The singer's party lifestyle was driven by her boyfriend, the source claimed
"This label gave her another huge step forward, and Justin's resources - he was responsible for her safety and transportation - led to some pretty heavy parties Even for her Gomez cut off her mother, Mandy Tiffany, in her recent collapse



Number  61
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“These people are not messing around.”
“Not content to take Swift's denial at face value, Kanye fans have decided to strike back against the pop star, and they're planning their own event for Nov. 10.”
“Larry Busacca/Getty Images The INSIDER Summary:Kanye West fans are convinced Taylor Swift's album release date purposely coincides with the 10th anniversary of Kanye West's mother's death.”
“In response to the date, Kanye fans took to the r/Kanye subreddit to plan "Hey Mama" day.”
“The plan is to repeatedly stream a singular Kanye song on that date in order to steal the potential top spot from Swift.”
“Around 2,200 fans have declared interest in the event so far.”
“Taylor Swift has done everything she can to rattle cages with her new single, "Look What You Made Me Do," but not everything she's done so far has been welcomed with open arms.”
“A big discovery was made shortly after she announced when her next album would be released — it coincided with the 10th anniversary of Kanye West's mother passing away.”
“Though Swift was, well, swift to deny any intent to antagonize Kanye with the drop date, she has resorted to all sorts of petty moves in the past.”
“Her discontent with Kanye runs deep, from award show embarrassments to his infamous, "I made that b---h famous" line on "Famous," so she has the motivation to attack him and his family if she wants to.”


"These people are not for fun."
"Not content to accept Swift's denial on the surface, Kanye's fans have decided to fight back against the pop star. They plan to hold their own event on November 10."
"Inside summary of Larry busaka / Getty Images: Kanye West fans are convinced that Taylor Swift's album release date deliberately coincides with the 10th anniversary of Kanye West's mother's death."
"In response to this date, Kanye fans have planned a" Hey mom "day on the R / Kanye sub website."
"Our plan is to play a single over and over again on this day in order to win the potential championship from swift."
"So far, about 2200 fans have announced their interest in the event."
"Taylor Swift does everything she can to upset cage with her new single look what you made me do, but so far, what she has done has not been warmly welcomed."
"Shortly after she announced the release of her next album, there was a big discovery - it coincided with the 10th anniversary of Kanye West's mother's death."
"Although swift quickly denied any intention of hostile relations with Kanye, she has taken various small actions in the past."
She was deeply dissatisfied with Kanye, from the embarrassment of the award ceremony to his infamous line "I made b --- h famous", so she had a motive to attack him and his family, if she wanted to



Number  62
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More From In TouchBeyoncé's Twins Experienced the Ultimate Diva Delivery, Obviously (EXCLUSIVE)Beyoncé Had a “Harder Time” With This Pregnancy, Source ClaimsBeyoncé's Security Team Conducted Trial Runs for Twins' Birth (EXCLUSIVE)”
““She is fearful that he’ll show up uninvited like he did with [their five-year-old daughter] Blue.”
“Beyoncé gave birth to twins — a boy and a girl — on Monday, June 12, but the delivery didn't go as smoothly as she and husband JAY-Z had planned.”
“Despite conducting trial runs with her security team, the day was chaotic — In Touch exclusively learned.”
“"There was a lot of drama, specifically with the Knowles family,” says a source.”
“"Beyoncé made it clear that she wanted this day to run smoothly, but her family just did not listen."”
“MORE: Beyoncé and JAY-Z's Twins Are Still in the Hospital After Suffering "Minor" Medical IssueThe superstar, who stayed at UCLA Medical Center with her twins following an unspecified health issue, was reportedly furious.”
“"This was supposed to be one of the most touching and beautiful days of her life," adds the source.”
“"But Beyoncé was so stressed out because of all the fighting."”
“Bey's estranged father, Mathew Knowles, was one of the day's biggest stressors.”


"More twins from touchbeyonc é experienced the final Diva delivery, and it is clear that (exclusive) Beyonc é had a" hard time "in this pregnancy. The safety team from claims Beyonc é conducted a trial run (exclusive) for the birth of twins."
"She was worried that he would come uninvited, just like he did to (their five-year-old daughter) blue."
"Beyonce gave birth to twins, a man and a woman, on Monday, June 12, but the delivery was not as smooth as she and her husband Jay-Z planned."
"Despite the trial run with her security team, the day was still a mess - totally in contact."
"There's a lot of drama, especially with the Knowles family," one source said
"Beyonce made it clear that she wanted the day to go well, but her family just didn't listen."
More information: Beyonce and Jay's twins are still in hospital after experiencing "minor" medical problems. The superstar was at UCLA Medical Center with her twins because of an unknown health problem, and she was reported to be very angry
"It should be one of the most touching and beautiful days of her life," the source added
"But Beyonce was under a lot of pressure because of the fight."
"Beth's estranged father, Matthew Knowles, was one of the biggest stressors of the day."



Number  63
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We don't doubt that fans will support his decision no matter what.”
“Zayn is also desperate to get better.”
“The former One Direction singer struggles with anxiety and has suffered panic attacks due to the pressure of performing in front of large crowds.”
“Gigi worries about Zayn and wants him to take a step back from his music and focus on his mental health for awhile, but sources tell Life & Style that Zayn isn't sure that would be best for him.”
“MORE: Gigi Hadid Didn't Always Plan on Being a Model — Instead, She Wanted to Play Sports in College!”
““Gigi suggested to Zayn that he needs to take a year off to focus on himself and that he should just quit touring,” the source reveals.”
“"The panic attacks are so severe that Zayn can barely breathe or move."”
“But, it's not just Gigi who is concerned about the extreme anxiety.”
“The "Pillowtalk" singer has tried acupuncture and therapy but nothing has helped him get rid of the attacks.”
“"I know those who suffer anxiety will understand and I hope those who don't can empathize with my situation."”


"We have no doubt that the fans will support his decision
"Zane is also very eager to be better."
"The former singer is struggling with anxiety, suffering from panic attacks due to the pressure to perform in front of a large audience."
"Gigi is worried about zayn and wants him to take a step back from music and pay attention to his mental health for a while, but a source told life & style that zayn is not sure it is the best for him."
"More: Gigi Hadid doesn't always want to be a model - instead, she wants to play sports in college!"
"Gigi suggested to Zane that he need a year off to focus on himself and that he should stop touring," the source said
"Panic attacks are so severe that Zahn can hardly breathe or move."
"But it's not just Gigi who's worried about extreme anxiety."
The "pillow talk" singer has tried acupuncture and treatment, but nothing can help him get rid of these attacks
"I know those who are anxious will understand, and I hope those who are not will understand my situation."



Number  64
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Mehera Bonner Contributor Mehera Bonner is a news writer who focuses on celebrities and royals— follow her on InstagramThis content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Angelina Jolie has officially moved on from her relationship with Brad Pitt—and she's dating a regular dude (AKA not an actor).”
“More specifically, she's dating a handsome older man who sells homes for a living.”
“"Brad and Angie are both very secretive about their dating life.”
“Angie has told some friends she isn't ready to date, but she has been seeing a handsome, older-looking man who is a real estate agent," a source tells ET.”
“"He isn't a celebrity or high profile in any way."”
“Brad and Angie before their breakup.”
“Getty ImagesThe source explains that "Angie was in a very bad place" after splitting from Brad in September 2016, and that "just having another adult to spend time with has been helpful."”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Mehera Bonner writer Mehera Bonner is a news writer who follows celebrities and royalty - follows her on instagram. This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported into this page to help users provide their email addresses."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"Angelina Jolie has officially said goodbye to her relationship with Brad Pitt and is dating an ordinary man (that is, she's not an actress)."
"More specifically, she dated a handsome old man who made a living selling a house."
"Brad and Angie are very secretive about their dating lives."
"Angie told some friends she wasn't ready for a date, but she had seen a handsome, older looking man who was a real estate agent," a source told et
"He's not a celebrity, he's not a high profile."
"Before Brad and Angie broke up"
"Getty Images sources explained that after breaking up with Brad in September 2016," Angie is in a very bad situation "and" it helps to have another adult together. "



Number  65
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Gammill also brought up the point of Karrueche never reporting any of the alleged behavior to authorities.”
“Karrueche told Gammill she never planned to return the rings because they were hers.”
“Chris Brown's attorney, David Gammill, grilled Karrueche on cross-examination, and pressed her on allegedly taunting Chris about the rings by saying she had sold them.”
“Karrueche also testified that Chris had beaten her before.”
“She says he also once wrote "Imma kill blood" under a photo of her and actor Michael B. Jordan.”
“She claims he also texted her more violent threats like ... "I can get my money back and I'm tired of playing games" as well as "Bitch I will beat the s**t out of you" and "I promise you I will make your life hell."”
“I m out in public I m going to ban you from all events...”
“Karrueche explained that in text messages between herself and Chris post breakup he would say things like I m not being nice to you no more if I see you out in public again and I m there I will make you hate me even more don t be anywhere...”
“When she refused ... Karrueche says Chris became aggressive.”
“Karrueche took the stand Thursday in her restraining order case against Chris, telling a judge after she broke up with the singer ... he demanded diamond rings he bought for her to be returned.”


"Kamir also mentioned that karuche has never reported any alleged acts to the authorities."
"Karuche told gamir that she never intended to return the rings because they were hers."
Chris Brown's lawyer, David GAMIL, made a mockery of him by questioning karuche and forcing her to say that she had sold the ring
"Karuche also testified that Chris had beaten her before."
She said he also wrote "ima killed" under a photo of her and actor Michael Jordan
"She claimed that he also texted her more violent threats, such as..." I can get my money back, I'm tired of playing games, "and" bitch, I'm going to beat your ass "and" I promise I'll make your life hell. "
"I will forbid you to take part in any activities in public..."
"Karuche explained that in the text message between her and Chris after the break-up, he would say that I am no longer good to you. If I see you in public again and I am there, I will make you hate me more. Don't be anywhere..."
"When she refused... Karuche said Chris became aggressive
"Karuche testified in the restraining order against Chris on Thursday and told the judge after she broke up with the singer... He asked for the diamond ring he had bought for her



Number  66
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Now, it seems like he's taking the time to do that.”
“"He is focused on two of the most important things he should be focused on, and those are his children and his work," the source said, adding that Pitt is “in a great place personally and professionally….”
“That's not due to any actual action on his own part; it's wading through all of the rumors.”
“One of those rumors was centered around his relationship with the Massachusetts Institute of Technology professor Neri Oxman, which began in April.”
“As it turns out, though, Pitt is allegedly still single and relishing that fact.”
“"He has gone on dates but he’s not looking to leap into a serious relationship at the moment," a source close to Pitt told Entertainment Tonight.”
“"He is content on his own and enjoys the quality time he spends with the children when he isn’t working."”
“Instead of spending time on his love life Pitt has apparently been putting all of his energy into parenting the six children he shares with Jolie as well as his career which includes a starring role in Quentin Tarantino s...”
“Once Upon a Time in Hollywood...”
“Being a father is his number one job, and he knows that.”


"Now, he seems to be taking the time to do it."
"He focuses on the two most important things, that is his children and his work," the source said, adding that Pete is "in a great place, personal and professional..."
"It's not because he's taken any action himself; it's because he's been through all the rumors."
"One of the rumors revolves around his relationship with Neri Oxman, a professor at MIT, which began in April this year."
"But it turns out that Pete is still said to be single and enjoys the fact."
A source close to Pitt told Entertainment Tonight: "he's already dated, but he doesn't intend to jump into a serious relationship at the moment."
"He's content with himself and enjoys being with his children when he's not working."
"Pete obviously didn't spend his time on his love life, but devoted all his energy to raising the six children he and Julie shared, and his career, including playing the leading role in Quentin Tarantino's films..."
"Once upon a time in Hollywood..."
"Being a father is his first job, and he knows that."



Number  67
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Contributing: Maria Puente, Andrea Mandell...”
“Attempts to reach Jolie's representative were not successful.”
“"LAPD is not handling any report or allegations into child abuse against Brad Pitt," spokeswoman Officer Jenny Houser told USA TODAY in a statement on Thursday.”
“Angelina Jolie files for divorce from Brad PittThe Los Angeles Police Department is so far not investigating.”
“Pitt and Jolie have six children: Maddox, 15, Pax, 12, Zahara, 11, Shiloh, 10, and twins Vivienne and Knox, 8.”
“People and TMZ both note that Jolie and at least some of the couple's other children were present at the time.”
“People.com reports that Pitt is accused of getting verbally abusive with one of couple's kids, as well as getting physical while the family was on their private plane.”
“Brangelina split, Day 2: What we know nowIn divorce documents, Jolie listed the couple's date of separation as the following day, Sept. 15.”
““The FBI is continuing to gather facts and will evaluate whether an investigation at the federal level will be pursued,” FBI spokeswoman Laura Eimiller said in a statement emailed to USA TODAY.”
“Child abuse claims help poison Brangelina divorceTMZ says the case was referred over to the FBI on Thursday due to the fact that the alleged incident happened in the air while the family was on a plane from France last Wednesday.”


"Contributors: Maria Puente, Andrea Mandel..."
"The attempt to contact Julie's agent failed."
"The LAPD has not dealt with any reports or charges of child abuse by Brad Pitt," spokesman Jenny Hauser told USA today in a statement on Thursday
"Angelina Jolie filed a divorce petition with Brad Pitt, and the LAPD has not yet investigated it."
Peter and Julie have six children: Maddox, 15, parks, 12, Zahara, 11, Shiloh, 10, and twins Vivian and Knox, 8
"People and TMZ noticed that Julie and at least some of the couple's other children were there."
"People's Daily reported that Pitt was accused of abusing one of the couple's children and physically attacking his family while they were on a private plane
"Brangelina broke up the next day: as far as we know, Julie listed the couple's separation date as the next day in the divorce documents, that is, September 15."
"The FBI is continuing to collect facts and will assess whether the investigation at the federal level will continue," FBI spokesman Laura Emile said in an email to the United States today in a statement
"The child abuse charges helped poison the family of Brangelina divorcetmz, who said the case was handed over to the FBI on Thursday because the alleged incident took place in the air while the family was flying from France on Wednesday."



Number  68
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And scroll through the gallery below for a look back at Brangelina’s cutest quotes about each other.”
“But there is simply no reasoning with Angie on the issue.”For more on the couple’s split, pick up the latest issue of Life & Style, on newsstands now!”
“As Life & Style previously reported, “There’s no evidence the kids are in any danger with Brad, so a judge has no reason to deny him joint custody.”
“Our Newsletter...”
“One key individual in her camp even threatened to quit because she failed to recognize that after the FBI and DCFS had cleared Brad there just weren t any grounds for her to get sole custody of the kids MORE Never Miss a Life Style Exclusive by Signing up for...”
“Some of them don’t like her campaign against Brad,” the source shares.”
“They are fighting.”
““There are huge disagreements between members of her team.”
“While the Allied star continues to soar, those in the 41-year-old humanitarian’s corner are starting to turn against her.”
“Brad in November at his first red carpet since the divorce announcement.”


"Browse the gallery below and review the most adorable quotes of brengelina to each other."
"But on this issue, Angie has no reason at all." to learn more about the couple's breakup, check out the latest issue of life & style at the newsstand! "
As life and fashion previously reported, "there is no evidence that the children and Brad are in any danger, so the judge has no reason to deny that he has joint custody."
"Our communications..."
"One of her key figures even threatened to resign because she didn't realize that after Brad was approved by the FBI and DCFS, she had no reason to get separate custody of the children, let alone miss a way of life, by signing up..."
"Some of them didn't like her campaign against Brad," the source said
"They're fighting."
"There are huge differences among her team members."
"As the Allied star continued to take off, 41 year old humanitarians began to oppose her."
"Brad was on the red carpet for the first time since he announced his divorce last November."



Number  69
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It's so hard.… I just don't want to hurt her."”
“It's really hard to fix wounds like that.”
“News), but the attraction was growing.”
“By the time a pal was characterizing their coupling as "more than just a fling" in early 2016, Bieber was reaching for the right words to define it as well.”
“You see, he'd learned a bit from his rollercoaster romance with Gomez.”
“He wasn't going to recklessly dive into this union, hands in the air.”
“Though he described the Drop the Mic host as "someone I really love" in his February 2016 GQ profile, he was careful not to label the connection they shared.”
“"I don't want to put anyone in a position where they feel like I'm only theirs, only to be hurt in the end," he shared.”
“"Right now in my life, I don't want to be held down by anything.”
“I already have a lot that I have to commit to.”


"It's hard I just don't want to hurt her. "
"It's really hard to repair a wound like this."
"News"), but the appeal is growing. "
"In early 2016, when a friend described their relationship as" more than just an indulgence, "Bieber was also looking for the right words to define their relationship."
"You see, he learned something from his roller coaster relationship with Gomez."
"He didn't want to jump into the league with his hands up in the air."
"Although he described the drop the mic host as" someone I really love "in his February 2016 GQ profile, he was careful not to mark the connection they shared."
"I don't want anyone to feel like I'm just theirs and get hurt," he said
"Now in my life, I don't want to be bound by anything."
"I've got a lot to do."



**Something goes wrong**
“1 scripted telecast of 2009 and Disney Channel's second most-viewed film premiere after High School Musical 2.”
“The film premiered to an audience of 11.4 million viewers becoming cable's No.”
“Selena Gomez began auditioning for various roles, meeting Demi Lovato during an audition for Barney and Friends.”
“Selena Gomez gained her interest in the entertainment industry as she watched her mother doing the stage shows.”
“Selena Gomez was very close to her grandparents as they had always taken care of her while her parents finished their schools and they were always there for her till Selena Gomez got her success.”
“Selena Gomez Age: 25 YearsSelena Gomez said that her mother was strong and brave to have given her birth at the age of 16 and also had done 3 jobs and also sacrificed her life for her.”
“I'm terrified of what I would have become if I'd stayed in Texas."”
“Gomez stated, "I was frustrated that my parents weren't together, and never saw the light at the end of the tunnel where my mom was working hard to provide a better life for me.”
“Selena Gomez and her mother frequently walked through the local dollar store so that they could go and have some spaghetti for dinner.”
“Her mother was 16 years old when Selena Gomez was born and her mother had to face a lot of troubles growing her up and doing things.”


"The script of a 2009 TV series was broadcast and the premiere of Disney Channel's second most watched movie after High School Musical 2."
"The movie premiered with 11.4 million viewers and became the number one person on cable TV."
"Selena Gomez started auditioning for various roles and met Demi Lovato in Barney's audition with friends."
"Selena Gomez became interested in the entertainment industry by watching her mother play on stage."
"Serena Gomez is very close to her grandparents because they have been taking care of her, and her parents have finished school, and they have been there to support her until Serena Gomez succeeds."
"Serena Gomez age: 25 years old Serena Gomez said her mother was strong and brave, gave birth to a child at the age of 16, did three jobs and sacrificed her life for her."
"I'm afraid of what I'll be like if I stay in Texas."
"I'm frustrated that my parents are not together, and I've never seen my mother try to provide me with the light at the end of the tunnel for a better life," Gomez said
"Serena Gomez and her mother often go to the local dollar store so they can have some spaghetti for dinner."
"When Selena Gomez was born, her mother was only 16 years old. Her mother had to face a lot of troubles when she grew up and did things."



**Something goes wrong**
“Photo: Dimitrios Kambouris/Getty Images...”
““I mean I stopped everything except boozing when I started my family.”
“A new report claiming the “Fury” actor has been leaning on his girlfriend to help him stay clean amid his struggle with alcohol abuse is false.”
“A source close to the actor told Gossip Cop Oxman isn’t involved in that aspect of his life.”
“The RadarOnline article alleges the MIT professor “has been a great influence” on the actor and is “extremely supportive” of his sobriety.”
““She is about as straight-laced as they come… Neri is a firm believer that people should not put anything into their bodies that does not belong,” a “source” told the site.”
“Pitt first admitted he gave up alcohol during a 2017 interview with GQ.”
“The actor revealed he was an avid drinker and smoker for more than half his life but was motivated to stop following his divorce.”
“But even this last year, you know—things I wasn't dealing with.”
“The actor is reportedly expected to spend his summer in Los Angeles to be closer to them as he and the actress hammer out a divorce settlement.”


"Photo: Dimitrios cumbrics / Getty pictures..."
"I mean, when I started my family, I stopped everything except drinking."
A new report claims that the "angry" actor has been relying on his girlfriend to keep him clean in his fight against alcoholism, which is wrong
"A source close to the actor told gossip police officer Oxman that he was not involved in this aspect of life."
According to the article on radaronline, the MIT professor "has a great influence" on the actor and "strongly supports" him
One "source" told the site: "she's as straight as they were when they came Neili firmly believes that people should not put anything that does not belong to them into their bodies. "
"Pete admitted to abstinence for the first time in an interview with GQ in 2017."
"The actor revealed that he had been a heavy drinker and smoker for most of his life, but after the divorce, he had the motivation to stop smoking."
"But even last year, you know what I didn't deal with."
"It's reported that the actor will spend the summer in Los Angeles in order to get closer to them because he and the actress are finalizing a divorce agreement."



Number  72
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Harry asked for her hand on the phone and I said: 'You are a gentleman, promise me you will never raise your hand against my daughter and of course I will grant you my permission. "'”
“He told ITV he was "doing much better" and that he regretted missing the big event.”
“Thomas Markle told broadcaster ITV on Monday that he had several phone conversations with Harry, including one in which the prince asked for permission to marry his daughter.”
“Markle said Mr. Trump was discussed at least once: "Our conversation was I was complaining about not liking Donald Trump, he said 'give Donald Trump a chance'.”
“I sort of disagreed with that."”
“Markle said he also asked his future son-in-law about Britain's 2016 decision to leave the European Union and got the impression Harry is comfortable with Brexit.”
“"I think he was open to the experiment," Markle said.”
“Harry's press office declined to comment on Markle's televised interview, which could raise eyebrows because senior royal figures are scrupulously careful not to comment publicly on domestic or international political affairs.”
“Markle, who had been scheduled to walk his daughter down the aisle, missed the royal wedding in May due to heart problems.”
“The 73 year old Markle who watched the wedding from California says he was very proud but that the unfortunate thing for me now is I m a footnote in one of the greatest moments in history rather than the...”


"Harry asked for her hand on the phone and I said," you're a gentleman. Promise me you'll never raise your hand to my daughter. Of course I'll promise you. "
He told ITV he "did a lot better" and regretted missing the event
Thomas markel told ITV on Monday that he had several phone conversations with Harry, one of which was the prince's request for permission to marry his daughter
Trump has been discussed at least once, markel said. "Our conversation is that I'm complaining that I don't like Donald Trump, and he says," give Donald Trump a chance. "
"I disagree a little bit."
"Markel said he also asked his future son-in-law about Britain's decision to leave the European Union in 2016 and got the impression that Harry was satisfied with brexit."
"I think he's open to experimentation," markel said
"Harry's press office refused to comment on markel's TV interview, which could cause a stir, because the top royal officials are cautious and do not comment publicly on domestic or international political affairs."
"Markel originally planned to accompany her daughter in the aisle, but missed the royal wedding in May due to heart problems."
"Marcel, 73, watched the wedding from California and said he was very proud, but now unfortunately for me, I'm a footnote to one of the greatest moments in history, not..."



Number  73
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"And now, anyone looking at them can tell they are absolutely smack bang in the middle, they are infatuated, they are at the lust stage, they are that wonderful stage everyone wants to stay at."”
“Ms Cox told Express.co.uk: “They got married right in the middle of the honeymoon period when your brain is just flooded by love and sexual hormones and your judgement is completely skew.”
“The Duke and Duchess of Sussex were married on May 19 in a romantic ceremony at St George’s Chapel in Windsor Castle – less than two years after it is rumoured the pair met in the summer of 2016.”
“Speaking in an exclusive interview with the Express.co.uk, Tracey Cox, a body language and relationships expert and TV presenter, claimed the Meghan and Harry are still getting to know each other two months after marriage.”
“You can unsubscribe at any time.”
“Our Privacy Notice explains more about how we use your data, and your rights.”
“Sometimes they'll include recommendations for other related newsletters or services we offer.”
“When you subscribe we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters.”


"Now, anyone who looks at them can see that they are absolutely a" pop "in the middle, they are obsessed, they are in the stage of desire, they are the wonderful stage everyone wants to stay in."
"They got married during their honeymoon, when your brain was just flooded with love and sex hormones, and your judgment was completely distorted," Ms. Cox told the express company
"The Duke and Duchess of Sussex had a romantic wedding on May 19 at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle - the couple, according to legend, met less than two years in the summer of 2016."
"In an exclusive interview with the Wall Street Journal, Tracey Cox, an expert on body language and human relations at the express company and a TV host, said Megan and Harry were still getting to know each other two months after their marriage
"You can unsubscribe at any time."
"Our privacy statement explains in detail how we use your data and your rights."
"Sometimes it includes suggestions for other relevant newsletters or services we provide."
"When you subscribe, we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters."



Number  74
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“MORE : Justin Theroux is ‘just friends’ with Aubrey Plaza after Jennifer Aniston splitMORE : Brad Pitt is ‘quietly dating’ as he has ‘secret meeting’ with Jennifer Aniston...”
“Since his split from wife Jen – after the two got married in a secret ceremony in 2015 – Justin has also been linked to artist Petra Collins and actress Aubrey Plaza.”
“Justin Theroux looked to have been hitting the gym big time when he was spotted with a couple tickets to the gun show.”
“While we’re sure he wasn’t banking on being spotted, as he headed out with a companion on a coffee date last week in New York, there was no going incognito when you’re sporting biceps the size of the Big Apple.”
“One could say he’s simply living.his.best.life.”
“The Tropic Thunder star grinned and joked around as he walked his bike around the city with an aptly-described ‘mystery brunette’.”
“Justin strode alongside a pal (picture: The Mega Agency)The 42-year-old could have worn a tidy turtleneck to disguise said guns, but instead he proudly showed them off in an Eazy-E tank.”
“AdvertisementAdvertisementStandard.”
“While there s much speculation about the dating life of the producer and writer following his split with wife Jennifer Aniston and of her s too equality all eyes were on those bulging muscles as we all quickly scheduled a lunchtime yoga session following by a weights class just to...”
“...try and emulate some sort of tone to mimic Justin s...”


"More: after Jennifer Aniston simplimore, Justin seru and Aubrey square are" just friends ": Brad Pitt are" quietly dating "because of his" secret meeting "with Jennifer Aniston..."
"Since Justin broke up with his wife Jane - after their secret wedding in 2015 - Justin has also been associated with artist Petra Collins and actress Aubrey Plaza."
"When Justin serrux was found with a few tickets to the gun show, he seemed to have been having a good time in the gym."
"While we're sure he didn't expect to be found out, he didn't go anonymous last week when he went out for a coffee date with a partner in New York and you exercised biceps the size of a big apple."
"It can be said that he just lived the best" life. "
"The tropical thunder star grinned, joking and cycling around the city with a proper" mysterious brunette. "
"Justin strode by a friend (photo source: big brokerage) the 42 year old could have worn a neat turtleneck to camouflage a gun, but he was proud to show off in an Eazy-E tank."
"Advertising standards."
"There's a lot of speculation about this producer and writer's dating life after breaking up with his wife, Jennifer Aniston, and that she's too egalitarian, but all eyes are focused on those bulging muscles, because we all quickly arranged a yoga class at lunchtime and then a weight lifting class, just to..."
“… Try to imitate Justin's tone... "



Number  75
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Tell us how you feel about all this!”
““She’s like the world’s best wingman.” You can listen below:HollywoodLifers, are you shocked that Taylor isn’t angry about Ed’s admission?”
““No, she encouraged it!” Ed said.”
“Finally, he also told Howard Stern that Taylor wasn’t upset when he dated her friends.”
“Oh, my!”
““It was very easy…I would often find myself in situations just kind of waking up and looking over and being like, ‘How the f*ck did that happen?’ ” the “Shape Of You” singer told the outlet.”
“As we previously learned from his news explosive interview with the music mag, Ed’s Red Tour with Taylor was “his most romantically prolific period”, and he hooked up with more than one of Taylor’s squad.”
““She respects Ed and believes that he handled it like an adult.” There you have it!”
““Taylor is not mad nor does she feel disrespected in any way,” our source also shares.”
“Well, fair enough!”


"Tell us how you feel about it all!"
"She's like the best wingman in the world." You can listen to the picture below: Holly bug, are you shocked that Tyler is not angry at Ed's admission? "
"No, she encouraged me! "Said ed
"Finally, he told Howard Stern that Taylor wasn't angry when he dated her friend."
"Oh, my God!"
"It's simple I often find myself in a situation where when I wake up, I look at myself and say, "how did this happen? "Your shape" singer told the media
"As we learned from his explosive interviews with music magazines, Ed's red tour with Taylor was" his most romantic period "and he collaborated with more than one team of Taylor."
"She respects ed and believes he handles it like an adult," she said. "You did it!"
"Tyler didn't feel angry or disrespectful," our source shared
"Well, it's fair!"



Number  76
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, are you surprised that Caitlyn decided to reveal her surgery to the world?”
“Now her transformation is complete!”
“Then, in Oct. 2016, she legally changed her name to “Caitlyn Marie,” as well as her gender to female.”
“The stunning star revealed her new identity as “Caitlyn” in June 2015, appearing on the cover of Vanity Fair in a white corset.”
“I am also tired of tucking the damn thing in all the time.”She had the surgery in Jan. 2017 and decided to share the news “so all of you can stop staring,” and says that she feels “not only wonderful but liberated.”
“...right parts...”
“Which is why this is the first time and the last time I will ever speak of it While she doesn t go into in depth detail the former Olympian says that having a penis had no special gifts or use for me I just want to have all the...”
“The former reality star reveals in her upcoming memoir that, “You want to know, so now you know.”
“Caitlyn had fully talked about the procedure with her doctors and her other transgender friends, so, she fully knew what was involved and was totally prepared,” our insider adds.”
““For her it was the final stage to becoming a woman and she did not really discuss it with her immediate family.”


"Hollywood stars, are you surprised at Caitlin's decision to show the world her surgery?"
"Now her transformation is complete!"
"Then, in October 2016, she legally changed her name to" Caitlin Mary "and changed her gender to female."
"This amazing star appeared in Vanity Fair in June 2015 as" Caitlin "in a white tights."
"I'm tired of putting this damn thing in all the time, too." She had an operation in January 2017 and decided to share the news with you, "so you don't have to stare anymore," and said she felt "not only great, but free."
“… The right part... "
"That's why this is my first and last time to talk about this topic, but she doesn't have in-depth details. The former Olympic athlete said that having a penis doesn't have any special talent or purpose for me, I just want to have everything..."
"You want to know, so now you know," the former reality star revealed in her upcoming memoir
"Caitlin has fully discussed the procedure with her doctors and other transgender friends, so she is fully aware of what is involved and fully prepared," our source added
"For her, it's the last stage of being a woman, and she's not really discussing it with her immediate family."



Number  77
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“For more on this story, pick up the latest issue of In Touch Weekly, on newsstands now!”
““He’s strong enough now,” the insider says.”
“The reality star and her husband, Kanye West, flew to Paris to see designer Virgil Abloh’s debut Louis Vuitton fashion show, but Kanye had another outburst and it pushed Kim over the edge.”
““Kim’s emotions were heightened,” a source tells In Touch.”
“And apparently, Kanye wasn’t helping.”
“After the show on June 21, Kanye “made a scene,” according to the source, when he leaped from his front-row seat into the arms of Virgil.”
““Kim didn’t know what to do,” the source explains, adding that the rapper burst into tears.”
““Kanye acting up just added to her anxiety.”Kanye’s latest incident comes just a month after his controversial slavery comments and tweets about Donald Trump.”
“Kim has apparently had enough of it, and told her family that she’s considering leaving her husband.”
““It’s over,” says one insider.”


"To learn more about this story, check out the latest issue of contact weekly at the newsstand!"
"He's strong enough now," the person familiar with the matter said
"The reality star and her husband, Kanye West, flew to Paris to see designer Virgil abloh's first louis vuitton fashion show, but Kanye broke out again and pushed Kim to the top of the wave."
"Kim Jong Il is in high spirits," a source said in contact magazine
"Obviously Kanye didn't help."
"After the end of the program on June 21, Kanye" made a scene. "According to the source, he jumped into Virgil's arms from the front row seat at that time."
"Kim didn't know what to do," the source explained, adding that the rapper burst into tears
"Kanye's behavior increased her anxiety." Kanye's latest incident came a month after his controversial slavery talk and tweets about Donald Trump
"Kim obviously had enough. She told her family that she was thinking about leaving her husband."
"It's all over," one insider said



Number  78
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You can barely keep up with who they’re dating these days.”
“You hear of so many celebrities who are constantly dating other celebrities.”
“Thanksgiving is probably a whirlwind.”
“We’ve never heard of a family tree with so many famous names!”
“Yes, that’s right, so clearly creative talent lies in that family.”
“Her maternal grandmother (can you guess..) is Hitchcock actress Tippi Hedren.”
“But wait, it gets better.”
“"And since they were divorced, I would spend two weeks with one and two weeks with the other, traveling with a tutor."”
“"It was the only way that I could be with them," she said in an interview for Cosmopolitan.”
“Unfortunately, her parents divorced in 1994 so Dakota had to split her time between the two.”


"You can hardly keep up with the person they're dating."
"You've heard that a lot of celebrities often date other celebrities."
"Thanksgiving can be a whirlwind."
"We've never heard of a genealogy with so many names!"
"Yes, that's right, so it's clear that this family is creative."
"Her grandmother (you can guess...) It's Hitchcock's actress Tippy hurdlan
"But wait, things will get better."
"Now that they're divorced, I'll spend two weeks with one of them, two weeks with the other, and travel with a tutor."
"It's the only way I'm with them," she told the international metropolis daily
"Unfortunately, her parents divorced in 1994, so Dakota had to divide her time between them."



**Something goes wrong**
“In addition to Cohen, trailers for his upcoming Viceland show appear to have him sitting down with former White House Director of Communications, Anthony Scaramucci.”
“We're taking Trump down together, and he's so tired he's like, 'OK,' and his wife is like, 'OK, f*** Trump.'"”
“In June, Arnold told NBC News "Cohen has all the tapes...I say to Michael, 'Guess what?”
“Arnold has also claimed he's seen a tape in which Trump refers to his son Eric as a "retard."”
“Penn Jillette, who was a contestant on Celebrity Apprentice, confirmed to media outlets that he's heard "racially insensitive" comments from Trump during filming of the TV series.”
“But Arnold's arduous search for the "Trump tapes" has repeatedly teased snippets of provocative information, including that Trump can be heard using the n-word "multiple times" on the set of the The Apprentice.”
“It's unclear if Cohen's plea deal regarding campaign finance violations and other charges would oblige him to implicate Trump in the Special Counsel Russia investigation being led by Robert Mueller.”
“In the latest trailer for his upcoming Viceland show, Arnold said he's known Trump for more than 30 years.”
“Arnold purports to have the inside story of Cohen's decision to flip on his former boss.”
“Trump realDonaldTrump Arnold tweeted Tuesday afternoon...”


"With the exception of Cohen, the trailer for his upcoming viceland show seems to have him and former White House PR director Anthony scaramucci sitting down."
"We brought trump down together. He was so tired that he said," OK, "and his wife said," OK, f * * trump. "
In June, Arnold told NBC News: "Cohen has all the tapes I said to Michael, "guess what?"
"Arnold also claimed that he saw a tape in which trump called his son Eric" mentally retarded. "
"Penn Gillette, a former contestant in Celebrity Apprentice, confirmed to the media that he heard Trump's" racial insensitivity "comment while filming the TV series."
"However, Arnold's arduous search for" trump tapes "repeatedly teased some pieces of provocative information, including Trump's use of the word" many times "on the set of apprentice."
"It's not clear whether Cohen's plea agreement on campaign funding violations and other charges will force him to implicate trump in the investigation of the Russian special adviser led by Robert Mueller."
"Arnold said in the latest trailer of his upcoming wesland show that he has known trump for more than 30 years."
"Arnold claims to have the inside story of Cohen's decision to betray his former boss."
"Trump Raymond tweeted on Tuesday afternoon that



**Something goes wrong**
“The level of hatred.”
“And they go, I mean they get just killed.”
“I don’t watch MSNBC.”
“Here’s an extended excerpt of his conversation with TIME:For instance I don’t watch CNN.”
“A CNN spokesperson said, “His comments are beneath the dignity of the office of the President.” Trump’s claims about CNN’s Zucker have been repeatedly refuted by the executives involved.”
“Spokespeople for MSNBC and CBS said the networks had no comment on the president’s criticism.”
“The one network he praised was Fox News, saying he watches their shows and is responsible for its ratings bump.”
“He also claimed to have helped CNN president Jeff Zucker, an old friend and business colleague, get his job at the network.”
““You people are quite dishonest in all fairness.” He said he used to watch MSNBC’s Joe Scarborough but no longer does.”
““Washington Post, New York Times, they’re really, really dishonest,” he said, before directly addressing the TIME reporters he had invited for dinner.”


"The level of hatred."
"They left. I mean they were killed."
"I don't watch MSNBC."
"Here's him and time: for example, I don't watch CNN."
A CNN spokesman said, "his remarks are against the dignity of the office of the president." Trump's statement about CNN Zucker has been repeatedly refuted by relevant executives
"Spokesmen for MSNBC and CBS said the station would not comment on the president's criticism."
"One of the networks he praised was Fox News, saying he watched their shows and was responsible for the rise in ratings."
"He also claimed to help CNN president Jeff Zucker, an old friend and business colleague, find a job at CNN."
"To be fair, you people are dishonest." He said he had seen Joe Scarborough of MSNBC, but now he doesn't
"The Washington Post, the New York Times, they're really, really dishonest," he said, then directly invited time reporters to dinner with him



Number  81
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We not the same.”Brown and Tran dated on and off for four years until March 2015, when the model called it quits after finding out the singer had fathered his daughter, Royalty, with another woman while they were together.”
“I was 17.”
“Because at the end of the day, what’s the first joke you had?”
“I want to bring black people together, but you gotta get your ass whooped, my n—a.”
“I’d be mad too.”The “Grass Ain’t Greener” singer also slammed Soulja Boy for dragging Rihanna, 28, into the spat, saying, “This s–t is beneath me.”
“Royalty is 2 and has 5 times more money than Soulja Boy already.”
“In one, Brown mentioned his 2-year-old daughter, Royalty, saying, “Happy New Year!”
““And jumped a fan at his house party on New Years lmao u can’t fight Bitch do that s–t to me.”Brown, 27, responded on Instagram with a series of videos and memes poking fun at his nemesis.”
““Chris Brown think he hard cuz he hit a woman,” the rapper tweeted.”
“Fruits!”Soulja Boy then brought up Brown’s tumultuous relationship with ex Rihanna as well as his previous legal trouble.”


"We're not the same." Brown and tran dated intermittently for four years, until in March 2015, the model found out that the singer and another woman had given birth to daughter Royal, and announced the separation
"I was 17 years old."
"Because after all, what's your first joke?"
"I want to bring black people together, but you have to yell, my n-a."
"I'll be angry, too." The "grass is not greener" singer also attacked Soulja boy for dragging Rihanna, 28, into a quarrel, saying: "this S-T is lower than me."
"There are two royal families, five times more than the soul boy."
In one case, brown mentioned his 2-year-old daughter Royal and said, "Happy New Year!"
Brown, 27, has posted a series of videos and memes on instagram, teasing his arch enemy
"Chris Brown thinks he hit a woman, so he hit hard," the rapper tweeted
"Fruit! "Soulja boy goes on to talk about Brown's troubled relationship with ex Rihanna and his previous legal disputes."



Number  82
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They are totally exhausted but at the same time have never been happier as a family."”
“"Neither Beyonce, nor Jay, have been able to enjoy an entire night of sleep since the twins arrived.”
“The New York born rap star and his wife Beyonce welcomed twins babies into the world in June and Jay reportedly isn t allowing Kanye s decision to quit his streaming service Tidal to distract him from his responsibilities as...”
“...a parent...”
“A source explained: "Jay-Z has all his attention on being a father, being a husband, and watching the success of his new album flourish.”
“READ: Kanye West quits Tidal over money dispute "All Kanye is to him right now is like dealing with a pesky fly that flies into your food.”
“It's flying around and you just want to get away from it and enjoy your meal."”
“One of the last pictures Jay-Z and Kanye West have taken together after the 2016 MTV VMAs.”
“Picture: InstagramJay, 47, released his long-awaited '4:44' album on June 30 and he addresses their strained relationship on the record 'Kill Jay Z'.”
“But he isn't overly concerned by Kanye's decision to quit Tidal and is instead happy for his lawyers to resolve the situation.”


"They're exhausted, but at the same time, as a family, they've never been so happy."
"Since the twins arrived, neither Beyonce nor Jay has been able to sleep all night."
"The New York born rapper and his wife, Beyonce, had twins in June, and it was reported that Jay would not allow kenye to decide to quit his streaming service in order to distract him from..."
“… Parents... "
"Jay-Z is focused on being a father, a husband and watching the success of the new album flourish," one source explained
Read: Kanye West pulled out of the water over money disputes: "Kanye is now like dealing with a nasty fly flying into your food."
"It flies around, you just want to stay away from it and enjoy your food."
"The last photo taken by Jay-Z and Kanye West after MTV Vmas in 2016."
"Photo: instagram Jay, 47, released his long-awaited album '4:44' on June 30, and he described their tense relationship in the album 'kill jay z'"
"But he is not worried about Kanye's decision to resign. On the contrary, he is happy that his lawyer can solve the problem."



Number  83
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
““Caitlyn’s nervous about being seen naked and paranoid about someone recognizing her,” the insider told Radar, noting, “She goes online anonymously of course.”“She wears disguises and uses a speech decoder to alter the sound of her voice.”We pay for juicy info!”
“And Jenner’s still a little unsure of herself now that she’s dipping her toes back in the dating waters.”
“...shocking interview that she was never entirely comfortable with having sex with her ex wife Kris during their marriage of over two decades...”
“All her friends are confident she won t ever date another woman again but Caitlyn s keeping that decision to herself for now In the meantime continued the insider Jenner 67 is having fun hooking up with all kinds of people online As Radar reported Jenner recently confessed in a...”
““Caitlyn’s yet to decide on her sexual preference and is exploring all options via online trans dating sites,” an insider revealed.”
“Inside Caitlyn Jenner’s Secret Cyber Hookups Reality star ‘is having fun hooking up with all kinds of people online.’RadarOnline.com has exclusively learned that Caitlyn Jenner is exploring her sexuality online and has been enjoying a string of secret cyber “hookups”.”
“Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Digital Diva!”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"Caitlin is nervous about being seen naked and paranoid about being recognized," a person familiar with the matter told radar, noting that "of course she is anonymous." "She's wearing camouflage and using a voice decoder to change her voice." We pay for interesting information! "
"And Jenna is still a little bit unsure because she put her toes back in the dating waters."
“… Shocking interview that she never had completely comfortable sex with her ex-wife Chris in their marriage for more than 20 years... "
"All her friends believe that she won't date another woman, but Caitlin won't make the decision for the time being. Meanwhile, she went on to say that according to radar, Jenner admitted in a recent statement that Jenner 67, a person familiar with the matter, is very happy with all kinds of people online."
"Caitlin hasn't decided on her sexuality yet, she's exploring all the options through online dating sites," a person familiar with the matter said
"In Caitlin Jenner's Secret online love, reality TV stars are" very happy to hook up with all kinds of people online. " RadarOnline.com The website exclusively learned that Caitlin Jenner is exploring her sexual orientation on the Internet and has been enjoying a series of secret Internet "hookups"
"On twitter, click Share (open in a new window) on Facebook, click Share (open in a new window) digital Diva!"



Number  84
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, what are your thoughts on Jen and Alex’s passionate make out sessions — TMI or too cute?”
“If Jen ever gets tired of kissing Alex (which we doubt will ever happen), at least she can raid his closet!”
“HollywoodLife.com has EXCLUSIVELY learned that the singer is ‘wild’ for her man’s passionate kisses.”
“Oh la la!”
“Is it getting hot in here — or is it just the sizzling passion between Jennifer Lopez, 48, and Alex Rodriguez, 41?”
“Most definitely the second one.”
“There s a lot to love when it comes to the former New York Yankees baseball player like his gentlemanly character well tailored suits and the fact that he ll go to a hot yoga class with his girlfriend which...”
“...is very difficult to make men do believe me I ve tried...”
“But the thing Jen adores most about him is his make out skills!”
““She loves his kissing ability,” a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”


"Hollywood stars, what do you think of Jan and Alex's passionate intimacy - TMI is still too cute?"
"If Jane is tired of kissing Alex (we doubt it will happen), at least she can search his closet!"
"The only thing she knows is that the singer's passionate kiss to her man is" wild "
"Oh, cheerleading!"
"Is it getting hotter here, or is it just the passion between 48 year old Jennifer Lopez and 41 year old Alex Rodriguez?"
"It must be the second one."
"When it comes to the former New York Yankees baseball player, there are many things to love, such as his gentlemanly character, his well tailored suit, and the fact that he will go to a hot yoga class with his girlfriend..."
“… It's hard for men to believe me. I've tried... "
"But what Jane likes most is his make-up technique!"
"She likes his ability to kiss," one source said, exclusive to Hollywood life



Number  85
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“"I don’t think it’s necessary and I just feel like it’s unfair, things aren’t truthful."”
“...could be the perfect opportunity for her to set the record straight...”
“Caitlyn touched down in London town last week to promote her to promote her juicy new autobiography The Secrets Of My Life she even popped by the This Morning studios and many are speculating whether she had a secret meeting...”
“...with Celebrity Big Brother bosses...”
“Sources have told the Daily Star: "The bookers are really keen to have Caitlyn in the house.”
“"They know she’d be TV gold so they’re prepared to break the bank for her.”
“The world has been fascinated by Caitlyn’s story and getting her would push ratings through the roof."”
“Well, they're not wrong there.”
“Caitlyn is no stranger to reality telly she s starred in Keeping Up With The Kardashians since forevs and even had her own show I Am Cait and after proof that the Kardashian Jenner family feud is still rife this...”
“She even recently revealed that she hasn't spoken to Kim Kardashian in a 'very long time'.”


"I don't think it's necessary. I just think it's unfair. It's not true."
“…… It might be a great opportunity for her to clarify the facts... "
"Caitlin arrived in London last week to promote her interesting new autobiography the secret of my life. She even broke the news in her studio this morning. Many people are wondering whether she has a secret meeting..."
“… With big brother and boss of Celebrity... "
"The subscriber really wants Caitlin in," a source told the Daily Star
"They know she's going to be a TV star, so they're ready to spend money on her."
"The whole world is fascinated by the story of Caitlin, and getting her will make the audience ratings soar."
"Well, they're not wrong."
"Caitlin is no stranger to reality shows. She has starred in" keep up with Kardashian "since freves, and even has her own show" I'm Katie ". After proving that the discord between Kardashian Jenner's family is still prevalent this year..."
"She even recently revealed that she had not spoken to Kim Kardashian for a long time."



Number  86
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know.”
““They tried to make it work for a long time, but it just wasn’t doable.”
“Well, according to our source, the bombshell is taking some time to heal.”
“Here’s the EXCLUSIVE details!”
“Although it’s been nearly a month since Chris Pratt, 38, and Anna Faris, 40, announced that they had decided to end their marriage, the wound is still very fresh!”
“These two seemed perfect for each other!”
“Now, as we attempt to move forward, we’re learning new details on how the actress is managing the painful change.”
“And according to our insider, dating is the last thing on her mind!”
“Take a look back at the adorable former couple right here!”
““Anna and Chris’ decision to separate was a long-time coming, it wasn’t a rash decision,” a source close to Anna tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”


"Let us know."
"They've been working hard for a long time, but they just can't do it."
"Well, according to our sources, it's going to take a while for this explosion to heal."
"Here are the exclusive details!"
"It's almost a month since Chris Pratt, 38, and Anna Faris, 40, announced the end of their marriage, but the wound is still fresh!"
"These two look like a perfect match!"
"Now, as we're trying to move forward, we're learning new details about how the actress responded to this painful change."
"According to our insiders, dating is the last thing she wants to do!"
"Look back at this lovely old couple!"
A source close to Anna told reporters: "Anna and Chris decided to separate is a long process, this is not a hasty decision." Exclusive to Hollywood life



Number  87
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Season 14 of The Voice is currently in the home stretch, with the semifinal round scheduled to air Monday (May 14).”
“The longtime friends seemed more than excited to compete not only against each other in the upcoming season, but also against fellow coaches Adam Levine and Blake Shelton, who have reprised their roles each season since the show began.”
“Hudson first lead "Team JHud" in season 13, but left the following season along with coach Miley Cyrus, making way for the return of Alicia Keys and Clarkson's debut.”
“The two powerhouse vocalists rose to fame thanks to their runs on early Idol seasons, and now they're ready to share their singing competition expertise for a second time around on The Voice this fall.”
“Season 15 of The Voice will feature twice the American Idol power, thanks to the just-announced returns of coaches Kelly Clarkson and Jennifer Hudson.”


"Voice" Season 14 is currently at home and the semi-final is scheduled to air on Monday (May 14)
"The old friends seem very excited to compete not only with each other in the coming season, but also with Adam Levin and Blake Shelton, who have been playing their roles again every season since the start of the show
Hudson led Jude for the first time in season 13, but left with coach Miley Cyrus next season to make way for Alicia case's return and Clarkson's debut
"The two powerful singers have made their mark in the early seasons of idol, and now they are ready to share their singing competition expertise for the second time in the autumn's" voice of man. "
"With the just announced return of coaches Kelly Clarkson and Jennifer Hudson," voice "season 15 will feature twice the power of American Idol."



Number  88
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“A mean-spirited article in the latest issue of the National Enquirer says the 59-year-old actress uses clothing to “hide her haggard mug” […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“Gossip Cop can set the record straight.”
“That’s the ridiculous claim in one of this week’s new tabloids.”
“Does Michelle Pfeiffer actually cover her face while out in public to hide her wrinkles?”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
The latest issue of the National Enquirer published a spirited article saying that the 59 year old actress used clothes to "hide her haggard face" [ ] IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
"Gossip police can clarify the facts."
"This is a ridiculous statement in a new tabloid this week."
"Did Michelle Pfeiffer really cover her face in public to hide her wrinkles?"



Number  89
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Keeping your abs engaged with support your 6-pack development by training the muscles to work even when you’re not in the gym.”
“Lay on your right side with legs straight and stacked on top of each other, press up on your right forearm and use your abs to lift your hips off the floor into a side plank.”
“The secret to getting this look is working all 3 areas of your abdominal muscles, and that’s exactly what this workout will help you do.”
“Let’s get working on sculpting that sexy six-pack!”
“Circuit Works trainer Alycia Darby gives us the run down on achieving a super flat stomach as part of OK!”
“'s 12 Week Countdown To Summer!”
“Article continues below advertisementSTAR BODIES!”
“GET BLAKE LIVELY'S LOVELY TONED LEGS Exercise #1 : Pulsing Straight Leg Bicycles.”
“Lay on your back and bring both feet up 6 inches off the ground.”
“Keeping your legs straight, lift one leg up to a 45 degree angle while simultaneously bringing your opposite elbow toward your lifted straight leg.”


"Even if you're not in the gym, keep your abs and the six muscles that support you growing by training your muscles to work."
"Lie flat on the right side, legs straight, stacked together, right forearm up, with abdominal muscles to lift the hip off the floor, forming a side plate."
"The secret to getting this look is to work on all three parts of your abdominal muscles, and that's what this training can help you do."
"Let's start building sexy six pack!"
"Circuit engineering coach Alicia Darby gave us a run down to achieve a super flat stomach as part of OK!"
"It's a 12 week countdown to summer!"
The article continues the following advertisement star organization
"Get the lovely healthy leg exercise of Blake live # 1: pulse straight leg bicycle."
"Lie on your back, feet six inches off the ground."
Keep your legs straight, lift one leg up to a 45 degree angle and extend the other elbow to the straight leg



Number  90
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by KGC-22/Star Max/IPx/AP Images]”
“In Meghan’s case, it was because she was previously married that the headlines suggested that the “Queen might not attend Prince Harry’s wedding,” like the one seen published in July from the U.K.’s Express.”
“...https t co AZZedEbq1W pic twitter com qaQ4JXYHxq Glamour glamourmag October 4 2017 Today reports indicate that Meghan has had an easy time of winning her place among the royals as her meetings with Kate William and the queen have been reported as going well according to an article last...”
“Prince Harry and Meghan Markle are reportedly 'as good as engaged' ????????”
“Meghan appears to be able to weather the rumors until they finally disappear from the headlines.”
“They claimed that Kate may be jealous of Meghan’s “sexy confidence” on the red carpet, which was a rumor going around at the time in the media.”
“One such article was seen back in March from Celeb Dirty Laundry.”
“Then there were the “jealousy” headline rumors suggesting that Kate was “jealous” of Meghan.”
“She was so enthusiastic about her new love that the article was titled, “Meghan Markle, Wild About Harry.”It has been seen in various reports on how the protocol that comes along with being royal dictates different aspects of a suitable spouse.”
“At one point during the young courtship of Harry and Meghan, the media was being rather nasty to Meghan and Prince Harry actually made a rare response to the press asking them to lay off.”


"[featured images provided by kgc-22 / Star max / IPX / AP images]"
"In Meghan's case, it was because she had been married before, and the headlines suggested that the queen might not attend Prince Harry's wedding, like the article in the British express in July."
“… HTTPS t Co azzedbq1w pic twitter com qaq4jxyhxq glamour glamourmag October 4, 2017 Megan easily won the royal position because her meeting with Kate Williams and the queen was reported to be progressing smoothly... "
"It's reported that Prince Harry and Megan markel are" as well engaged as each other. "
"Megan seems to be able to withstand these rumors until they finally disappear from the headlines."
"They claimed that Kate might be jealous of Megan's" sexy confidence "on the red carpet, which was a rumor circulated in the media at that time."
"As early as March, an article like this appeared in celebrity dirty clothes."
"Then there is the headline rumor of jealousy, suggesting that Kate is jealous of Megan."
"She's so passionate about her new relationship that the title of the article is" Megan markel, Harry's wild. ". This can be seen in all kinds of reports, how the etiquette of being a member of the royal family determines different aspects of a suitable spouse. "
"In the process of courtship between Harry and Megan, the media once resented Megan. Prince Harry rarely responded to the media's request that they be laid off."



**Something goes wrong**
“The "Fab Four" - as they have already been coined by some - may have a world of pressure on their shoulders, but it seems more than likely that both Meghan and Kate are simply happy to have a friend to understand their unusual life path.”
“Society loves to pit women against women… so clearly because Meghan is suddenly so popular Kate must be cowering in the corner feeling sorry for herself,” she said.”
“Which must, by default, mean that Kate Middleton is jealous of her rising star.”
“Right?”
“Short answer: no.”
“But, if the public speculation is anything to go by, you’d be forgiven for thinking so.”
“The Hollywood Gossip recently ran an article titled ‘Kate Middleton: Jealous of Meghan Markle?‘ in which they claimed that the Duchess’ upcoming third baby and lack of involvement in the royal wedding could mean “potential for resentment”.”
“Similarly, the Daily Beast wrote, ‘Step Aside, Kate.”
“Meghan Is the New People’s Princess’.”
“But it’s not just the media.”


The word "fabour" has been coined by some people, who may be under great pressure on their shoulders, but both Megan and Kate seem happy to have a friend who can understand their unusual life path
"Society likes to have women against women Obviously, because Megan has suddenly become so popular, Kate must be hiding in the corner feeling sorry for herself
"By default, it must mean that Kate Middleton is jealous of her new star."
"Is it?"
"Short answer: No."
"But if there is any basis for public speculation, you can be forgiven for thinking so."
The Hollywood gossip recently published an article entitled "Kate Middleton: jealous of Megan markel? The Duchess is about to have a third child and did not attend the royal wedding, which could mean "latent resentment," they said in the report
"Similarly, the Daily Beast wrote," get out of the way, Kate. "
"Megan is the princess of the new people."
"But it's not just the media."



Number  92
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Sun also reported that sources close to Pitt have denied the dating rumors and said that he and Lawrence are not together.”
“The two ended their relationship in August of 2014.”
“Prior to dating Martin, Lawrence dated her 28-year-old “X-Men” co-star, Nicolas Hoult, for five years off and on.”
“Before dating Aronofsky, Lawrence had a short fling with Coldplay lead singer and ex-husband a Gwyneth Paltrow, Chris Martin — Paltrow being another common thread between her and Brad.”
“But age hasn’t seemed to stop Lawrence before.”
“According to The Sun, Lawrence broke up with Aronofsy after a year of dating due to their great difference in age.”
“However, the tabloid checking website Gossip Cop reported that despite reports about the two A-listers becoming a pair, for now the rumors remain just rumors.”
“The source added that Pitt was nervous to contact Lawrence, but was encouraged by friends to make the first move.”
“There’s an intense connection between them!”An insider also told the magazine that Pitt allegedly reached out to Lawrence after getting her phone number from a mutual friend.”
“[They] have been enjoying lots of late nights together.”


"The sun also reported that sources close to Pitt denied rumors of a date and said he was not with Lawrence."
"The two ended their relationship in August 2014."
Before dating Martin, Lawrence dated her 28 year old X-Men partner Nicholas Holt intermittently for five years
Before dating Aronofsky, Lawrence had a brief relationship with Gwyneth Paltrow, the lead singer and ex husband of Coldplay. Chris Martin Paltrow is another common clue between her and Brad
"But age never seemed to stop Lawrence."
According to the sun, Lawrence and aronofs broke up after a year of dating because of a big age gap
"However, the tabloid censorship website gossip police report that despite reports that two first-line stars have become a couple, the current rumors are still just rumors."
"The source added that Pete was nervous about contacting Lawrence, but encouraged by his friends, he was the first to act."
"There is a close connection between them! "An insider also told the magazine that Pete was said to have contacted Lawrence after getting her phone number from a mutual friend."
"(they) spent many late nights together."



**Something goes wrong**
“She added to Entertainment Tonight: 'Well, we had Thanksgiving at his girlfriend's house and they're having Christmas at our house.”
“And Kate regularly spends time with the Masters Of Sex star and his current partner Sarah Silverman and the group tend to spend Christmas and Thanksgiving together.”
“He then alluded to his rehab visit in February 2015.”
“But the hope is to find the right balance so you can care about your own stuff enough to live your life and do your job well while also not being a monster.'”
“Hamm added: 'I’m not perfect, and it hurts when you hurt other people.”
“I try to be a good friend, a good partner, and all that stuff.'”
“'I may be a narcissist in the way that most actors are, but I think it’s not to the detriment of those in my life.”
“Also in the InStyle interview Hamm talked about the issues he has.”
“He also showed off his muscles as he lifted his shirt while looking at plantsFor the shoot, Hamm flexed his muscles while rocking denim; he also posed in neutral hues.”
“Strike a pose: On Friday the 46-year-old actor finally addressed the painful split in a new interview with InStyle magazineGuns!”


She added on tonight's entertainment show, "well, we have Thanksgiving at his girlfriend's house, and they have Christmas at our house."
"Kate often stays with the sex gurus stars, and his current partner, Sarah Silverman, usually spends Christmas and Thanksgiving with them."
"Then he mentioned his rehabilitation visit in February 2015."
"But the hope is to find the right balance so that you can care enough about your own things, live your own life, do your own work, and not become a monster."
"I'm not perfect, it hurts when you hurt people," Ham added
"I try to be a good friend, a good partner, and all that."
"I may be a narcissist like most actors, but I don't think it's going to hurt the people in my life."
"Also in INSTEL's interview, ham talked about the problems he faced."
"He also showed his muscles, lifting his shirt and looking at the flowerpot. During the shooting, ham swayed the denim while bending his muscles; he also posed in a neutral tone
Pose: last Friday, the 46 year old actor finally talked about a painful breakup in a new interview with InStyle magazine guns



Number  94
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See Manning’s Instagram below.”
“A Netflix spokesperson told EW that the article isn’t true and that Manning is still on the show.”
“According to the Associated Press, the article reported Manning wanted to distance herself from her character on the show and was planning to move from New York to Los Angeles.”
“On Wednesday, InTouch published a now-deleted article that claimed Manning had quit the Netflix drama.”
“Xoxo” Manning wrote on Instagram.”
“Silly magazines but still love ya!”
“I Love my squad!”
““#quit #never maybe fired but No.”
“Taryn Manning shoots down report she quit Orange Is the New BlackOrange Is the New Black Close Streaming OptionsDon’t worry, Orange is the New Black fans: Taryn Manning isn’t going anywhere despite a gossip report to the contrary.”


"Look at Manning's instagram below."
"A Netflix spokesman told EW that the article is not true and Manning is still on the show."
"According to the associated press, the article reported that Manning wanted to keep his distance from the characters in the play and planned to move from New York to Los Angeles."
"On Wednesday, in touch published an article that has now been deleted, claiming that Manning has withdrawn from the Netflix series."
"XOXO," Manning wrote on instagram
"Stupid magazine, but still love you!"
"I love my team!"
"# quit # may never be fired, but not."
"Taryn Manning refuses to report her resignation. Orange is the new black orange is the new black close streaming media choice. Don't worry, orange is the new black fan: Taryn Manning won't go anywhere, despite gossip reports to the contrary."



Number  95
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Short of Mueller producing an email from Trump saying “Yes, let’s collude with Russia ASAP!” those people will not change their view — either on Mueller or Trump.”
“But remember that a big chunk of people already believe — before Mueller has released a single final finding — that his whole probe is a partisan witch hunt that should never have been started in the first place.”
“In a CBS News poll released earlier this week 70 of Republicans described the Mueller probe as a witch hunt That same poll showed that more than nine in 10 strong Trump supporters trust Trump for accurate information as compared to 63 who trust family and friends and 11 who...”
“Especially when you consider that lots and lots of people aren’t rolling their eyes when Trump unleashes a tweet blasting the allegedly partisan bias of Mueller’s team or how the whole probe is based on false pretenses.”
“What that means is that even if you roll your eyes when you hear “no collusion,” it seeps into your consciousness — and that’s a win for Trump.”
“Quick, do this thought experiment: Name the first 10 words that come to mind when someone says “Mueller probe.” If you are being honest with yourself, my guess is that the words “no collusion,” “witch hunt” and maybe even “13 Angry Democrats” made it into that top 10.”
“And in the court of public opinion – particularly given the fealty that rank-and-file Republicans have shown (and continue to show) to Trump, the comparison is far more favorable to Trump’s side.”
“But remember what Giuliani and Trump know: The debate over whether and how much Trump did wrong (if anything) is almost certain to be decided in the court of public opinion, not an actual court.”
“That is, on its face, an apples-and-oranges comparison.”
“The other “version” will be Giuliani’s cable TV appearances and President Trump’s tweets.”


"Except for Muller showing Trump's email and saying," yes, let's collude with Russia as soon as possible! "Those people won't change their point of view - whether it's to Muller or trump."
"But remember, before Mueller released a final investigation result, a large number of people believed that his whole investigation was a party political persecution and should not be started at all."
"In a CBS News poll released earlier this week, 70% of Republicans described the Mueller survey as political persecution, and the same poll showed that more than nine out of ten trump supporters believed in Trump's accurate information, while 63 believed in family and friends, and 11 believed in political persecution
"Especially when you consider that when trump tweeted about the so-called partisanship of the Mueller team, or how the whole investigation was based on falsehood, a lot of people didn't turn their eyes."
"It means that even if you roll your eyes when you hear" no collusion, "it will seep into your consciousness - it's trump's victory."
"Come on, do this thinking experiment: name the top 10 words that come to mind when someone says" mill investigation. ". If you're honest with yourself, I guess "no collusion", "political persecution" and even "13 angry Democrats" are in the top 10
"And in the court of public opinion - especially given that ordinary Republicans have shown (and will continue to show) loyalty to trump, this comparison is much better for Trump's side."
"But remember what Giuliani and trump know: the debate about whether and how much, if any, trump did wrong will almost certainly be decided in the court of public opinion, not the real court."
"On the surface, it's a comparison between apples and oranges."
"Another 'version' will be Giuliani's appearance on cable TV and President Trump's Twitter."



Number  96
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"I can't tell if it's menopause or if it's just been the year I've had," she had told the magazine referring to her drier skin and grey strands.”
“"I'm being smart about my choices, and I'm putting my family first, and I'm in charge of my life and my health," the actress told Vanity Fair.”
“The actress has lost a drastic amount of weight following her split from Brad Pitt and now, a new rumour claims that the actress is also stopped eating and sleeping properly.”
“There are rumours doing the rounds claiming that Jolie is undergoing 'health crisis' and is "on the verge of passing out."”
“The claims published by National Enquirer say that the actress is surviving on steamed vegetables and fruits.”
“However, Gossip Cop sources say otherwise.”
“Also Read: Brad Pitt feels 'better off without' Angelina Jolie as she delays divorce?”
“National Enquirer's grapevine claims that the actress is on the "edge of a total collapse" as she barely eats.”
“"There are times she feels light-headed and is on the verge of passing out," the insider claims.”
“The outlet's source adds that Jolie's "food intake is mostly morsels of steamed veggies and fruit, very little protein, and water.”


"I can't tell if it's menopause or just the past year," she told the magazine, referring to her dry skin and gray hair
"I'm smart about my choices, I put my family first, I'm responsible for my life and health," the actress told Vanity Fair
"The actress lost a lot of weight after breaking up with Brad Pitt, and now there is a new rumor that the actress has stopped eating and sleeping as well."
"There is a rumor that Julie is experiencing a" health crisis "and is" on the verge of coma. "
"According to a statement in the national inquiry, the actress lives by steaming vegetables and fruits."
"However, the source of the gossip police said otherwise."
"Also read: does Brad Pitt think 'no' Angelina Jolie is better because she delays the divorce?"
The actress is "on the verge of total collapse" because she hardly eats, according to the national inquirer grapevine
"Sometimes she feels dizzy and almost fainting," the person said
The media source added that Julie's food intake was mainly steamed vegetables and fruits, with little protein and water



Number  97
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“According to an eyewitness, the "Dance Again" singer and her boyfriend left the restaurant through the back door just a few minutes after Casper arrived.”
“Photographers spotted Jennifer's ex Casper Smart arriving at the hot spot for a business dinner.”
“While it may seem like a typical night out in Los Angeles, a special diner just so happened to also be in attendance.”
“As for Alex, he went for a business casual style thanks to his beige pants, white button-down and sky blue sweater.”
“Wearing a blue track suit, bold-frame sunglasses and a white handbag, the World of Dance judge opted for a more casual look.”
“When Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez found themselves in Los Angeles Monday evening, the pair decided to enjoy a date night at Craig's in West Hollywood.”
“It's a small world after all!”


According to witnesses, the "dancing again" singer and her boyfriend left the restaurant by the back door minutes after Casper arrived
"Photographers found out that Jennifer's former Casper smart was at the heart of a business dinner."
"Although it looks like a typical night tour in Los Angeles, there happened to be a special restaurant in attendance."
"As for Alex, he likes business casual style, thanks to his Beige pants, white buttons and sky blue sweater."
"Wearing blue sportswear, bold sunglasses and white handbags, the judges of the dance industry chose a more casual look."
"When Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez arrived in Los Angeles on Monday night, they decided to have a date night at Craig's in West Hollywood."
"It's a small world after all!"



Number  98
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Her note is way closer to her mission than the comments she made in passing, that's for sure, so we'll wait and see if any "uplifting, conscious rap" makes it way onto the record.”
“She closes by reminding her followers that she's got new music coming — her single, "Malibu," from her forthcoming album is set to drop on May 11 — and that she hopes that her words "encourage others to LOVE."”
“At this point in my life I am expanding personally/musically and gravitating more towards uplifting, conscious rap!"”
“...the very best...”
“So to be clear I respect ALL artists who speak their truth and appreciate ALL genres of music country pop alternative but in this particular interview I was asked about rap I have always and will continue to love and celebrate hip hop as I ve collaborated with some of...”
“"A lot of the time publications like to focus on the most sensationalized part of the conversation," she writes.”
“...borders who was asked about her thoughts on rap for this particular conversation...”
“Once swift angry blowback followed the publication of the piece Cyrus took to Instagram to share her side of the story or her account of what didn t make it into print She stressed that the comment was made in a broader conversation and that she s an artist without...”
“It was too much 'Lamborghini, got my Rolex, got a girl on my cock' — I am so not that."”
“That’s what pushed me out of the hip-hop scene a little.”


"Her notes are closer to her mission than her passing comments, which is for sure, so we will wait and see if any exciting, conscious rap" can be recorded. "
Finally, she reminds her followers that she has new music coming out - her single, "Malibu," will drop from her upcoming album on May 11 - and she hopes her words "encourage others to love."
"At this point in my life, I'm expanding personally / musically towards more uplifting, conscious rap!"
“… The best... "
"So to be clear, I respect all artists who speak the truth and appreciate all genres of country pop music, but in this special interview, I was asked about rap and I have always loved and will continue to celebrate hip-hop because I have worked with some of them..."
"Most of the time, publications like to focus on the most sensational parts of the conversation," she wrote
“… She was asked what she thought of rap in this conversation
"Cyrus published an article on instagram to share her views, or her description of things that have not been printed, and then she quickly responded angrily. She stressed that this comment was published in a broader dialogue, that she is an artist and has not..."
"It's too much." Lamborghini, my Rolex, there's a girl on my rooster "- I'm not like that."
"That's what pushed me off the hip-hop stage."



Number  99
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Now I'm goddamn scaredOh no, yeah, yeah(Scared of your own heartbeat)”
“...wanna be left in the streets If you re scared of your own heartbeat Na na now you scared Yeah yeah why you scared...”
“Oh you scared now?”
“AlrightSection!”
“[Verse 1: Swift]Baby, I'm endzyBando, tellyShe just wanna do small talkI just wanna give her the lengthySmoke like a rastaWhat's that?”
“Sesi My bros are my brothers I ain t never had besties Brap mash in the man bag Brap brap headpiece Jump out of a black van Goons dem scary Peng girl wanna see the life Don t think that...”
“...they ready Come alive in the night time Most time I just stay dreamin Chorus Chris Brown She wanna see what it s like to live the nightlife Yeah she thinkin everything is alright Baby you don t wanna be...”
“...left in the streets If you re scared of your own heartbeat Na na now you scared Yeah yeah why you scared...”
“Now I m goddamn scared Oh no yeah yeah Scared of your own heartbeat Verse 2 HoodyBaby Shaq and Kobe Kobe and Shaq yeah the family back HoodyBaby still rollin like a handicap The life I live girl you know...”
“...it s trap to trap When life attacks soda all type of crack Falled off type of cast oh you likin that You play hard to get oh you might be back Two can play that game hop inside the...”


"Now I'm fuckin 'scared no, yeah, yeah."
“… If you're afraid of your heartbeat and you want to be left on the street, now you're afraid, yes, yes, why are you afraid... "
"Oh, are you afraid now?"
"All right!"
"Baby, I'm enzbando. She just wants to say something. I just want to give her a little time, like lasta. What's that?"
"Cecil, my brothers are my brothers. I've never been in a man's bag. I've never been in a man's bag. I've never been in a man's bag. I've jumped out of a black truck mob to scare people. Peng girls want to see life. Don't think..."
“… They're going to live at night. Most of the time I'm just staying in the choir dreaming of Chris Brown. She wants to see how nightlife feels. Yes, she thinks everything's good, baby. You don't want to be... "
“… Stay on the street. If you are afraid of your heartbeat, now you are afraid. Yes, yes, why are you afraid... "
"Now I'm fuckin 'scared, no, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes
“… This is trap to trap when life attacks soda all types of crack shedding type cast oh you like, you play very hard to get Oh, you may come back two can play inside the game jump... "



**Something goes wrong**
“Follow Be on Facebook, Twitter, Pinterest, Tumblr and Instagram.”
“She has worked every day of her life.”
“To make sure the former actress doesn’t bring shame upon the royal house of Windsor, Queen Elizabeth is ordering six months of training in royal protocol.”
“The Queen has entrusted her senior aide, Samantha Cohen, with the task of showing the Duchess the ropes, and has even relocated Samantha from Buckingham Palace to Kensington Palace to be closer to Meghan.”
“Meghan officially became part of the royal family after her May 19 wedding to Prince Harry.”
“Photo: Getty“It will be six months of listening,” a source told the Daily Mail.”
““She is seeking out advice from a range of people.”
“She is going to proceed with humility.”
“It is not going to be quiet, though.”
“It is going to be a very busy office.”


"Follow Facebook, twitter, pinterest, Tumblr and instagram."
"She works every day."
"To ensure that the former actress does not bring shame to the Windsor royal family, Queen Elizabeth ordered a six-month Royal etiquette training."
"The queen has commissioned Samantha Cohen, her senior aide, to show the Duchess the ropes and even move Samantha from Buckingham Palace to Kensington Palace to get closer to Megan."
"Megan officially became a member of the royal family after her wedding to Prince Harry on May 19."
"It's going to be six months of listening," a source told the daily mail
"She's soliciting a range of opinions."
"She will continue humbly."
"But it won't be quiet."
"It's going to be a very busy office."



Number  101
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comments section!”
““Ever since Jay admitted to cheating, Beyoncé can’t stop thinking about it,” a source told Life & Style.”
“But according to a new Life & Style article, Queen Bey may still have some residual feelings about her man’s roaming eye.”
“Click through for all the details!”
“Article continues below advertisement Source Getty After it was long speculated that the Grammy winning rapper had cheated on his wife Beyoncé with Becky with the good hair according to her hit album Lemonade Jay Z finally publicly admitted he had a roaming eye in November after the release of...”
“...his album 4 44”
“Source: GettyBut just earlier this month, Jay said that despite the fact that Bey was “struggling to move on and forgive” back when he first told his wife about his cheating scandal, therapy and Blu Ivy, 5, made them stronger than ever.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: GettyStill, that hasn’t stopped doubts from settling in for the pop star, who has can’t seem to shake what happened.”
“Source: Getty“Jay thought once he came clean, she would forgive him.”
“Source: GettyDo you think Jay will cheat on Bey again?”


"Please leave a message in the comments section!"
"Beyonce has been thinking about it since Jay admitted cheating," a source told life & style
"But according to a new lifestyle article, Queen Bay may still have some residual feelings about her man's wandering eyes."
"Click to see all the details!"
"The article continues following the advertising source of Getty after long speculation that the Grammy winning rapper cheated his wife Beyonce and Becky on good hair according to her hit album lemonade Jay Z. finally admitted publicly that he had a roaming eye after the release of November..."
“… His album 4 44
"Source: gettybut just earlier this month, Jay said that although bey" was trying to move forward and forgive "when he first told his wife about his cheating scandal, treatment and 5-year-old Blu Ivy made them stronger than ever."
The article continues with the following advertising source: gettystill, which has not stopped people from suspecting the pop star, who seems unable to change everything that happened
"Source: Getty" Jay thought she would forgive him once he confessed
"Source: do you think Jay will betray Bay again?"



Number  102
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Lisa then stood up, threw the contents of her glass at Kim and then angrily smashed it on the table's edge, screaming as Yolanda held her back: 'You never go near my husband!”
“'Everybody will know.'”
“On last week's episode, Kim, 50, accused Lisa of harboring a secret about her husband, causing Lisa, 51, to throw and smash a glass full of wine.”
“...out there so maybe someone will tell me at some point, and I hope it was good,' he joked.”
“Losing her cool: When Kim, 50, brought up her husband, Lisa, 51, furiously smashed a glass of wine'There is a hashtag #WhatDidHarryDo?”
“Harry said he is in the dark just like everyone else.”
“As for the big secret Kim is accusing him of hiding?”
“I think she’s doing an extraordinary job.'”
“'So in some sense it is art in that respect.”
“'I think she’s bringing some class to a show that is kind of a reflection of who we are today.”


"Lisa stood up, threw the contents of the glass to Kim, and then angrily smashed it on the edge of the table. Yolanda grabbed her and screamed," you'll never come near my husband! "
"Everyone will know."
In last week's show, Kim, 50, accused Lisa of hiding her husband's secret, causing Lisa, 51, to throw a glass of wine
He joked, "I'm not sure So maybe someone will tell me at some point that I hope it's a good thing. "
"Lose your cool: when Kim, 50, mentions her husband Lisa, 51, she angrily smashes a glass of wine." what's a label for? "
"Harry said he was in the dark, like everyone else."
"As for the big secret Kim accused him of hiding?"
"I think she did a great job."
"In a sense, this is art."
"I think she's bringing some classes to a show that reflects what we're doing today."



Number  103
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Unfortunately, however, there are some people who would do anything for money, except work.””
““I would never want them to think this is true,” he said.”
““I have always paid far more than the maximum in child support and that will never change,” the former New York Yankees star said in a statement to Page Six.”
““It’s highly offensive to me that my former brother-in-law, who has been trying to pursue a frivolous case against me for four years and has gotten absolutely nowhere with it in court, is misrepresenting my relationship with my daughters to manipulate the public’s opinion,” he added.”
“The report Wednesday in the New York Daily News came soon after it was learned that A-Rod had just purchased a $15 million Manhattan apartment with girlfriend Jennifer Lopez.”
“According to the Daily News report, Rodriguez told his ex-wife Cynthia that he would cut his support payments for daughters Natasha, 13, and Ella, 9, over a legal dispute with her brother, Constantine Scurtis.”
“A-Rod’s alleged threat was meant to send a message to Scurtis, the Daily News added.”
“Cynthia had texted her brother explaining I m just trying to defend my child support situation and it s terrible She continued I have an email from Rodriguez telling me that he s basically making me pay for not stopping you and telling you that I hate you The tension...”
“Cynthia is referring to is a four year legal battle between Rodriguez and her brother...”
“Scurtis sued his ex brother-in-law in 2014, claiming he was pushed out of the real estate company they founded together when his sister’s marriage began to fail, the Daily News said.”


"Unfortunately, however, some people are willing to do anything but work for money."
"I never want them to think it's true," he said
The former New York Yankees star said in a statement on page 6: "my alimony is always far beyond the ceiling, and that will never change."
"My ex brother-in-law has been trying to bring an unimportant case against me for four years, but he has made no progress in court, which makes me very disgusted. He has distorted my relationship with my daughter to manipulate public opinion," he added
"The New York Daily News Report on Wednesday came shortly after learning that A-Rod and his girlfriend, Jennifer Lopez, had just bought a $15 million Manhattan apartment."
Rodriguez told his ex-wife Cynthia that he would cut alimony for his daughters Natasha (13) and Ella (9) because of a legal dispute with her brother Constantine scurtis, the Daily News reported
The daily news also said that "A-Rod's so-called threat is intended to send a message to Scudetti."
"Cynthia texted her brother to explain that I just wanted to defend my child's upbringing, which was terrible," she said, adding that I received an email from Rodriguez telling me that he was basically asking me to pay for the tension between not stopping you and telling you I hate you... "
"Cynthia refers to the four-year lawsuit between Rodriguez and her brother..."
"Scutis sued his former brother-in-law in 2014, claiming he was fired from the real estate company they founded when his sister's marriage began to fail," the daily news said



Number  104
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Other celebrities who played included Justin Bieber, Nick Cannon, Drew Scott and Michael B. Jordan.”
“...awkwardly into the camera...”
“Foxx, 50, was speaking with “SportsCenter” host Michael Smith on Friday before the NBA All-Star Celebrity Game in which the actor was playing, E!”
“News reported.”
“Smith asked Foxx about being prepared for the game before he tried to transition the conversation to the actor's private relationship with Holmes, 39.”
““And I know you’ve prepared and I saw pictures,” Smith asked.”
““Did you and Katie Holmes play basketball for Valentine’s Day?”
“Like some real Love and Basketball TED CRUZ ACCUSES CNN OF SITTING ON INTERVIEW AFTER CHRIS CUOMO SAID HE S AFRAID TO APPEAR ON NETWORK Foxx did not answer but instead took off his earphones and attempted to take the microphone off before an assistant helped him as Foxx looked...”
“The actor then walked off camera and back to the basketball court where he began to do exercises.”
“He is not one to acknowledge anything about his private life and neither does Katie.”Foxx’s team, the Clippers, ended up beating the rival team, the Lakers, 75-66.”


"Other celebrities who play include Justin Bieber, Nick Cannon, druscott and Michael Jordan."
“… Embarrassed to the camera... "
Fox, 50, spoke to Michael Smith, the sports center host, before the NBA all star game on Friday
"News coverage."
"Smith asked fox if he was ready for the game before trying to turn to the actor's personal relationship with Holmes, 39."
"I know you're ready. I saw the picture," Smith asked
"Did you play basketball with Katie Holmes on Valentine's day?"
"Just like some real love and basketball Ted Cruz accused CNN of sitting after the interview, Chris Cuomo said he was afraid to appear on the network, fox didn't answer, but instead took off his headphones and tried to put a microphone in front of him, an assistant helped him look..."
"Then the actor left the camera, went back to the basketball court and began to practice."
"He won't admit his private life, and neither will Katie." Fox's team, the clippers, beat the Lakers 75-66



Number  105
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...so much, she wanted Justin to be happy and that’s why she agreed that he should spend so much time in N.Y.C.,” said the insider.”
““With Jen feeling so strongly about living in L.A. and disliking N.Y.C.”
“For a long time, the couple accommodated each other, with Theroux spending more and more time on his own in New York City.”
“It was always hard for Jen to understand why Justin didn’t like, or at least could learn to like L.A., when she was in L.A.,” the source shared.”
“"Ever since they became serious, the living issue often made them bicker.”
“The source close to the pair shared that Aniston and Theroux each preferred different coasts, a major source of continued discord for the pair.”
“The couple was plagued by problems in their relationship well before they tied the knot — some of the same issues that ultimately led to their marriage’s demise, an insider told PEOPLE.”


"She wanted to make Justin happy so much that she agreed that he should be in New York for so long," the person familiar with the matter said
"Jane has a strong feeling about living in Los Angeles and doesn't like New York City."
"For a long time, the couple gave in to each other, and Cyrus spent more and more time alone in New York."
"It's always hard for Jane to understand why Justin didn't like Los Angeles when he was in Los Angeles, or at least learn to like Los Angeles," the source said
"Ever since they became serious, life problems often made them quarrel."
"Sources close to the couple believe that Aniston and seru like different coasts, which is the main reason for the couple's continued discord."
"The couple were plagued by problems in their marriage before they got married - some of the same problems eventually led to the end of their marriage," a person familiar with the matter told people



Number  106
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Speaking of her tell-all book The Secrets of My Life, Jenner then added, “I hate to inform the Kardashians that the book was not about them.””
“Jenner hasn t yet confirmed the claims made by the outlet this week and hasn t spoken publicly regarding her former stepdaughter s risque snaps though the site s insider then added that Caitlyn allegedly wishes both Kim and Kourtney would behave with more style and grace after posting the...”
“Caitlyn Jenner allegedly isn’t too fond of the risqué photos her former stepdaughters Kim Kardashian and Kourtney Kardashian have been sharing across their social media pages in recent days.”
“According to a new report after the sisters bared their bodies in various nearly nude and bikini photos on Instagram Jenner believes the twosome are setting a poor example for their young children At least that s according to Hollywood Life as the outlet alleged this week that an insider...”
“...recently revealed that Caitlyn thinks the twosome s photos are in poor taste and are poorly timed amid the important message being spread by the MeToo movement right now...”
“A source alleged to the site that Caitlyn feels Kim and Kourtney are sending the wrong message to their millions of followers with their skin baring pictures as she s supposedly been trying for years to get the twosome to cover up a little more while she was married to...”
“...former wife Kris Jenner before their divorce in 2015”
““Caitlyn worries that the sisters’ inappropriate posts are setting a poor example for their young children,” said the source of the star, who reports are claiming could potentially join the cast of Dancing with the Stars Season 26 later this year.”
“Notably, both stars are moms to three young children.”
“Kim and husband Kanye West are parents to 4-year-old North, 2-year-old Saint, and almost 2-week-old Chicago, while Kourtney is mom to 8-year-old Mason, 5-year-old Penelope, and 3-year-old Reign.”


Referring to her book about the secrets of my life, Jenna went on: "I hate to tell the kardashians that this book is not about them."
"Jenna has not confirmed what the media said this week, nor has she publicly talked about the pornographic photo of her former stepdaughter, but an insider of the website later added that Caitlin is said to want Kim and Courtney to be more style and elegant after posting the photo..."
"It's said that Caitlin Jenner doesn't like the photos shared by her former stepdaughters Kim Kardashian and Kourtney Kardashian on social media in recent days."
"According to a new report on instagram, the two sisters are naked in all kinds of almost nude and bikini photos. Jenner believes that the two set a bad example for their children, at least according to Hollywood life, which claimed this week that a person familiar with the matter..."
“… Recently, it was revealed that Caitlin thought that their photos were not of high taste, and the timing was improper, because the meto movement was currently spreading important information... "
"A source claimed to the website that Caitlin felt that Kim and kurtney had sent the wrong message to their millions of followers with bare skin photos, because she had been trying to make the two men hide more when they got married for years, presumably..."
“…… Chris Jenner, ex-wife before divorce in 2015
"Caitlin is worried that inappropriate posts from the sisters set a bad example for their children," the star's source said, claiming she could join the cast of dance with the stars for season 26 later this year
"It's worth noting that both stars are mothers of three children."
"Kim and her husband Kanye West are the parents of 4-year-old north, 2-year-old saint and almost 2-week-old Chicago, while Courtney is the mother of 8-year-old Mason, 5-year-old Penelope and 3-year-old Reeve."



Number  107
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Paris may soon be following in Kim’s reality TV footsteps.”AdvertisementThe upcoming months will reveal if Jenner was able to convince the teenager to become an honorary Kardashian.”
“A source shared: “Paris agreed to strategize with the savvy 61-year-old, but asked that her idol Kim [Kardashian] join them for a meeting at Kris’s estate in Calabasas.”
“The aspirant actress adores Kanye West’s wife.”
“Paris is reportedly interested in the idea, but she wants Kardashian to be part of the conversation.”
“According to insiders, the two women met at a party in February and Jenner put all of her cards on the table because ratings for the program have been going down for some time.”
“Now we are learning that Kris Jenner, the woman, who turned her daughter, Kim Kardashian, into an A-lister, is trying to get Paris on her family’s hit reality show, Keeping Up With The Kardashians.”
“The internet personality dumped her former boyfriend, Michael Snoddy, and joined Star for a couple of episodes.”
“She also shocked the world by claiming that her dad was murdered without providing any proofs to back up her statement.”
“The young woman told her story in a compelling and controversial way including years of dealing with mental issues.”
“In 2017, via a blockbuster interview with Rolling Stone magazine, Paris Jackson returned to the spotlight and got ready for the next steps in her career.”


"Paris may soon follow in Kim's footsteps on reality shows." The ads in the next few months will reveal whether Jenner can persuade the teenager to become an honorary Kardashian
"Paris agreed to work out a strategy with the smart 61 year old, but asked her idol Kim (Kardashian) to go with them to a meeting at the estate of calabash Chris," a source said
"This aspiring actress worships Kanye West's wife."
"Paris is reported to be interested in the idea, but she wants Kardashian to participate in the dialogue."
"According to people familiar with the matter, the two women met at a party in February. Jenner put all the cards on the table because the ratings of the show have been down for some time."
"Now we know that Kris Jenner, who turned her daughter Kim Kardashian into a first-line star, is trying to get Paris on her family's hit reality show to keep up with Kardashian."
The Internet celebrity abandoned his ex boyfriend Michael snowdy and joined several episodes of starry sky
"She also shocked the world, claiming that her father was murdered without providing any evidence to support her statement."
"The young woman tells her story in a convincing and controversial way, including years of dealing with mental problems."
"In 2017, through a sensational interview with Rolling Stone magazine, Paris Jackson returned to the spotlight and was ready for the next step in her career."



Number  108
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Wonder Park is scheduled to be released on March 15, 2019, by Paramount Pictures.”
“The film is currently in development under Paramount Animation and Nickelodeon Movies.”
“It was recently reported Garner is not ready to divorce her estranged husband, but the reports were not based on actual facts or formal statements made by the representatives of the duo.”
“Affleck started dating Garner in 2004 and the couple was married the following year in a private ceremony.”
“After celebrating a decade together, they both announced their separation on June 30, 2015.”
“A recent cover of OK!”
“Australia asserts that Jennifer Garner recently carried out a heartbreaking interview in which she revealed she is not ready to divorce the Batman actor.”
“The magazine talked about Garner's candid interview with CBS show, Sunday Morning.”
“During the show the mother of three talked about the difficulty she faced by the tabloid media after she announced her separation with Ben There was a solid decade where there was five or six cars minimum and easily up to 15 or 20 on the weekends outside of my...”
“...house at all times...”


"Spectacle park is scheduled to be released by Paramount Pictures on March 15, 2019."
"The film is currently being developed by Paramount animation and Nick pictures."
"There are recent reports that Ghana is not ready to divorce her separated husband, but these reports are not based on the actual situation, nor are they official statements of the two representatives."
"Affleck started dating Ghana in 2004, and the next year they got married in a private ceremony."
"After a decade of celebration together, they all announced their separation on June 30, 2015."
"The latest cover of OK!"
"Australia claims that Jennifer Garner recently conducted a heartbreaking interview in which she revealed that she was not ready to divorce Batman."
"The magazine talked about Ghana's candid interview with CBS on Sunday morning."
"In the program, the mother of three talked about the difficulties faced by the tabloid media after she announced her separation from Ben. In the past ten years, she has at least five or six cars. On weekends outside my home, she easily has 15 or 20 cars... "
“… The house has been... "



Number  109
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“June 8, 2017: Styles storms the Late Late Show set to… answer a wrong number.”
““I feel like I have more control over the buttons.” There’s a fun scene where they magically change clothes into argyle and a skin-tight gold number, confirming what we already knew: The singer can pull off any style.”
““I would like to take the opportunity to announce that we will also be having a baby,” he joked.”
“All jokes aside, Styles clearly has Corden's back.”
“So where did this adorable bromance begin?”
“Billboard put together a timeline of their past Late Late Show shenanigans.”
“May 14, 2015: One Direction goes to battle with Corden in a game of dodgeball.”
““It definitely feels like the last five years I’ve been in this band has been in preparation for this game,” Styles deadpans.”
“Corden talks to the quartet about Zayn’s departure from the group.”
“When the host asks if they thought of adding another member like him, Styles flat-out says, “No.”May 15, 2015: One Direction talk about life on the road, and Styles reveals that he went on a juice cleanse.”


"June 8, 2017: the final show will Answer the wrong number
"I feel like I have more control over buttons." There is an interesting scene in which they magically change their clothes into diamond patterns and a tight golden number, confirming what we already know: singers can make any style. "
"I'd like to take this opportunity to announce that we're going to have a baby, too," he joked
"Don't be kidding. Stiles obviously has the strength of Colden."
"So where did this lovely Bronx start?"
"Billboards put their past pranks together."
"May 14, 2015: one direction fights koden in dodgeball."
"My last five years in the band must have been preparing for this game," stiles said, without expression
"Corden met with the Quartet to discuss Zahn's departure from the organization."
"When the host asked them if they were considering adding a member like him, styles said bluntly," No. " May 15, 2015: one direction talks about life on the road, and styles reveals that he went to a juice wash. "



Number  110
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“The intimate performance was held for around 150 fans in Tishomingo to promote the opening of Shelton's first restaurant, Ole Red, where the sweet couple was also spotted smiling wide as they walked hand-in-hand.”
“At a concert in Oklahoma on Friday, the country singer plated a kiss on his girlfriend when she joined him on stage during the show, and adorably embarrassed her a bit when he started dishing on the early days of their romance.”
“Some of those in attendance at the private concert shared the cute moment to social media, and captured the No Doubt singer's bashful smile as Shelton jokingly teased her about the start of their flirtation.”
“"We were starting to hang out together and mess around," Shelton, 41, recalled as the audience cheered in support and Stefani, who had rested her head on his shoulder, looked up at him mock-surprised at his candidness.”
“PHOTOS: Gwen Stefani and Blake Shelton's Cutest Moments"You know, texting each other, starting out as friends," Shelton quickly added, trying to assuage the embarrassment.”
“B: "We were just starting to hang out and mess around"G: ???”
“...pic.twitter.com/fIwKWKLBmU — Cat ?✨ (@izzle284) September 30, 2017WATCH: Gwen Stefani Teases New Christmas Song With Blake Shelton -- Listen!”
“Additionally, the event raised money for local charity Johnston County Reaching Out.”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"This intimate performance was held for about 150 fans in tisomigo to promote the opening of Sheldon's first restaurant, Ole red, where the sweet couple walked hand in hand with a smile on their face."
"Last Friday, at a concert in Oklahoma, the country singer kissed her girlfriend when she was on stage with him, and he lovingly embarrassed her when he started talking about the early days of their relationship."
"Some people at private concerts shared this lovely moment on social media, and when Sheldon jokingly teased her and started flirting, they caught the shy smile of the unquestionable singer."
"We started hanging out together and messing around," recalls Sheldon, 41 The crowd cheered for support, and Stephanie put his head on his shoulder and looked up at him, surprised by his frankness
"Photo: Gwen Stephanie and Blake Sheldon's cutest moment." you know, texting each other, starting as friends, "Sheldon quickly added, trying to ease the embarrassment."
B: "We're just starting to hang out and mess around." G:
“... pic.twitter.com/fiwklbmu -Cat? ✨  (@ izzle284) September 30, 2017 observation: Gwen Stephanie and Blake Sheldon make fun of new Christmas songs together - listen
In addition, the event raised money for a "reach out" charity in Johnston County
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page



Number  111
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Follow us: @theJasmineBRAND on Twitter | theJasmineBRAND on Facebook| theJasmineBRAND_ on Instagram...”
“Kris also makes it clear that she’ll take legal action against an employee that does something wrong and will hold them accountable.”
“Kris Jenner is hiring, but it takes a special person to work for one of Hollywood’s most popular families!”
“The matriarch of the Kardiashan Jenner family is on the hunt for a new personal assistant.”
“She explains what she’s looking for,It’s about being discreet and being private and learning.”
“That’s definitely a skill set.”
“And being able to be mature and understand what the family is all about.”
“If somebody has something that’s happening in your life at the moment and it is a private thing, then somebody [would need] to have a lot of respect for that.”
“The business woman who is the brains behind her family’s reality show, Keeping Up With the Kardashians, says that has no tolerance for,When something needs to be protected and somebody else doesn’t understand the importance of that.”
“That’s a problem.”


"Follow us: @ the jasmine brand on twitter | the jasmine brand on Facebook | the jasmine brand on instagram |"
"Chris also made it clear that she would take legal action against employees who did wrong and hold them accountable."
"Chris Jenner is hiring, but to work for one of Hollywood's most popular families, you need a special person!"
"The matriarch of the kardiashan Jenner family is looking for a new personal assistant."
"She explained what she was looking for, which was prudence, privacy and learning."
"It's definitely a set of skills."
"Be able to mature and understand the meaning of family."
"If something happens to someone in your life and it's a personal thing, then someone (needs) to give it a lot of respect."
"This business woman, who is behind the scenes of her family's reality show, follows in the footsteps of the Kardashian family and says that when something needs to be protected and others don't understand the importance of that, she can't tolerate it."
"It's a problem."



Number  112
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Whenever split rumors do make the rounds, they just leave it to their reps to deny.”
“2017 that The Crown actress Vanessa Kirby was marrying yes marrying her Mission Impossible Fallout co star...”
“The Mission Impossible star has kept sort of a low profile with his relationships after splitting from his ex-wife, Katie Holmes, in 2012.”
“Therefore, because he isn’t jumping on couches and declaring his love for anyone, some tabloids have decided to make up stories about him being romantically involved with other Hollywood A-listers.”
“Now, it’s time to separate fact from fiction and bust those rumors about who Cruise has dated.”
“Angelina JolieIn March 2017, the National Enquirer published a bogus report that the actor was dating Angelina Jolie.”
“The publication claimed that the two stars met to talk about the film they were working on together, however, we know that they never did a movie together so that part isn’t true.”
“The outlet went on to claim that Jolie was enjoying making her ex, Brad Pitt, jealous about the romance.”
“But Gossip Cop reported that there’s no truth to that, which makes sense since Jolie told People that dating is the furthest thing from her mind and something she doesn’t plan on doing for a long time.”
“Jane FondaAfter appearing together at Comic-Con in Las Vegas in spring 2018 to promote their movies, the site New Idea falsely reported that Cruise was seeing Jane Fonda.”


"Whenever there is a rumor of division, they leave it to their representatives to deny it."
"Crown actress Vanessa Kirby is getting married in 2017. Yes, she is married to her" impossible dust "partner..."
"The impossible star has been keeping a low profile in his relationship since breaking up with his ex-wife Katie Holmes in 2012."
"So, because he didn't jump on the sofa and didn't show his love to anyone, some tabloids decided to make up stories about his romantic relationship with other Hollywood stars."
"Now, it's time to separate fact from fiction and break the rumors about who cruise is dating."
"Angelina Jolie in March 2017, the national inquirer published a false report that the actor was dating Angelina Jolie."
"The magazine claimed that the two stars met to talk about the film they were working on. However, we know that they have never made a film together, so that part is not true."
"The media went on to claim that Julie likes to make her ex girlfriend Brad Pitt jealous of the relationship."
"But gossip police reports that it doesn't make sense because Julie tells people that dating is the furthest thing from her and she doesn't plan to do it for a long time."
"After Jane Fonda appeared together in Las Vegas in the spring of 2018 to promote their film, new idea lied that cruise had seen Jane Fonda."



Number  113
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Brad might suddenly turn up and decide to eat pizza with the kids or he ll take them out for the day and totally throw their routines The source continued to recall an incident when Brad and Angelina reportedly took their twins out for ice cream late during a visit...”
“The nannies ended up working for months on end, around the clock, with no holiday or days off.”
“Image FameFlynet uk com Image Splash News While Maddox went to a Lycee Francais school in Los Angeles several years ago the six children are all home schooled but now it s been reported that as they approach their teens Angelina is keen for them to go to school for...”
“The multi-cultural family would often travel the world, some of which in different groups, from visiting metropolitan cities, to war zones and refugee camps as well as visits back to the adopted children's homelands.”
“Now, the family use two further nannies as well as tutors, according to MailOnline.”
“It's been claimed that the family used to hire six nannies for each of the children, with Angelina's brother James Haven reportedly taking on chief responsibility of caring for the children in recent times.”
““You got to leave,” he reportedly said with a laugh.”
“...to hotels to get peace...”
“In the middle of the night they re running down the hallway waking their parents up and trying to get into their beds Image Fameflynet Image Rex Features By The Sea actor Brad has previously laughed about the madness of the Jolie Pitt household claiming that they had to flee...”
“The nanny claimed that the children would quite often ignore bed time rules, as they said: “They have no control over the kids.”


"Brad may suddenly appear and decide to eat pizza with the children, or he will take them out for a day and completely disrupt their daily life. The source continues to recall that Brad and Angelina were reported to have taken their twins out for ice cream late in an interview... "
"The nannies ended up working for months, day and night, without holidays or rest days."
"Picture fame flynet UK com picture splash news a few years ago, when Maddox was at a lycee Francais school in Los Angeles, all six children were home schooled, but now it's reported that Angelina was eager to get them to school as they approached their teens..."
"Multicultural families often travel around the world, some of them in different groups, from visiting metropolises, war zones and refugee camps to visiting homes for adopted children."
"Now, according to mailonline, the family needs two more nannies and tutors."
"It's said that the family used to hire six nannies for each child, and it's reported that Angelina's brother, James Harwin, has been mainly responsible for taking care of the children recently."
"You have to go," he is said to have said with a smile
“… Go to the hotel for peace... "
"In the middle of the night, they run down the hallway to wake up their parents and try to go to bed. Photo by Brad flynet. Rex Features had previously laughed at Julie Pitt's crazy behavior of claiming they had to run away..."
"Nannies claim that children often ignore bedtime rules, as they say:" they can't control the children. “



Number  114
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““You did make me laugh,” Hawn admitted.”
“Days before Oliver’s Instagram post, a paparazzo asked Hawn, 71, if she was “ready to have Brad as a son-in-law,” causing the Snatched actress to burst out laughing, according to a video posted by The Sun.”
“Oliver Hudson joked about his sister Kate Hudson‘s rumored romance with Brad Pitt on Instagram on Friday, January 20.”
“The Rules of Engagement alum, 40, shared a photo of a recent Star magazine cover, which claimed Kate, 37, and Pitt, 53, are “getting serious” and have moved in together.”
“Oliver was clearly amused by the tabloid rumors and wrote a lengthy (and sarcastic) response to shut down the speculation.”
““Yeah and it’s been hell!!”
“He’s messy as s–t!” Oliver captioned his Instagram post.”
““He drinks out of the f–king carton and leaves the door open when he’s taking a dump!!”
“And this is when he’s at MY house!!!”
“He’s already calling me brother and has driven a wedge between myself and my real brother Wyatt who now won’t speak to me.”


"You did make me laugh," horn admitted
A video released by the sun shows that a few days before Oliver posted on instagram, a paparazzi asked Horne, 71, if he was "ready to let Brad be his son-in-law", but the actress who was robbed burst into laughter
"On Friday, January 20, Oliver Hudson joked on instagram about his sister Kate Hudson's affair with Brad Pitt."
"The 40 year old" engagement rules "alumni shared a recent photo from the cover of a star magazine, saying 37 year old Kate and 53 year old Pete are" more and more serious "and have cohabited
"Oliver was obviously amused by the tabloid rumors and wrote a long (ironic) reply to calm the outside world's speculation."
"Yes, this is hell!"
"He's as messy as S-T! "Oliver added a title to his instagram post."
"He drinks from f-king's carton and leaves the door open when he takes out the trash!"
"This is when he comes to my house!"
"He's called my brother. He's separated me from my real brother Wyatt. Now he won't talk to me."



Number  115
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here...”
“...orders Donald Trump has already issued Trump and the Trans Pacific Partnership Union leaders applaud US President Donald Trump for signing an executive order withdrawing the US from the Trans Pacific Partnership negotiations during a meeting in the Roosevelt Room of the White House in Washington DC”
“Mr Trump reinstated a ban on American financial aide being granted to non governmental organizations that provide abortion counseling provide abortion referrals or advocate for abortion access outside of the United States Getty Images The controversial orders Donald Trump has already issued Trump and the Dakota Access pipeline Opponents of...”
“...looks on in the Oval Office of the White House...”
“A signature campaign promise Mr Trump outlined his intention to build a border wall on the US Mexico border days after taking office Getty Images The controversial orders Donald Trump has already issued Trump and abortion US President Donald Trump signs an executive order as Chief of Staff Reince Priebus...”
“The number of incoming immigrants has surged ahead of the upcoming Presidential inauguration of Donald Trump, who has pledged to build a wall along the US-Mexico border.”
“...border near McAllen Texas...”
“Mr Trump issued a presidential memorandum in January announcing that the US would withdraw from the trade deal Getty The controversial orders Donald Trump has already issued Trump and the Mexico wall A US Border Patrol vehicle sits waiting for illegal immigrants at a fence opening near the US Mexico...”
“The controversial orders Donald Trump has already issued Show all 9 1 9 The controversial orders Donald Trump has already issued The controversial orders Donald Trump has already issued Trump and the media White House Press Secretary Sean Spicer takes questions during the daily press briefing Getty Images The controversial...”
“The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here Independent Culture Newsletter The best in film music TV radio straight to your inbox every week...”


"The independent would like to inform you of the offer and updates by email. Please check the box. If you would like to contact, please read our complete mailing list and agree to the terms..."
“…… Donald Trump has issued an order to trump, and the leaders of the trans Pacific Partnership union praised us president Donald Trump for signing an executive order during a meeting in the Roosevelt Room of the White House in Washington, D.C., to withdraw the United States from the trans Pacific Partnership negotiations. ”
"Trump has reinstated a ban on U.S. financial assistance to non-governmental organizations providing abortion counseling, abortion referrals outside the United States or advocacy of abortion access. Getty pictures Donald Trump has issued controversial orders to trump and opponents of access in Dakota..."
“…… Looking in the Oval Office of the White House... "
"Signed campaign commitment trump outlined his intention to build a border wall on the U.S. - Mexico border a few days after taking office Getty pictures controversial order Donald Trump has issued to trump, U.S. President Donald Trump signed an executive order to become chief of staff Raines pribas..."
"Before Donald Trump's upcoming presidential inauguration, immigration surged and he promised to build a wall on the US Mexican border."
“… The border near McCullen, Texas... "
"Trump issued a presidential memorandum in January this year announcing that the United States will withdraw from the trade agreement. Donald Trump has issued controversial orders to trump and the Mexican wall. A US border patrol car sits at the fence near the United States and Mexico waiting for illegal immigrants..."
"The controversial orders that Donald Trump has issued show all the 9-19 controversial orders. Donald Trump has issued the controversial orders. Donald Trump has issued the controversial orders. Donald Trump has issued the controversial orders Trump has issued controversial orders, Sean Spicer, White House press secretary, told the daily news
"The independent would like to inform you of the offer and updates by email. Please check the box. If you would like to contact, please read our complete mailing list. Agree terms here independent culture newsletters best movie music TV broadcast will be sent directly to your in box every week..."



Number  116
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“Kim Kardashian is no longer keeping up with her longtime assistant and right-hand woman Stephanie Shepherd — and RadarOnline.com has exclusively learned all the juicy details inside the nasty split!”
““Kim is telling people that she fired Stephanie because she lacked the mental capacity play a larger role in her brand.”
“But in actuality nothing could be further from the truth,” said source close to Shepherd, who once worked for Real Housewives of Beverly Hills star Erika Girardi and choreographer Mikey Minden.”
“According to Shepherd s pal Stephanie was tired of being talked to like she was beneath Kim and she could never do anything for herself because Kim would beg her to stay and work for days on end The breaking point came when Shepherd recently asked for a raise from...”
“...her millionaire boss the insider claimed...”
““Steph asked her for a raise, but Kim told her no.”
“She knows that there is no one that will put up with Kim’s fake B.S.”
“...more than she would!”As fans know, in recent years Shepherd became best friends with Kim’s sister Kourtney Kardashian, 38, and the two even referred to each other as “wifey” in social media shots.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"Kim Kardashian can't keep up with Stephanie Shepard, her longtime assistant and right-hand man - and RadarOnline.com The site has exclusive access to all the interesting details of the annoying split
"Kim told people that she fired Stephanie because she lacked the ability to play a more important role in the brand."
"But there's nothing more outrageous than that," said a source close to Shepard, who worked for Beverly Hills star Erica Girardi and choreographer Mickey Minden's the real housewife
"According to Shepard's friends, Stephanie is tired of talking to her and thinks she is inferior to Kim. She can never do anything for herself, because Kim will ask her to stay and work for several days. Finally, Shepard recently asked for a raise..."
“… Her millionaire boss, a person familiar with the matter, claimed that
"Stephen asked her for a raise, but Kim refused."
"She knew no one would tolerate Kim's fake bachelor's degree."
“… More than she thought! "Fans know that in recent years, Shepard and Kim Jong Un's 38 year old sister Courtney Kardashian have become best friends, and they even call each other 'wives' in social media footage."



Number  117
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Khloe seemed adamant in rejecting claims of her attempting a similar strategy.”
“Her younger sister, Kylie Jenner, has become a cosmetics mogul thanks to her artificially enhanced lips.”
“Her results could potentially be attributed to plastic surgery according to ongoing rumours.”
“Recently, her plump lips have been at the centre of this discussion.”
“Many have noticed a huge difference in the size of the public figure's lips.”
“The noise was enough for the television star to address the issue on her Instagram account.”
“The new mother acknowledged the noticeable change in her features in an IG story post.”
“"PSA I was pregnant during this entire season of KUWTK.”
“Some women get 'pregnancy lips'.”
“I was one of them.”


"Khloe seems firmly opposed to her attempt to adopt a similar strategy."
"Her sister Kylie Jenner has become a cosmetics tycoon with her artificial lips."
"According to the rumor, her result may be caused by plastic surgery."
"Recently, her plump lips have been the focus of discussion."
"A lot of people have noticed the huge difference in lip size of public figures."
"The noise is enough for the TV star to solve the problem on his instagram account."
"In a funny story post, the new mother admitted to the obvious change in her appearance."
"Throughout Kurt's season, I was pregnant."
"Some women have" pregnant lips. "
"I'm one of them."



Number  118
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Comey testimony: 4 other times the ex-FBI director starred in unusual public dramas...”
“Key takeaways from the James Comey testimonyOur favorite details from the written Comey testimonyFired U.S. attorney Preet Bharara attends the Comey hearing'House of Cards' tweets Frank Underwood gif during Comey hearingFiring James Comey: Was it President Trump's greatest miscalculation?”
“But Donald Jr. is.”
“News from today's hearing:President Trump is not tweeting about the Comey hearing.”
“I hope you can let this go.’’Here is how we'll be providing coverage today:Here are live updates on today's hearingWe are live tweeting the here: @usatodayDCWe are also live streaming on Facebook at this post.”
““He is a good guy.”
““I hope you can see your way clear to letting this go,’’ Comey said, quoting the president.”
“Comey describes one meeting at the White House in which he said Trump strongly defended Flynn, saying that his former national security adviser “hadn’t done anything wrong’’ in his prior contact with Russian ambassador Sergey Kislyak.”
“Comey confirmed Wednesday that President Trump requested his loyalty and later urged him to drop the investigation into ex-national security adviser Michael Flynn, according to a preview of his opening statement.”
“President Trump's attorney Marc Kasowitz will deliver comments at the National Press Club.”


"COMEY's testimony: four other times the former FBI director played an unusual public play..."
"The key points of James COMEY's testimony your favorite details come from the written testimony of COMEY. American lawyer Pratt bharara attended the COMEY hearing. Frank Underwood fired James COMEY at the COMEY hearing: is this Trump's biggest misjudgment?"
"But little Donald is."
"Today's News hearing: President trump didn't tweet about the Komi hearing."
"I hope you can put it down." Here's how we're going to provide insurance today: Here's a live update for today's hearing, which we live on Twitter: @ usatodaydcwe also live on Facebook
"He's a good man."
"I hope you can see clearly the way to let this go," he quoted the president as saying
"Komi described a meeting at the white house where he said trump strongly defended Flynn, saying his former national security adviser had" done nothing wrong "in his previous contact with Russian ambassador Sergei Kislyak
"COMEY confirmed on Wednesday that President trump demanded his allegiance and later urged him to abandon the investigation of former national security adviser Michael Flynn, according to his opening remarks."
"Mark kasowitz, President Trump's lawyer, will comment at the National Press Club."



Number  119
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She’s really bummed out,’ another insider told us about Kylie.”
“Advertisement‘She is at a very low point right now.”
“The pregnancy body is scaring her so much that she refuses to leave the house.”
“Similarly, Kylie Jenner is also expecting her first child, rumors say and is terrified of how much weight she has gained.”
“In addition, Khloe has been suffering horrible morning sickness all throughout her first trimester and also often complains about her hair thinning to pals.”
“She cannot wait for this pregnancy to be over and done with,’ the insider added.”
“‘There is the body-shaming, which has been off the charts lately.”
“Khloe, who’s struggled with her body image and weight in the past is also devastated reading mean comments from fans that make fun of her curvier figure now that she is expecting.”
“She is lonely being away from her family,’ one source close to the Kardashian family revealed.”
“‘Her anxiety is going from bad to worse.”


"She's really upset," another insider told us about Kelly
"She's at a very low point now."
"Her pregnant body scared her out of the door."
"Similarly, Kelly Jenner is pregnant with her first child, and it's rumored that she's afraid of how much weight she's gained."
In addition, Khloe suffered terrible morning sickness during her first three months of pregnancy, and she often complained that her hair was thinning
"She can't wait to end the pregnancy," the person familiar with the matter added
"It's an act of physical humiliation, which has recently been excluded."
"Khloe used to struggle with her figure and weight, and now she's sad to see fans' harsh comments on her curvy figure."
A source close to the Kardashian family said: "she was very lonely to leave her family."
"Her anxiety is going from bad to worse."



Number  120
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Do you think they’re in it for the long haul?”
““Jamie and Katie have been talking at great length about having a child together,” a source for the magazine recently told the publication.”
“Looks like Katie Holmes, 39, and Jamie Foxx, 50, may be more serious than fans previously thought!”
“While the couple had kept their relationship hidden for years, the two stepped out as a duo just last year.”
“Since then, they’ve been spotted out and about together in public on multiple occasions — including making a big splash sitting side-by-side at Clive Davis’ pre-Grammy gala in NYC on Jan. 27.”
“From the photos, Katie and Jamie looked happier than ever, and a new report claims that could be because they’re FINALLY on the same page about wanting to start a family together!”
“Click here to see adorable pics of Katie Holmes with her daughter Suri Cruise.”
“Although it reportedly took some time for Katie to be on board, she apparently feels ready to have a baby with her new man — at least according to Life & Style magazine.”
““He’s crazy about her and thinks they’ll have an adorable baby.” In fact, some witnesses at the gala last month allegedly think Katie could actually already be expecting.”
“Tell us, HollywoodLifers — would you love to see Jamie and Katie have a child together?”


"Do you think they will be involved for a long time?"
"Jamie and Katie have been talking about having a child together," a source for the magazine recently told the publication
"It looks like Katie Holmes, 39, and Jamie fox, 50, may be more serious than fans thought before!"
"Although the couple have been hiding their relationship for years, just last year, they came out as a couple."
"Since then, they have been found together in public many times - including Clive Davis sitting side by side at the Grammy Awards in New York on January 27."
"From the photos, Katie and Jamie look happier than ever, and a new report says it may be that they have finally reached a consensus on how to form a family together!"
"Click here to see a lovely picture of Katie Holmes and her daughter Suri cruise."
"Although it was reported that it took Katie some time to get on the plane, she clearly felt ready to have a baby with her new boyfriend - at least according to life and fashion magazine."
"He was fascinated by her and thought they would have a lovely child." In fact, some witnesses at last month's party claimed that Katie might be pregnant
"Tell us, Hollywood stars - would you like to see Jamie and Katie have a baby together?"



Number  121
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“An insider quoted by the publication said that Aniston’s and Theroux’s relationship “has been crumbling,” and Pitt’s ability to console Jennifer while she’s vulnerable reportedly has made her marriage to Justin even more troubled.”
“According to the Hollywood Gossip, Jennifer’s marriage to Justin was in trouble even before her alleged reunion with Brad.”
“After Angelina Jolie filed for divorce from Brad Pitt, Twitter found entertainment in imagining Jennifer Aniston’s glee.”
“Jolie had reportedly been at least partly responsible for causing Jennifer and Brad’s split, leading some to speculate that Aniston felt gleeful over the crumbling of Pitt’s second marriage.”
“In recent months, however, the relationship between Jennifer and Brad reportedly has changed.”
“Even though Aniston is now married to Justin Theroux, Jennifer allegedly just “can’t let go” of Pitt, and it’s rumored to be destroying her romance with Justin, as the Inquisitr reported.”
“Now, Jennifer and Brad have gone from a platonic reunion to a rekindled romance, according to a new report.”
“Brad Pitt Jennifer Aniston Always In Love Yahoo quoted an insider s claim that Brad and Jennifer have always been in love Recalling the era when Pitt and Aniston were Hollywood s golden couple the source said that Jennifer and Brad have continued to have feelings for each other despite...”
“...her marriage to Justin Theroux and his marriage to Angelina Jolie...”
“They were once the golden couple of Hollywood and apparently Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston still hold a soft spot in their hearts for one another Quoting Woman s Day magazine Yahoo reported that Pitt and Aniston recently just happened to encounter each other in Los Angeles during Jennifer s...”


The paper quoted an insider as saying Aniston's relationship with Cyrus "has been collapsing" and that Pitt was reported to have been able to comfort her when she was vulnerable, which made her marriage with Justin more difficult
According to Hollywood gossip, Jennifer and Justin's marriage was in trouble even before her reunion with Brad
After Angelina Jolie and Brad Pitt divorced, twitter found pleasure in imagining the joy of Jennifer Aniston
"It has been reported that Julie is at least partly responsible for the breakup of Jennifer and Brad, which has led some to speculate that Aniston is happy with the breakdown of Pitt's second marriage."
"However, in recent months, it has been reported that the relationship between Jennifer and Brad has changed."
"Although Aniston is now married to Justin seru, Jennifer is said to be just" unable to let go "of Pete, and according to the prosecutor, it will ruin her romance with Justin."
According to the latest report, now, Jennifer and Brad have gone from a Platonic reunion to a renewed romance
"Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston have always been in love. Yahoo quoted an insider as saying that Brad and Jennifer have always been in love. Recalling the time when Pitt and Aniston were Hollywood golden couple, the source said that Jennifer and Brad continue to have feelings for each other, although..."
“… Her marriage to Justin seru and his marriage to Angelina Jolie... "
"They used to be Hollywood's golden couple, and obviously Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston still have a crush on each other," Yahoo quoted women's Day magazine as saying. Pitt and Aniston recently happened to be in Jennifer s



Number  122
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That never happened, and this latest article speculating the reality star already gave birth is equally inaccurate.”
“Last month, Gossip Cop busted the unreliable outlet for falsely claiming that Kardashian had been rushed to the hospital with pregnancy complications.”
“Gossip Cop can debunk this claim.”
“We’re told the reality star hasn’t had her baby just yet.”
“An article posted on OK!’s website on Thursday theorizes that Kardashian has given birth because she hasn’t posted a selfie in nearly a week.”
“The reality star actually did post a photo of herself Sunday on Easter, but the site baselessly speculates it’s an old picture.”
“The unreliable tabloid goes on to say it’s “suspicious” that Kardashian wasn’t at her family’s Easter party over the weekend.”
““It’s definitely strange for her to miss the big event,” adds the publication.”
“Actually, it’s not.”
“Kardashian is currently in Cleveland, where her boyfriend Tristan Thompson lives and where she plans to give birth.”


"This has never happened, and this latest article that speculates that reality TV stars have given birth is equally inaccurate."
"Last month, gossip police exposed this unreliable channel because it falsely claimed that Kardashian was rushed to hospital due to pregnancy complications."
"The gossip police can debunk this statement."
"We heard that reality TV stars haven't had children yet."
"Just post an article on the Internet! On Thursday, Kardashian's website speculated that Kardashian had given birth because she hadn't released a selfie for nearly a week
"The reality star did post a photo of himself on Easter Sunday, but the website has no basis in guessing that it is an old photo."
The unreliable tabloid went on to say that it was "suspicious" that Kardashian did not attend her family's Easter party at the weekend
"It's absolutely strange for her to miss the event," the magazine added
"Not really."
"Kardashian is currently in Cleveland, where her boyfriend Tristan Thompson lives, and she plans to give birth there."



Number  123
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“#yesiamcrying #emotional x.”Something tells me Posh and Becks will have absolutely zero qualms with their bb returning home to them, tho!”
“We love you so much and will miss you.”
“Amazing A level results and off to college.”
““We are all so proud of you Brooklyn.”
“...shared a sweet congratulatory message on social media...”
“He was offered work with a prestigious photographer and couldn t say no READ MORE Watch Brooklyn Beckham Surprise David For His Birthday Just Try Not To Cry When Brooklyn started college in New York City last year his parents...”
““He hasn’t quit, he’s just deferred his place so he can do an internship back in the UK,” another unnamed source said.”
“...alleging that the move was prompted by an internship offer that was too sick to turn down...”
“He adores his family in the end it was the lure to come back to them all that swung it and the prospect of a terrific internship Meanwhile a report from The Sun has denied claims of Brooklyn being homesick...”
““It sounds as if he was truly homesick and was feeling lonely out there,” a source told the publication.”


"Yes, emotional X." something tells me that bosh and Beck will never be upset about their BB coming home, tho! "
"We love you so much, we'll miss you."
"Amazing A-levels and opportunities to go to college."
"We're all proud of you, Brooklyn."
“… Shared a sweet congratulatory message on social media... "
"He got a job as a famous photographer. He can't say no, read more books and watch David's birthday surprise from Brooklyn David. Last year, Brooklyn tried not to cry when he was at University in New York. His parents..."
Another source, who did not want to be named, said: "he did not resign. He just delayed his internship so that he could return to the UK for internship."
“… Claiming that the move was caused by a terminally ill internship... "
"He adores his family, and finally the temptation to come back to them, all of which has changed him, and there is a great prospect of internships. Meanwhile, a report in the sun denied that Brooklyn was homesick... "
"It sounds like he's really homesick and lonely outside," a source told the Wall Street Journal



Number  124
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments section.”
“Source: BACKGRIDWhat are your thoughts on Kendall giving her friends an ultimatum?”
“The beauty “refuses” to distance herself from Taylor, which could spell t-r-o-u-b-l-e. No one wants to get one a Kardashian’s bad side!”
“...and it s none other than Selena Gomez...”
“She s made it clear that anyone listening or supporting Taylor will be banned from her circle instantly and the likes of Gigi Bella and Cara are all doing as they re told Article continues below advertisement Source BACKGRID But one of their mutual friends is caught in the middle...”
“Source: BACKGRIDThe source adds, “Since Taylor’s been in hiding Kendall’s very much the queen bee these days, so what she says goes for the majority of that group.”
“...receipts and will edit them too which of course is a reference to her belief that Kim edited audio she released last year claiming Taylor approved of Kanye referring to her as a b and saying he made her famous in his single Famous...”
“Taylor or ever listen to her music after she dissed Kanye West and Kim in her latest music video Look What You Made Me Do Article continues below advertisement Source BACKGRID At the end of the video Taylor clad in leopard holds up a phone and says she s getting...”
“Article continues below advertisement Source BACKGRID An insider says There s no love lost between Taylor and Kendall these days and what makes it super awkward is the fact they share so many friends Source BACKGRID Of course the Kardashians are not trying to be in the same room as...”
“The supermodel is letting all her A-lister pals know, ban Taylor Swift’s music or there will be bad blood!”


"Please let us know in the comments section."
"Source: BACKGROUND: what do you think of Kendall's ultimatum to her friends?"
"Beauty" refused to "keep a distance from Taylor", which may mean t-r-o-u-b-l-e. No one wants the bad side of Kardashian! "
“… It's no one else. It's Serena Gomez... "
"She made it clear that anyone who listens to or supports Taylor will be immediately banned from her circle, while Gigi Bella and Kara are doing it, and as they said, they continue to do it in the case of backward advertising sources, but one of their mutual friends is caught in the middle..."
Source: backgrid the source added: "since Taylor has been hiding Kendall's very queen bee these days, she's talking about most groups."
“… Receipt and will edit them too, which of course means that she believes that Kim edited the audio, which she released last year claiming Taylor approved Kanye mentioning her as a B and saying he made her famous in his single... "
"After Taylor or had heard her music, she dissed Kanye West and Kim in her latest music video to see the article you asked me to do, continue the following advertising source backgrid. At the end of the video, Taylor dressed in a leopard picked up the phone and said, she got..."
"The article continues with the following advertising source backgrid. An insider said that Taylor and Kendall have not lost their love, but what makes them super embarrassed is that they share so many friends. Of course, Kardashian does not try to be in the same room as..."
"The supermodel is letting all her first-line star friends know that Taylor Swift's music will be banned, otherwise there will be vicious blood!"



Number  125
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...rating: 0”
“This latest article from the untrustworthy publication is similarly untrue.”
“Gossip Cop recently called out the tabloid for making up a story about Clooney loving his wife Amal’s “pregnancy curves.” We also busted the outlet after it concocted a tall tale about Clooney’s baby boy peeing in his face during a diaper change.”
“...of fiction comes as no surprise...”
“Regardless of how absurd the tabloid s story sounds Gossip Cop still checked in with a source close to the situation who laughed off the report before assuring us it s false Unfortunately the Enquirer has a habit of publishing phony reports about the movie star so this latest piece...”
“...free time with a young actor he doesn t know...”
“It s getting annoying The seemingly phony source adds Kit s home is too far to take a boat thank goodness or else George would probably row by Of course Clooney has a wife and newborn twins at home so it seems very unlikely he s looking to spend his...”
“He doesn’t want to be George’s buddy, but George keeps begging him to come away on a motorbike tour.”
“Kit doesn’t want to be his new pal.”The outlet’s dubious insider goes on to say Harington is trying to avoid the Hollywood scene, adding, “Kit’s mind is pretty made up.”
“A supposed “source” tells the magazine, “George has been pestering Kit with invites to his mansions in Berkshire and Lake Como – but he’s in for disappointment.”


“… Level: 0 "
"This latest article from an untrustworthy publication is also untrue."
Gossip police recently accused the tabloid of fabricating a "pregnancy curve" about Clooney's love for his wife Amar. We also smashed the tabloid because it made up a story about Clooney's baby boy peeing on his face while changing his diaper
“… The emergence of novels is not surprising... "
"No matter how ridiculous the tabloid story sounds, the gossip police report it to an insider who laughs at the report and assures us it's fake. Unfortunately, investigators have a habit of publishing false reports about the movie star, so this latest report... "
“… With a young actor he didn't know. "
"It's getting more and more annoying. The seemingly false source added that kit's home is too far away to take a boat. Thank God, otherwise George might row a boat. Of course, Clooney's family has a wife and newborn twins, so it seems that he is unlikely to spend his money on..."
"He didn't want to be George's partner, but George kept asking him to travel by motorcycle."
"Kit didn't want to be his new friend." The media's suspicious insider went on to say that Harrington was trying to avoid the Hollywood scene, adding that "KITT's mind is set."
A so-called "source" told the magazine, "George has been pestering KITT to invite him to his mansion in Berkshire and Lake Como, but he will be disappointed."



Number  126
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And that woman isn’t Gwen.” In the meantime, we’ll all remain hopeful that the woman can be Miranda — again!”
““But Blake has drastically slowed regular communication with her.”Following his increased frustrations with Gwen, a source close to Blake says “he’s “just a simple, country guy who wants his family and his woman by his side.”
“And the timing could not be better — as Blake is going through his own breakup from his now-ex, Gwen Stefani.”
““Miranda reached out to Blake via text,” a source close to the former spouses tells In Touch exclusively.”
““Ultimately, they buried the hatchet and have been supporting each other through their latest troubled relationships.”
“They’ve become close friends and allies over the past month or so.”It’s a future that no one could’ve imagined for the exes, who were married for five years before calling it quits in 2015.”
“At that time it seemed unlikely that the two would ever reconcile but now that the time has been able to pass the two have become each other s closest allies and those closest to them say even a romantic...”
“...reunion isn t totally out of the question...”
““They have developed into close confidantes and are sharing intimate details of their lives,” the source adds exclusively.”
“It turns out the timing for their reunion could not have been more perfect.”


"That woman is not Gwen." At the same time, we all hope that that woman will be Miranda again! "
"But Blake has greatly slowed down his daily communication with Gwen." After his growing dissatisfaction with Gwen, a source close to Blake said, "he's just a simple countryman who wants his family and his women by his side."
"And the timing couldn't be better - because Blake is going through a breakup with his current ex girlfriend Gwen Stephanie."
"Miranda got in touch with black via text message," a source close to her ex spouse told contact exclusive
"In the end, they foreshadowed each other through their recent troubled relationship."
"In the past month or so, they have become close friends and allies." No one can imagine the future of their ex-wives, who broke up in 2015 after five years of marriage
"At that time, it seemed impossible for them to reconcile, but now that time has passed, they have become their closest allies. The closest people even say that they are romantic..."
“… Reunion is not totally impossible... "
"They have developed into intimate confidants and shared intimate details of their lives," the source added
"It turns out the perfect time for them to get together."



Number  127
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Tell us below!”
““Angelina has filed for dissolution of the marriage,” Robert Offer, Angelina’s entertainment attorney, said in a statement on Sept. 20, per Harper’s Bazaar.”
“Here, take a look at the papers in which she shockingly asks for no spousal or child support.”
“Just hours after it was revealed that Angelina, 41, filed for divorce from Brad, 52, on Sept. 20, HollywoodLife.com obtained the divorce papers that laid out exactly what Angie is asking for as she’s ending her marriage of just over two years.”
“Angelina cites “irreconcilable differences” in the 11-page divorce papers.”
“But, she makes no demands for child support for their six children, nor any support for herself.”
“She is, however, asking for full physical custody of the couple’s children, Shiloh, Knox, Vivienne, Zahara, Maddox, and Pax, and joint legal custody.”
“She’s also released a statement through her lawyer giving her reason for ending the marriage.”
““This decision was made for the health of the family.”
“Do you find it shocking that she doesn’t want any spousal or child support?”


"Tell us next!"
"Angelina has applied for dissolution of her marriage," said Robert ove, Angelina's entertainment lawyer, in a statement on September 20
"Here, take a look at the documents that she amazingly asked for without spouse or child support."
"Just hours after the news that Angelina, 41, and Brad, 52, filed for divorce on September 20 came to light, Hollywood life.com got the divorce document, which said Angie's request when she ended her more than two-year marriage."
Angelina quoted "irreconcilable differences" in her 11 page divorce document
"But she didn't ask for the alimony of their six children, and she didn't ask for her own alimony."
"However, she claims full physical custody of the couple's children Shiloh, Knox, Vivienne, Zahara, Maddox and Pax, as well as joint legal custody."
"She also issued a statement through her lawyer explaining the reasons for ending the marriage."
"The decision is for the health of the family."
"Are you shocked that she doesn't need any spouse or children to support her?"



Number  128
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out this amazing pictures of the place.”
“Here are some deets:The penthouse is located at 432 Park Avenue — also known as the tallest residential building in Manhattan.”
“Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez, however, isn’t your average couple moving in together, so when they do — they do it big.”
“The couple — who’ve been hot and heavy for a year now, are taking their relationship to the next level by purchasing a penthouse together.”
“While the couple have been basically living together at Jennifer’s house in Los Angeles, they have now gone in on something as a real committed unit.”
“It’s being reported that J.Lo and A.Rod have been thinking of moving in together for a few months now.”
“Jennifer put up her previous penthouse ( $27 million!)”
“...on the market in October.”
“So what’s up with the new place?”
“It cost the couple a whopping $15.32 million (why does it sound like a step down from her previous place?).”


"Look at the pictures of this amazing place."
"Here's some Dietz: the top floor at 432 Park Avenue, also known as Manhattan's tallest residential building
"However, Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez are not ordinary couples who move in, so when they move in, they will have a big fight."
"The couple, who have been hot and heavy for a year, bought a loft together, taking their relationship to a new level."
"Although the couple have basically been living with Jennifer in Los Angeles, they have now become a truly loyal unit."
"It is reported that Luo Guancong and rod have been considering cohabitation for several months."
"Jennifer built her old penthouse (27 million dollars!)"
“…… In October. "
"What happened to this new place?"
"It cost the couple $15.32 million (why does it sound like a step lower than where she used to live?)."



Number  129
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Simpson was paroled from jail in October 2017.”
“He served his sentence at the Lovelock Correctional Center near Lovelock, Nevada.”
“For years, rumors have followed Kardashian that O.J.”
“Simpson is her biological father.”
“It was alleged that Kris Jenner carried on a secret affair with the former pro-football player during her marriage to Simpson’s lawyer, Robert Kardashian.”
“Jenner admitted in her book, Kris Jenner and All Things Kardashian, to an affair around the time Kardashian was conceived.”
“Sources tell Radar Online that Simpson is demanding to see his new “granddaughter.” This allegation has not been confirmed by either the Kardashian clan or Simpson himself.”
“During a 2012 episode of Keeping Up with the Kardashians, Kris asked if her daughter would take a DNA test regarding her true paternity; Kardashian refused.”
““Seriously, my dad is Robert Kardashian.”
“My other dad is Bruce Jenner Khloe reeled continuing to her mother If you f ed other people during the same time and you do not know go on Maury Kim Kardashian later approached her sister and told her that their mother was upset by her reluctance to take the...”


"Simpson was released on parole in October 2017."
He was serving time at the Lovelock correctional center near Lovelock, Nevada
"Over the years, Kardashian said O.J
"Simpson is her biological father."
Chris Jenner is said to have had a secret relationship with the former professional footballer while he was married to Simpson's lawyer, Robert Kardashian
In her book all about Chris Jenner and Kardashian, Jenner admits Kardashian's relationship before and after her pregnancy
A source told radar online that Simpson asked to see his new "granddaughter.". The charge has not been confirmed by the Kardashian family or Simpson himself
"In" keep in touch with the kardashians "in 2012, Chris asked her daughter if she would accept a DNA test about her real father's identity; Kardashian refused."
"Seriously, my father is Robert Kardashian."
"My other father is Bruce Jenner helo. If you cheat other people at the same time, he will continue to tell her mother that you don't know what to do. Morrie King Kardashian later found her sister and told her that their mother didn't want to accept it because she didn't want to



Number  130
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She’s all about Travis again.””
“She hasn’t talked abut him once since Travis gave her this car.”
“However, it ‘didn’t take long’ for her to change her mind.”
“Find out what pushed her over the edge!”
“Looks like Kylie Jenner, 20, has gotten off her high horse about not wanting help with her baby daughter Stormi Webster!”
“During her pregnancy, the makeup mogul insisted she would raise her child on her own without ANY nannies, but since the baby’s birth, Kylie has found herself in over her head.”
“As a result, she’s hired a significant amount of help — cue the I-told-you-so’s!”
“But hey, at least the 20-year-old can admit when she’s wrong, right?”
“Click here to see adorable pics of baby Stormi.”
““Kylie had every intention of raising Stormi without nannies but it didn’t take very long for her to admit that she needs help,” a source close to Kylie shared with HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”


"She's starting to care about Travis again."
"She hasn't spoken to Travis once since he gave her the car."
"But it wasn't long before she changed her mind."
"Find out what pushed her to the edge of the cliff!"
"It looks like Kelly Jenner, 20, has put off her airs because she doesn't want to help her little daughter, Tommy Webster!"
"During her pregnancy, the make-up tycoon insisted that she would raise her baby without a babysitter, but since the baby was born, Kelly has found herself in a dilemma."
"As a result, she hired a lot of helpers - suggesting that I told you!"
"But hey, at least 20-year-old girls can admit they're wrong, right?"
"Click here to see a lovely picture of baby Tommy."
"Kelly intended to raise Tommy without a babysitter, but it wasn't long before she admitted that she needed help," a source close to Kelly told reporters



Number  131
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He also in the fall signed with CAA after a three-decade run at UTA.”
“Of course, Pirates Of The Caribbean: Dead Men Tell No Tales bows worldwide May 26.”
“He recently shot Open Road’s cop drama LAbyrinth, joined 20th Century Fox’s Murder On The Orient Express, and will co-star in Warner Bros’ follow-up to Fantastic Beasts And Where To Find Them.”
“Depp, recently in the courts for his high-profile divorce from Amber Heard last summer, is plenty busy.”
“In addition to the more than $25 million sought in compensatory damages, the suit asks for a temporary restraining order and permanent injunction enjoining the Defendants from proceeding with the foreclosure on the home.”
“...on Depp s primary home through a loan the actor says came from TMG s own self dealing...”
“It was only recently when Mr Depp terminated TMG and hired new business management and accounting services when Mr Depp learned the gravity of his financial losses and some but surely not all of the underlying facts the complain states bluntly also adding that the management firm is seeking foreclosure...”
““TMG’s gross mismanagement and fraud remained undetected as TMG borrowed millions of dollars to survive from movie-to-movie,” add the filing.”
““In essence, TMG treated Mr. Depp’s income as their own, available to either TMG or third parties to draw upon as desired,” read the complaint filed by attorneys at Los Angeles-based Manatt, Phelps & Phillips, LLC.”
“...s authorization or proper documentation...”


"After 30 years at UTA, he also signed with CAA in the fall."
"Of course, Pirates of the Caribbean: dead people around the world don't tell stories and bow on May 26."
"He recently filmed the open road police drama labyrinth, added the murder of 20th century fox to orient express, and will co star in Warner Bros.'s monster chase 'and' where can I find them '"
"Depp recently appeared in court for her high-profile divorce from amber last summer. She is very busy."
"In addition to claiming more than $25 million in damages, the lawsuit also calls for temporary restraining orders and permanent injunctions to prohibit the defendant from continuing to foreclose his home."
“… In Depp's main home, through loans, the actor said, "from TMG's own self dealing..."
"It was only recently when Mr. Depp terminated TMG and hired new business management and accounting services that Mr. Depp realized the seriousness of his financial losses and some, but certainly not all, underlying facts. The complaint also said bluntly that the management company was seeking foreclosure..."
"TMG's serious mismanagement and fraud remains undetected because TMG borrowed millions of dollars to survive from one film to another," the document added
"In essence, TMG regards Mr. Depp's income as its own, which can be used by TMG or a third party as needed," wrote a complaint filed by lawyers for manatt, Phelps & Phillips, LLC, in Los Angeles
“… Authorization or appropriate document... "



Number  132
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You can read about that here if you so wish.”
“Katie met her mystery friend for dinner at trendy restaurant Nomad in New York.”
“Someone's looking hawt after their post-break-up make-over!”
“Gone are the bad jeans and the 'Mummy tops'.”
“Newly-single Katie Holmes had a whole new look when she went out for dinner last night.”
“And we like it!”
“Wearing a sexy black leather jacket and an elegant green maxi-dress, all glammed up with a boxy clutch-bag, Katie looked the best we've seen her for ages.”
“Single life obviously suits her.”
“And even gave him a peck on the cheek as he put her in a taxi at the end of the night.”
“She took a break from the designer frocks and heels and went out in, um, a blanket the other day.”


"You can read it here if you like."
"Katie is having dinner with her mystery friend at the trendy New York restaurant nomad."
"Someone's dressing up after breaking up!"
"Bad jeans and mummy tops are gone forever."
"Katie Holmes, who has just been single, went out for dinner last night and looked fresh."
"We love it!"
"Katie looks like the best we've ever seen in her sexy black leather jacket, elegant green dress and square handbag."
"Single life obviously suits her."
"When he took her to the taxi at night, he even pecked him on the cheek."
"The other day, she took a break from the designer's dress and high heels and went out in a blanket."



Number  133
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Give “Higher” a spin.”
“Skeptical?”
“...the form as they come...”
“The forthcoming God s Favorite Customer is a batch of clever silly love songs like Disappointing Diamonds Are the Rarest of Them All and gutting confessionals like Please Don t Die CJ Natalie Prass The Future and the Past June 1 Natalie Prass is a singer songwriter as true to...”
“He can be a ham off record, but in song, he is a humorist whose preening nihilism is a mirror on the principal absurdity of being alive right now, and whose earnest moments deal in heartbreaking sentimentality.”
“—Frank GuanFather John Misty, God’s Favorite Customer (June 1)If Father John Misty could cut back on his antics long enough to let his music speak for itself, he might enjoy a reputation as one of the sharper singer-songwriters working today.”
“Here’s hoping that Daytona’s Ye-curated beats and Push’s hallmark coke-rap lyrics are enough to stem the drought.”
“To be sure, the ex-Clipse rapper has had his hands full since being named head of GOOD Music (just imagine having to field responses to Kanye’s recent antics), but he’s long overdue for a collection of his own quality sound.”
“...old at this point...”
“The sequel to Pusha T s 2013 solo debut My Name Is My Name has been awaited for so long that many a fan might have forgotten to await it any longer even the brief prelude album Darkest Before Dawn that Push released to tide listeners over is three years...”


Give "higher" a spin
"Doubt?"
“… What they looked like when they came... "
"The coming God's favorite customers are a group of smart and stupid love songs, like disappointing diamonds are among the rarest, like please don't die CJ Natalie Plath future and past June 1 Natalie Plath is a real singer songwriter..."
"He can be a person without record, but in the song, he is a humorist, his artificial nihilism is a mirror reflecting the main absurdity of living at present, and his sincere moment shows heartbreaking sentimentality."
"God's favorite customer, Father John misty (June 1) if Father John misty could reduce the time for antics and let his music speak for him, he might have a reputation as one of the more acute singers and songwriters working today."
"I hope the beat of Daytona's yecezhan and pushy's iconic Cola rap lyrics are enough to stop the drought."
"To be sure, the former" silhouette "rapper has been very busy since he was named" the head of good music "(imagine that his recent antics have had to arouse the audience's reaction), but he should have prepared for his sound quality collection long ago."
“… Old at this point... "
"The sequel to Pusat's 2013 debut album" my name is my name "has been waiting so long that many fans may have forgotten to wait for it. Even Pusat's short overture album" the darkest before dawn "for trendsetters has been three years..."



Number  134
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The former couple has settled their divorce case, ET has learned.”
“A judgement was filed on Aug. 9 to finalize the divorce, however, a judge has not signed off or officially approved the judgement, meaning the pair is still not yet officially divorced.”
“According to TMZ, who was first to report the news, the two -- who didn't have a prenup -- have reached a property settlement and agreed to joint custody of their three kids, Violet, 12, Seraphina, 9, and Samuel, 6.”
“ET has reached out to both Affleck and Garner's reps.”
“The news comes two weeks after ET learned that Garner and Affleck's divorce case was on the verge of being dismissed.”
“The notice was the actress' third notice of case review from a judge, who requested that she take action immediately.”
“Garner and Affleck announced their separation in 2015, and filed for divorce last April.”
“Despite their split, the former pair have remained on good terms as they continue to co-parent their kids.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
According to ET, the former couple have settled their divorce
"On August 9, a decision was made to finalize the divorce, but the judge has not yet signed or formally approved the decision, which means that the two have not yet formally divorced."
"According to TMZ, who first reported the news, the two - they didn't have a prenuptial agreement - have reached a property agreement and agreed to raise their three children together, violet, 12, Serafina, 9, and Samuel, 6."
"Et has contacted representatives of Affleck and Ghana."
"Two weeks ago, et learned that the divorce case between Ghana and Affleck was about to be rejected."
"This is the third time the actress has received a case review notice from the judge, who asked her to take immediate action."
"Ghana and Affleck announced their separation in 2015 and filed for divorce last April."
"Despite the breakup, the first two have maintained a good relationship because they continue to raise their children together."



Number  135
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Duchess of Sussex’s former Suits costar (and onscreen love interest) Patrick J. Adams also made the guest list, but posted a special message for the bride the night before.”
““Ready for my friend’s wedding,” tweeted the tennis superstar.”
“Prior to the nuptials, Markle’s friend Serena Williams tweeted out a few shots of her and hubby Alex Ohanian all decked out in their formal attire.”
“George Clooney, Oprah Winfrey, and Sir Elton John were just a few of the many celebs in attendance to witness the blessed event.”
“The beautiful ceremony was unlike any other in British royal history — and it was star-studded.”
“Prince Harry and Meghan Markle tied the knot on Saturday in front of 600 guests at St. George’s Chapel in Windsor, England.”


"The Duchess of Sussex's former suit partner, Patrick J. Adams, was also on the guest list, but released a special message for the bride the night before yesterday."
"I'm ready for my friend's wedding," the tennis superstar tweeted
Prior to the wedding, Marcel's friend Serena Williams tweeted photos of her and her husband Alex o'hanian in formal clothes
George Clooney, Oprah Winfrey and Sir Elton John are just one of the many celebrities present to witness the event
"This beautiful ceremony is different from any other in the history of the British royal family - and the stars are shining."
Prince Harry and Megan markel married 600 guests at St George's Church in Windsor on Saturday



Number  136
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...her kids have no idea their parents are celebrities...”
“Image zoom Chicago West and Kim Kardashian West Credit Kim Kardashian Instagram RELATED VIDEO Kim Kardashian West Takes Saint and North to Disneyland See the Cute Mommy and Me Snaps Despite the reality star and her husband Kanye West s immense degree of fame the mother of three says that...”
“Watch the full special Born Kardashian streaming now on PeopleTV.com, or download the PeopleTV app on your favorite device.”
““Welcome to the good life…” Kardashian West captioned the adorable photo.”
“In the image, her daughter North, 5, clowns around in bed while snuggling with Saint and Chicago.”
“Earlier this month, she also shared a sweet family photo featuring all of her children.”
“...with love...”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter Image zoom Chicago West Credit Kim Kardashian Instagram The Keeping Up with the Kardashians star previously gave her fans a glimpse of her youngest daughter last week as she showered her daughter and 2 year old son Saint...”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Eventually, the child’s gaze settles on the camera, letting the KKW Beauty mogul get a good shot of her daughter’s adorable face.”


“… Her children don't know their parents are celebrities... "
"Image zooming Chicago West and Kim Kardashian West credit Kim Kardashian instagram related video Kim Kardashian west takes saints and north to Disneyland to see the lovely mother and me snapshot despite the huge fame of reality TV star and her husband Kanye West, mother of three said..."
"Now watch the full special birth Kardashian stream people's TV network, or download the peopletv app on your favorite device. “
"Welcome to a better life..." Kardashian West wrote an inscription for this lovely picture
In this photo, her 5-year-old daughter, north, plays a clown in bed, nestling up to the saints and Chicago
"Earlier this month, she also shared a sweet family photo of all her children."
“… With love... "
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter photo zooming Chicago West credit card instagram. Last week, the Kardashian star showed her little daughter to her fans as she bathed her daughter and her 2-year-old son, Saint... "
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Finally, the child's eyes fell on the camera, let the kkw beauty tycoon take a good picture of her daughter's lovely face."



Number  137
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Daily Mail reports that the two have met up for dinner dates after meeting in the New York art scene, but Theroux insists they're just friends.”
“Neither have confirmed, let alone responded to, the dating gossip yet.”
“But Theroux, 46, did previously share a photo with Collins, 25, last month on Instagram.”
“(They also follow each other on the app.)”
“Both wear Adam Selman graphic tees in the faceless post, and Collins is tagged.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Despite the suspicions, details on the two's relationship—platonic or not—remain clouded.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
The Daily Mail reported that the two met for dinner after meeting in the art world in New York, but Theroux insisted they were just friends
"Neither of them has been confirmed, let alone responding to dating gossip."
"But seru, 46, did share a photo with Collins, 25, on instagram last month."
"(they also track each other on the app.)
"Both of them were wearing Adam Salman T-shirts, and Collins was tagged on the faceless column."
"This content was imported from instagram."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"Despite some doubts, the details of the relationship remain unclear."



Number  138
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“13 weeks, 12 lbs!”
“Check with your doctor but probably fine… .”
“Raised in Savannah, Georgia, she’s friendly with the director Wes Anderson, who named The Royal Tenenbaums and the Gwyneth Paltrow character after Margot and her family.”
“She’s exuberant and witty and sexy, managing to look like those Citizens of Humanity jeans aren’t fashiony but her own brilliant discovery, and she seems to know everybody.”
“Beyond that, Tenenbaum is the kind of New York woman other New York women get girl-crushes on.”
“Though, at 38, she’s had “chubby periods,” for the past seven years or so, she’s been happy with her size-8 self (that’s at Barneys or Jeffrey, she clarifies; size 6 at Old Navy).”
“I’m thinking, This is depressing.”To be clear, Margot Tenenbaum is not the fat girl.”
“I’m pregnant.”
“I’m not thinking, It’s okay to get bigger.”
“But it’s hard.”


"13 weeks, 12 pounds!"
"Go to see a doctor, but it may be ok..."
"She grew up in Savannah, Georgia, and was friendly with director Wes Anderson, who named Royal Tenenbaum and Gwyneth Paltrow after Margot and her family."
"She's vibrant, funny and sexy, trying to make people think that the jeans of human citizens are not fashion, but her own outstanding discovery. She seems to know everyone."
"Besides, Tenenbaum is the kind of New York woman that other New York women like."
"Although the 38 year old has had" fat menstruation, "in the past seven years or so, she has been very satisfied with her size 8 figure (she clarified that it was in Barney or Jeffrey; number 6 was in the Old Navy)
"I was thinking, it's frustrating." To be clear, Margot Tenenbaum is not the fat girl
"I'm pregnant."
"I didn't think about it. It doesn't matter to be bigger."
"But it's hard."



Number  139
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The court also bars her from reading the children’s text messages with Pitt or from giving out a number to a phone that she secretly monitors.”
“He ordered Jolie to provide Pitt with the cell phone number of each child, and to allow him to call whenever he wants.”
“...ruling calling it a misleading leak that is not in the best interests of the children From the start Angelina has been focused only on their health and needs which is why it was so important that this last court hearing be conducted privately the spokesperson said in a statement...”
“It takes a lot to move the court past estrangement into alienation but once it s determined that one parent is alienating the kids the court has no choice but to jump in and make pretty strong orders right away A spokesperson for Jolie slammed news about the judge s...”
“In an interview with People magazine, he said: “It’s a rare case where the court will find that someone alienated the kids.”
“David Glass, another family law attorney, agreed that the judge’s ruling is unusual but must have seemed necessary.”
““If the minor children remain closed down to their father and depending on the circumstances surrounding this condition, it may result in a reduction of the time they spend with (Jolie) and may result in the Court ordering primary physical custody to (Pitt),” the ruling said.”
“In his ruling, the judge has said that the children could be harmed by “not having a relationship with their father.” If things don’t change, the judge added, there would be consequences for Jolie.”
“...it sound as though the finding came after extensive evaluation which estimated that the children weren t estranged from Pitt because of harmful things he has done but were alienated from him because of actions of Jolie...”
“Melcher said the ruling from the retired Los Angeles County Superior Court judge who likely was retained by both parties to resolve the case is consistent with a finding of parent alienation While Melcher said he hasn t seen the relevant documents he said that the quotes from them make...”


"The court also banned her from reading children's text messages with Pete or sending numbers to the mobile phones she secretly monitored."
He ordered Julie to give Pete each child's mobile phone number so that he could call at any time
"The verdict said it was a misleading leak and it was not in the best interests of the children from the beginning. Angelina has always focused only on their health and needs, which is why the last trial had to be conducted in private," the spokesman said in a statement
"It takes a lot for the court to move from estrangement to estrangement, but once it is determined that one parent has alienated the child, the court has no choice but to step in immediately and issue a quite powerful order. Julie's spokesman lashed out at the news about the judge..."
In an interview with people magazine, he said: "this is a rare case and the court will find that someone has alienated the children."
David glass, another family law lawyer, agreed that the judge's ruling was unusual but seemed necessary
"If the minor children continue to be locked up with their father, and as the case may be, this may reduce their time with (Julie) and may lead to the court ordering (Pete) to obtain primary actual custody," the ruling said
In the ruling, the judge said the children could be hurt because they had "no relationship with their father.". The judge added that if the situation did not change, Julie would face consequences
“…… It sounds like this finding is based on extensive evaluation. The evaluation shows that the children don't alienate Peter because he did something harmful, but because of Julie's behavior... "
"Melcher said that the ruling of the retired judge of the Los Angeles County High Court is likely to be employed by both parties to solve the case, which is consistent with the ruling of estrangement between parents. Melcher said that he has not seen the relevant documents, and he said that from their quotation, he made..."



Number  140
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I swore to pay it forward.””
““He touched my heart.”
““He took me under wing,” Jones wrote.”
“#RealDeal.”Orlando Jones posted a portrait Landau drew for him.”
““What a talented, sweet generous actor.”
“Thank you, Marty, for all you gave us.”“Working with Martin Landau on Ed Wood was a joy,” Patricia Arquette tweeted.”
““He loved acting so much, and that love, that excitement was contagious.”
“What a wonderful actor, what a wonderful soul,” Jeff Bridges wrote on Twitter.”
““I had the honor & joy of working/playing with Marty Landau.”
“Celebrities influenced by Landau’s many decades of work — his first notable role was in Alfred Hitchcock’s 1959 film North by Northwest and he has been acting ever since — reacted to the news, remembering his talent and kindness.”


"I swear to pay in advance."
"He touched my heart."
"He pressed me under his wings," Jones wrote
"Realdale" Orlando Jones has a portrait of Randall
"What a talented and generous actor."
"Thank you, Marty. Thank you for everything." "It's a pleasure to work with Martin Landau in Ed Wood's work," Patricia Arquette tweeted
"He loves acting too much. That kind of love, that kind of excitement is contagious."
"What a wonderful actor, what a wonderful soul," Jeff Bridges tweeted
"I had the privilege of working / playing with Marty Landau."
"The celebrity influenced by Lando's works for decades - he made his first famous role in the 1959 Alfred Hitchcock film north by Northwest, and he has been acting ever since - responding to the news and remembering his talent and kindness."



Number  141
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know below!”
““Pregnant sisters Khloe and Kylie are sharing some odd similar food cravings during their pregnancies,” the insider said.”
“Hollywoodlife.com learned EXCLUSIVELY the reportedly pregnant Kylie Jenner and Khloe Kardashian are sharing cravings!”
“Khloe Kardashian, 33, and her little sis Kylie Jenner, 20, are both reportedly pregnant with their first child.”
“While Ky is allegedly having a girl and Khloe is reportedly carrying a boy, their pregnancies do have a few things in common.”
“Well, food-related things that is!”
“A source close to the Kardashians told HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY the siblings are both dealing with some intense cravings.”
“See pics of Kylie’s alleged pregnancy right here.”
““Kylie got together with Khloe recently and they were both shocked to learn that they are both really into the same foods while expecting.”
“The funny food cravings and this pregnancy has made them tighter than ever, they feel connected like never before.”HollywoodLifers, what do you think of Kylie and Khloe’s adorable shared cravings?”


"Tell us next!"
"Pregnant sisters Khloe and Kylie have some strange similar food cravings during pregnancy," the person said
"According to the exclusive report of Hollywood life, pregnant Kelly Jenner and Carol Kardashian share a common desire!"
"It's reported that Carol Kardashian, 33, and sister Kelly Jenner, 20, are both pregnant with their first child."
"Although KY is said to be pregnant with a girl and Khloe is said to be pregnant with a boy, their pregnancies do have something in common."
"Well, the food thing is!"
A source close to the Kardashian family told reporters that only the brothers and sisters are dealing with some strong desires
"Look at the picture of Kelly pregnant."
"Kelly was with Chloe recently, and they were both shocked to find that they both like the same kind of food and are looking forward to it."
"The interesting food craving and this pregnancy have brought them closer than ever before, and they feel more connected than ever before." Hollywood stars, what do you think of Kelly and Chloe's lovely common desire? "



Number  142
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed from Getty Images...”
“But after the split with Angelina, he was encouraged to look outside of the Los Angeles fame bubble.”
“...agreed...”
“He is also saying she s the sexiest woman he s ever laid eyes on Brad doesn t want to rub it in Angelina s face Brad and Angelina made a pact when they split that they wouldn t step out with other people until their divorce terms were formally...”
“He is mesmerised by her intellect, her cool philosophy on life and of course their shared love of arts and design.”
“Their chemistry is hot.” After a year of “loneliness,” Brad was ready for Neri: “Brad is besotted with Neri and cannot wait to shout their love from the rooftops.”
“It is very much a meeting of minds first — it is not just physical attraction.”
“This has led to him falling for Neri.”
“For years, he has been content to look within Hollywood for his next girlfriend.”
“And it will probably be a while until Brad even sees the kids, much less introduces them to daddy’s new unicorn lover.”


"Embed from Getty Images..."
"But after breaking up with Angelina, he was encouraged to jump out of the bubble of fame in Losangeles."
“… Agree... "
"He also said she was the sexiest woman he had ever seen and Brad didn't want to smear Angelina's face. When Brad and Angelina broke up, they agreed that they would not associate with other people until the divorce agreement came into effect.... "
"He was fascinated by her intelligence, her calm philosophy of life and their shared love of art and design."
"The chemistry between them is intense." After a year of solitude, Brad is ready to meet Neri: "Brad is fascinated by Neri and can't wait to shout their love on the roof."
"It's an exchange of ideas first, not just physical attraction."
"It made him fall in love with Neri."
"For years, he has been content to find his next girlfriend in Hollywood."
"Brad may have to wait a while to see the kids, let alone introduce them to Dad's new Unicorn lover."



Number  143
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Duke of Gloucester 3rd son of HM King George V Royal Family Tree...”
“...daughter of David Armstrong Jones Viscount Linley Lady Sarah Chatto 1964 daughter of HRH The Princess Margaret Countess of Snowdon Samuel Chatto 1996 son of Lady Sarah Chatto Arthur Chatto 1999 son of Lady Sarah Chatto HRH Prince Richard The Duke of Gloucester 1944 son of HRH The Prince Henry...”
“HRH Prince Charles, The Prince of WalesPrince Charles is presently heir (next in line) to the British throne.”
“He will not become king until his mother, Queen Elizabeth, abdicates (gives up the throne), retires or dies.”
“When either of these happen, Prince Charles may abdicate and pass the throne to his eldest son Prince William.”
“What is the title of the heir to the British throne?”
“The heir to the throne is always called the Prince of Wales.”
“The title was introduced by King Edward l in 1301, after the conquest of Wales.”
“If the eldest child of the monarch is female, will she become heir to the throne?”
“Yes, if she does not have any brothers.”


"The third son of the royal family of King George V, Duke of Gloucester..."
“…… The daughter of viscount David Armstrong Jones Sarah chatter 1964 Princess Margaret's daughter Samuel chatter 1996 Lady Sarah chatter's son Arthur chatter 1999 Lady Sarah chatter's son Prince Richard of Gloucester 1944 Prince Henry's son... ""
Prince Charles, Prince walsprings, is the heir to the British throne
He will not be king unless his mother, Queen Elizabeth, abdicates, retires or dies
When either happens, Prince Charles may abdicate and pass the throne on to his eldest son, Prince William
"What is the title of the heir to the British throne?"
"The heir to the throne is always called the prince of Wales."
"The title was given in 1301 by King Edward L. after the conquest of Wales
"If the prince's eldest son is a woman, will she become the heir to the throne?"
"Yes, if she doesn't have a brother."



Number  144
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“While there’s been reports of Brad and Angie dating other people, nothing has been confirmed.”
“Now, the exes are on better terms these days and getting along as they live their new normal of co-parenting their children.”
“The two have allegedly been flirting like crazy on set of their new film, although Margot is a married woman!”
“— So, what’s really going on here?”
“Work hard, play hard!”
“Brad Pitt, 54, and Margot Robbie, 28, have reportedly been flirting it up on the set of their forthcoming film, Once a Time in Hollywood.”
““It’s obvious that Brad’s completely smitten with Margot,” a source tells Life & Style magazine.”
“Their upcoming film also stars Leonardo DiCaprio, 43, who’s even reportedly noticed the close camaraderie between Brad and Margot.”
“Leo “has called him out for layering it on so thick [with Margot],” the insider adds.”
“— While this is adorable and all, nothing about this alleged relationship has been confirmed.”


"Although there are reports that Brad and Angie are dating other people, it has not been confirmed."
"Now, ex girlfriends get along better. They live a new life of raising children together."
It is said that the two have been flirting wildly at the scene of the new film, even though Margot is a married woman
"- so, what's going on?"
"Work hard, play hard!"
Brad Pitt, 54, and Margot Robbie, 28, are reported to have been flirting on the set of their upcoming movie "once in Hollywood."
"It's clear that Brad is totally obsessed with Margot," a source told life and fashion magazine
"Their upcoming film will also feature Leonardo DiCaprio, 43, who is reported to have even noticed the intimate friendship between Brad and Margot."
"Leo" cried out because he (and Margot) was too close, "the insider added
"- while this is lovely and all, nothing about this so-called relationship has been confirmed."



Number  145
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We know Anna's moved on with cinematographer Michael Barrett -- he's even met her parents.”
“Faris...”
“It s unclear if this was a romantic hookup or purely platonic but fact is a lot of people in Hollywood are anxiously waiting for Chris to get back on the dating scene after last year s split from Anna...”
“The "Jurassic World" star was at an L.A. Coffee Bean Wednesday, and had a friendly embrace with the hot mystery blonde.”
“Chris Pratt looked like a single guy back in the dating saddle as he met up with a woman ... who happens to look a lot like his estranged wife.”


"We know that Anna and photographer Michael Barrett have gone - he even met her parents."
"Faris..."
"It's not clear whether this is a romantic date or a purely platonic one, but in fact, many people in Hollywood are anxiously waiting for Chris to return to the dating stage after breaking up with Anna last year..."
The Jurassic world star hugged the sexy, mysterious blonde at a coffee shop in Los Angeles on Wednesday
"Chris Pratt looks like a bachelor when he meets a woman... He looks like his separated wife



**Something goes wrong**
“Citing a rep for Mimi, the site says that the National Enquirer story is 100|percent| "made up."”
“Gossip Cop can confirm that the couple did not have sex in the bathroom of the popular restaurant.”
“But they unlikely would do such thing publicly.”
“Mimi and Bryan definitely have been all over each other since they began dating.”
“Mimi giggled, before telling the pal, "Everything."”
“When they finally emerged, a girl friend asked her, "What were you doing in there all the time?"”
“The lovebirds allegedly "stayed locked long-ish."”
“The alleged source added, "She's totally red-hot for that boy, and... she later had the ladies' room cleared, then pulled her hottie inside for an even more private party."”
“It went on citing an eyewitness as saying, "Mariah had been all over tight-bodied Bryan while sashaying up to the club as fotogs' flashbulbs popped, but she was not putting on an act."”
“Mimi had "hanky-panky" with Bryan in the ladies room of Catch restaurant, according to the publication.”


The website quoted a representative of Mimi company as saying that the national inquirer's report was 100% fabricated
"Gossip police can confirm that the couple didn't have sex in the bathroom of this popular restaurant."
"But they are unlikely to do so publicly."
"Mimi and Brian must have been crazy about each other since they started dating."
Mimi giggled and told her friend, "everything's OK."
When they finally showed up, a girlfriend asked her, "what have you been doing there?"
The couple are said to have been "locked up for a long time"
The source is said to have added, "she is very sexy to the boy and... Then she cleaned up the women's room and pulled her spice girl in for a more private party
The report also quoted an eyewitness as saying: "when the flash light of the fotog's house went off, Maria was walking around the club with tight Brian all over her body, but she didn't put on airs."
According to reports, Mimi and Brian played with "handkerchiefs" in the women's room of cage's Restaurant



Number  147
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For more on this, pick up the new issue of In Touch magazine, on stands now!”
“...the family including kids North Saint and Chicago after rapper Daz Dillinger urged the notorious Crips gang to f Kanye up While Kanye brushed of the danger during his TMZ rant he and Kim did appear to beef up security...”
“Capping of a tumultuous week of bizarre rants and a Trump-related Twitter firestorm, Kanye West showed up in the TMZ newsroom on May 1 and dropped a few new bombshells.”
“During a rambling 42-minute interview, the erratic rapper announced that he’d been hooked on opioids after liposuction in 2016 and declared that "when you hear about slavery for 400 years…that sounds like a choice."”
“His shocking comments were met with instant backlash from fans, fellow celebrities and especially his own wife, Kim Kardashian.”
“She s just so mad at him for embarrassing her and her family over and over and over again says a Kardashian source noting that Kim is fearful about how Kanye s behavior affects everything from their children to the...”
“Kardashians public image and business empire...”
“The pair fought bitterly, adds an insider, because "Kanye was furious that she would even try to silence him.”
“He stormed off, leaving Kim in tears."”
“Now with Kanye, 40, holed up at a Wyoming resort — purportedly to work on his music — Kim, 37, is facing the fact that her third marriage is in free fall.”


"For more information, please click on the new issue of in touch magazine and start now!"
“… After rap singer DAZ Dillinger, family members, including children from North holy city and Chicago, urged the notorious Crips Gang to arrest Kanye, who ignored the danger in his TMZ roar, and Kim and he seemed to strengthen their security. "
"On May 1, Kanye West appeared in the TMZ newsroom and dropped several new bombs, ending a week of chaotic and weird growls and a twitter storm related to trump."
"In a rambling 42 minute interview, the capricious rapper announced that he was addicted to opioids after liposuction in 2016 and declared," when you hear about 400 years of slavery It sounds like a choice. "
"His shocking remarks were immediately strongly opposed by fans, celebrity colleagues, especially his own wife, Kim Kardashian."
A source for Kardashian said: "she is very angry that he has embarrassed her and her family over and over again. Kim is worried that Kanye's behavior will affect people from children to children
"Kardashian's public image and business empire..."
A person familiar with the matter added that the two had a heated argument because "Kanye was so angry that she even tried to keep him silent."
"He left in a huff, making Kim tearful."
"Now, Kanye, 40, is hiding in a Wyoming resort, said to be writing her own music, and Kim, 37, is facing the fact that her third marriage is falling freely."



Number  148
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...knowing @mrtankcook I’m sure he will be posting tons of hilarious gems,” the newly married Cuoco added.”
“...surgery a mere five days after tying the knot with husband Karl Cook a surprise injury wasn t responsible for the procedure...”
“Documenting her recovery process on Saturday, the Big Bang Theory star, 32, shared a video of herself icing her healing shoulder on her Instagram Story.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Day 3 in the same shirt,” she wrote alongside a video, as a bag of ice cubes rested on her shoulder.”
““Braids are hanging in.”
“Karl might have to re-do them.”
“Could write a sitcom around his hairstyles.”Alongside the video, she also proclaimed that right now “ice is my best friend.”In a separate video, Cuoco also shared that her dog Ruby seemed really happy the actress was staying at home while she recovered from the procedure.”
“Ruby is so happy I had surgery because she just gets to lay and stare at me for hours on end she remarked in the video before asking the canine Is this your dream Image zoom Kaley Cuoco Credit Kaley Cuoco Instagram The actress previously revealed that although she underwent...”
““This was a planned surgery I’ve had for over a year,” she explained in her Instagram Story earlier this week.”


"Meet Mr @ tankcook, and I'm sure he'll post a lot of funny gems," the newly married cuoco added
“…… The operation was only five days after her marriage to her husband Carl cook, and the accidental injury was not the cause of the operation... "
"On Saturday, the 32 year old big bang star recorded her recovery, sharing a video to ice her shoulders in the instagram story."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Wearing the same shirt on the third day," she wrote next to a video, with a bag of ice on her shoulder
"The braids are down."
"Carl might have to do it again."
"You can write a sitcom around his hairstyle." Beside the video, she also declared that "ice is my best friend." In another video, Kuko shares her dog, ruby, who seems really happy to be at home while the actress recovers from surgery
"Ruby is glad I had the operation because she can only lie in bed and stare at me for a few hours," she said in the video, and then asked the dog this is your dream image zooming calico credit calico instagram actress revealed before, although she experienced... "
Earlier this week, she explained on instagram, "this is an operation I've been planning for more than a year."



Number  149
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I was overcome with joy, and I was kind of shocked and delirious at that time, so I can't remember anything."”
“"It doesn't take anything away from the folks that have already won, but next season is going to be very different with new rules."”
“Oct 5, 2017AceShowbiz - You may not see kids among "America's Got Talent" contestants in next year's season.”
“The show's judge as well as executive producer Simon Cowell reportedly is considering to ban kids from the NBC show.”
“Naughty Gossip reveals that Simon is worried that "America's Got Talent" is turning into a kiddie's talent show, and the fact that this year's winner is 12-year-old singing ventriloquist Darci Lynne is not helping either.”
“"This year the two finalists were children.”
“Last year's winner [Grace VanderWaal] was a kid too.”
“The fear is that next year no one older than 15 will even bother auditioning," the source says.”
“"The most talented adult in America doesn't stand a chance against a child with a homemade puppet.”
“Now Simon is stepping in to fix the problem," the source continues.”


"I was ecstatic. I was a little bit shocked and confused, so I didn't remember anything."
"It won't let anyone who has won lose anything, but the new rules for next season will be very different."
"Aceshowbiz, October 5, 2017 - you may not see children among the contestants for next year's America's got talent."
"Simon Cowell, the show's judge and executive producer, is reported to be considering banning children from NBC."
"Mischievous gossip has revealed that Simon is worried that" America's got talent "will become a children's talent show, and 12-year-old ventriloquist Darci Lynne won't help this year."
"Both players in this year's final are children."
"Last year's Champion (Grace van der Waal) was also a child."
"The worry is that people over 15 will not even audition next year," the source said
"The most gifted adult in America doesn't have a chance to fight a child with a homemade puppet."
"Now Simon is getting involved in solving this problem," the source continued



Number  150
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image Credit: FameFlynet...”
“And now, we’ll hear only what she wants us to hear – like the fact that she wants a fancy nursery for her twins.”
“And according to a new report, Beyonce also wants to built a million dollar nursery for these twins.”
“Okay, actually, Beyonce and Jay-Z want to build this nursery.”
“But let’s be real – if Beyonce wants something, you think Jay-Z is going to say no?”
“And also, when was the last time we saw Jay-Z claiming to want something, and Beyonce jumping on that bandwagon?”
“And don’t say a divorce Anyway, Radar’s source claims, “Beyonce told Jay Z she wants a million-dollar nursery in her home!”
“The place will have two of everything.”
“It must have two lamps, changing tables, cribs, stuffed animals and a closet stocked with baby designer duds from Lanvin and Hermes….”
“...money is no object.”


"Image source: fameflynet..."
"Now, we only listen to what she wants us to hear - for example, she wants to build a beautiful nursery for her twins."
"Beyonce also wants to build a million dollar nursery for the twins, according to a new report
"Well, in fact, Beyonce and Jez want to build a nursery."
"But let's be honest - if Beyonce wants something, do you think Jay will refuse?"
"Also, when was the last time we saw what Jay-Z claimed to want and Beyonce joined in?"
"Don't say divorce anyway, radar sources claim," Beyonce told jay z, she wants to have a million dollar nursery at home! "
"This place has everything."
It must have two lights, a changing table, a crib, stuffed animal toys and a closet with Lambert and Hermes baby name brand duds
“…… Money is not the goal. "



Number  151
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“...quotes a supposed “source” as saying, “They genuinely did grow close […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“An article in the latest issue of Ok!”
“That’s the claim in one of this week’s new tabloids, but Gossip Cop has the truth.”
“Are “ Big Little Lies ” co-stars Reese Witherspoon and Nicole Kidman feuding now that both have been nominated for an Emmy?”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
“… To quote a hypothetical "source," they're really close ] IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
"An article in the latest issue of OK!"
"That's what a new tabloid said on Monday, but gossip police has the truth."
"Little lies" co stars Reese Witherspoon and Nicole Kidman are now Emmy nominees. Is there any disagreement between the two stars? "



Number  152
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“When asked directly if they were a couple, Yolanda said: "What are we… this is like… they’re friends..."”
“Bella's mom, Yolanda, was pressed about her daughter's relationship with Drake where she played it cool at giving many details.”
“Last October Drake apparently threw Bella a ballin' 21st birthday party.”
“He adds, "you and your sister/Too hot to handle," that could very well be referring to Bella's older sister, Gigi Hadid.”
“"One thing at a time/I have to learn to hide/One thing at a time/Emotions running high/I wish you felt alright."”
“"I can't even lie, I'd rather stay inside/I can't do suit and tie/Can't be in a room with you and stand on different sides," he sings.”
“Certain lines talking about Fashion Week and saying it's "more your thing than mine" are leading many to believe he could be referring to his rumoured past fling with Bella Hadid.”
“On his track "Finesse," Drizzy talks about a former gyal that he can't help but think about, saying he wants his baby to have her eyes.”
“Now that Drake's album is here, everyone is diving into his lyrical content trying to piece together his feelings, coming up with assumptions on who and what the man's really talking about.”


When asked directly if they were a couple, Yolanda said, "what are we It's like They are friends... "
"Bella's mother Yolanda was asked about her daughter's relationship with Drake, where she calmly gave a lot of details."
"Last October, Drake apparently gave Bella a 21st birthday party."
"He added," you and your sister / are too hot to deal with, "which is probably Bella's sister, Gigi Hadid."
"One thing at a time / I have to learn to hide / one thing at a time / I'm in high spirits / I hope you feel OK."
"I can't even lie, I'd rather stay inside / I can't wear a suit and tie / I can't be on a different side of the room with you," he sang
"Some lines talk about fashion week, saying that it's' more about you than me ', which leads many people to believe that he may be referring to his past affair with Bella Hadid."
"On" smart, "Tracy talked about a former gyal he couldn't help thinking of, saying he wanted his child to have her eyes."
"Now, Drake's album is here, and everyone sneaks into his lyric content, trying to piece together his feelings and make assumptions about who and what this person is really talking about."



Number  153
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The site itself is now offline.”
“**UPDATE (Aug. 28, 2018): The domain registration for www.usalibertypress.com was updated on July 28, 2018, and no longer includes information about the registrant in Macedonia.”
“Other iterations of this rumor falsely quoted Washington as saying that when Hillary Clinton lost the 2016 presidential election, “we avoided a war with Russia, and we avoided the creation of an Orwellian police state.”This rumor first went viral in the final weeks of the 2016 presidential campaign.”
“It resurfaced in February 2018 when Washington was nominated for an Oscar — and appeared yet again in April 2018, after musician Kanye West tweeted a statement of support for Trump, reigniting longstanding discussions about the political loyalties of black American voters.”
“Insight: Viral rumors often recirculate when new contexts for them emerge.”
“What can we learn?”
“Let’s start with an instance of this viral meme that was included in a post on a highly suspect website — USALibertyPress.com — in February 2018:Note: The link in the previous paragraph is to an archive of the “fake news” website.”
“That avoids linking to the site itself and giving it additional web traffic and ad revenue.”
“The first step we should take is to do a little lateral reading* on the claim itself.”
“So let’s do a quick search:All the top results for this search are from fact-checking organizations, so we can safely assume that this is a questionable claim.”


"The site itself is now offline."
"* *" update (August 28, 2018): domain registration for www.usalibertypress.com Updated on 28 July 2018 and no longer contains information on Macedonian registrants. "
"Other versions of this rumor mistakenly quote Washington as saying that when Hillary Clinton lost the 2016 presidential election," we avoided war with Russia and the establishment of an Orwell police state. " The rumor first spread in the last weeks of the 2016 presidential campaign
"It reappeared when Washington was nominated for an Oscar in February 2018 - it reappeared in April 2018 after the musician Kanye West tweeted his statement in support of trump, reigniting a long-standing discussion about the political loyalty of black voters in the United States."
"Insight: viral rumors are often repeated in new contexts."
"What can we learn?"
"Let's start with an example of a virus meme contained in a post on a highly suspected website- USALibertyPress.com Website - February 2018: Note: the previous link is "fake news" website file. "
"By doing so, you can avoid linking to the website itself, thereby increasing website traffic and advertising revenue."
"The first step we should take is a bit of a horizontal interpretation of the claim itself."
"Well, let's do a quick search: all the main results of this search come from fact checking organizations, so we can safely think that this is a suspicious statement."



Number  154
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So fatherhood hasn't altered George Clooney's sense of humor one bit...”
“...poop...”
“We had a little email exchange George s ER co star Julianna Margulies said on Good Morning America Monday and I was just asking how he s doing and he said I just can t believe there s so much...”
“Society may try to insist otherwise, what with the international renown they had before becoming parents, but the couple are fully aware that this is as good as it gets.”
“...attorney mom...”
“The twin son and daughter of George Clooney and his wife of almost four years Amal Clooney are turning 1 Wednesday and at their tender age they already represent the crowning achievements of their Oscar winner dad and human rights...”
“Alexander and Ella Clooney may not know it just yet, but life is pretty darn sweet for those two.”


"So being a father doesn't change George Clooney's sense of humor at all..."
“… Stool... "
"We have a little email exchange, George s Er co star Juliana Margulis said good morning, USA Monday, I just asked him how he was, he said I can't believe there are so many..."
"Society may try to hold the opposite view because they have international reputation before they become parents, but the couple is fully aware that this is the best."
“… Lawyer, mom... "
"The twin sons and daughters of George Clooney and his wife Amar Clooney, who have been married for nearly four years, will turn one year old on Wednesday. When they were very young, they represented the highest achievement of their Oscar winning father and human rights..."
"Alexander and Ella Clooney may not know, but their lives are so sweet."



Number  155
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...with Kelly and Ryan airs weekday mornings on syndication throughout the country.”
“AdvertisementLive!”
“Network accused him of sexual harassment this past week, his co-host on Live!, Kelly Ripa, came to his defense on their show.”
“But despite her words of support, Seacrest and Ripa’s friendship may not be as good as it seems on air.”
“According to Page Six, Ripa doesn’t want to risk anything happening to her popular morning show, and she is livid because the allegations against Seacrest could potentially mess things up.”
““They oversell their friendship…Her reputation is rolled up in this — this is her show.”
“For Kelly, there’s not a Plan B.”
“She has to make a decision and rally around him,” claims a source.”
“Seacrest has denied the allegations of sexual harassment leveled against him by Suzie Hardy, who claims that the American Idol host pushed her head towards his crotch while she tied his shoes.”
“An anonymous source who also worked with Seacrest has corroborated Hardy’s story, claiming that they witnessed the behavior multiple times.”


“… Kelly and Ryan broadcast weekday morning shows on radio syndicate all over the country
"Live advertising!"
"The network accused him of sexual harassment. This week, his co hosts broadcast live! Kelly Ripa defended him on their show
"But despite her support, the friendship between Seacrest and Ripa may not be as good as it was on the radio."
"According to the report on page 6, Ripa didn't want to risk an accident on her popular morning show, and she was furious because the charges against Seacrest could blow things up."
"They exaggerate their friendship Her reputation has been enhanced in this performance - it's her performance. "
"For Kelly, there's no plan B."
"She has to make a decision and unite around him," one source claimed
"Seacrest denied Suzie Hardy's sexual harassment charges against him. Suzie hardy claimed that the American Idol host pushed his head toward his crotch while tying his shoes."
"An anonymous source who also worked with Seacrest confirmed Hardy's statement, claiming that they had witnessed Hardy's behavior many times."



Number  156
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Photo credit: MEGA”
“The expert told Kate she must enter a residential treatment facility to beat her eating disorder, the source said.”
“Shocked eyewitnesses saw how even tight leggings were hanging off the shrinking princess — as Kate Middleton is battling a killer eating disorder — as the stick-thin princess compulsively forces herself to throw up after every meal!”
“The Duchess of Cambridge's shocking secret is getting tougher to hide, too, as seen when Kate showed off her frail body while playfully running along with husbandduring a recent royal appearance.”
“Shocked eyewitnesses saw how even tight leggings were hanging off the shrinking princess — as The National ENQUIRER exposed tell-tale signs of her vomiting after every meal!”
“Photo credit: MEGAWilliam, Kate and Harry join a London Marathon training day Princess Diana, who also suffered from bulimia in secret.”
“But, as seen in shocking photos unearthed by The ENQUIRER, Kate's fragile hands keep her from hiding her sickly secret!”
“The beloved 5'9" royal is now down to a disturbing 89 lbs., as even sickly Queen Elizabeth reportedly fears for the beauty’s survival.”
“Kate’s skeletal appearance has triggered gut-wrenching memories of the mother-in-law she never knew — the late, who also suffered from bulimia in secret.”


"Image source: Mega"
"Experts told Kate that she had to enter a residential treatment facility to fight her eating disorder," the source said
"Shocked witnesses saw that even tights were hanging on the shrinking Princess - Kate Middleton was fighting a fatal eating disorder - the emaciated Princess forced herself to vomit after every meal!"
"The shocking secrets of the Duchess of Cambridge are becoming more and more difficult to hide, just as Kate showed her fragile body while playing and running with her husband in a recent Royal appearance."
"Shocked witnesses saw that even tights were hanging on the shrinking Princess - because the national inquirer revealed signs of vomiting after every meal!"
Photo source: megawilliam, Kate and Harry attend London marathon training day, and Princess Diana secretly suffers from bulimia
"But, as the amazing photos unearthed by the inquirer show, Kate's fragile hands make it impossible for her to hide her sick secret!"
The "beloved 5'9" Royal has now lost a disturbing 89 pounds, and even the ailing Queen Elizabeth is reported to be worried about her survival
"Kate's skinny appearance evokes painful memories of her mother-in-law, the late mother-in-law she never met, who was also secretly suffering from bulimia."



Number  157
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“CNN reports...”
“...case a month ago The back and forth about Pitt s child support payments In legal documents filed on August 7 Jolie s attorney claimed Pitt has paid no meaningful child support since separation Jolie also asked the court to order Pitt to pay her the money she is owed...”
“That “incident,” which reportedly involved Pitt and son Maddox Jolie-Pitt, is said to be what prompted Jolie to file for divorce.”
“Back in September 2016, we learned that an “incident” reportedly went down on a private plane, and that the Los Angeles Department of Child and Family Services and FBI got involved.”
“So what went wrong?”
“They were involved for 12 years, and had six kids and a French vineyard together.”
“But despite their, erm, salacious start, Pitt and Jolie proved to be the real deal.”
“Eventually, he and Aniston split up, and his relationship with Jolie (officially) came to light.”
“Rumors about what may or may not have gone down between Pitt and Jolie on set ran rampant.”
“The pair met while filming Mr. and Mrs. Smith in 2004 — back when Pitt was still married to Jennifer Aniston.”


"CNN report..."
“…… In the case one month ago, before and after Pitt paid child support in the legal document submitted on August 7, Julie's lawyer claimed that Pitt did not pay any meaningful child support because Julie also asked the court to order Pitt to pay the money she owed... "
It is reported that the "incident" between Pitt and her son, Maddox Jolie Pitt, is the reason for Julie's divorce
"As early as September 2016, we learned that there was a reported" incident "in a private plane, involving the Los Angeles Department of children and family services and the FBI."
"What's wrong?"
"They've been dating for 12 years, with six children and a French vineyard."
"But, even though they, er, started off as lewd, Pete and Julie proved to be a real deal."
"In the end, he broke up with Aniston and his relationship with Julie came to light."
"There's a lot of talk about what happened or didn't happen to Pete and Julie on the set."
"The couple met when filming the Smiths in 2004, when Pitt was still married to Jennifer Aniston."



Number  158
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““He was just tired,” the source said, adding that Disick working on himself has “been good for his relationship with Kourtney.””
“According to The Blast, Disick was released prior to that.”
“...reports...”
“A spokesperson for the Los Angeles County Fire Department confirmed to PEOPLE that on Aug. 18, they were dispatched to a home in Hidden Hills, California, at 4:56 p.m.”
“They arrived on the scene at 5:03 p.m.Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Lost Hills Sheriffs also responded to assist, and one patient was transported to a local hospital.”
“According to E!”
“News, the call was made from Disick’s home, though the identity of the patient remains unclear.”
“Entertainment Tonight reported the same, adding that the Los Angeles County Fire Department confirmed that the patient, who was male, was non-violent when authorities arrived at the residence before being transported to the hospital.”
“A 5150 hold is an involuntary psychiatric hold that occurs when a person is deemed to be a danger to either themselves or others.”


"He's just tired," the source said, adding that Disick's work "is good for his relationship with coultney."
"According to the explosion, desik was released before that."
“… Report... "
A spokesman for the Los Angeles County Fire Department confirmed that they were sent to a house in hidden hill, California, at 4:56 p.m. on August 18
"They arrived at the scene at 5:03 p.m. and got news, features and other push notifications."
"The lost mountain police chief also responded to the assistance, and a patient was sent to the local hospital."
"According to e!"
"It's said that the call was from desik's house, but the patient's identity is still unclear."
Entertainment Tonight reported the same situation, adding that the Los Angeles County Fire Department confirmed that there was no violence when the authorities arrived at the residence of the male patient before he was sent to the hospital
"5150 detention refers to involuntary mental detention when a person is considered to be dangerous to himself or others."



Number  159
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They have developed into close confidantes and are sharing intimate details of their lives.” We can only imagine how Gwen would feel about that.”
“They’ve become close friends and allies over the past month or so.”
“Blake Shelton left his girlfriend of two years Gwen Stefani high and dry when he dumped her before heading off on tour in February, In Touch has exclusively learned, and she’s not taking it well.”
““Gwen doesn’t know what hit her,” said the insider.”
““She’s heartbroken.”But wait, Gwen just posted a photo with Blake three days ago, so what gives?”
“Apparently, it’s a desperate attempt to ignore the truth.”
““She continues to send him loving social media support from LA while he’s been out on the road,” said another insider.”
““But Blake has drastically slowed regular communication with her.” He certainly hasn’t reciprocated her online affection.”
““Blake’s through with Gwen’s neediness and all the drama: her demanding, critical ex-husband and her jealousy of him and other women,” explained the source.”
“Apparently, Gwen was jealous over his closeness with The Voice winner Chloe Kohanski, and Blake got sick of trying to make her trust him.”


"They have developed into intimate confidants and shared intimate details of their lives." We can only imagine how Gwen felt about it
"In the past month or so, they have become close friends and allies."
"Blake Sheldon abandoned his girlfriend Gwen Stefanie for two years and dumped her before going on tour in February. She didn't accept the exclusive report of contact magazine."
"Gwen doesn't know what hit her," the person familiar with the matter said
"She was very sad." But wait a minute. Gwen just posted a picture of Blake three days ago. What does that matter? "
"Obviously, this is a desperate attempt to ignore the truth."
"She continued to provide him with loving social media support from Los Angeles while he was away," another person familiar with the matter said
"But Blake has greatly slowed down his regular communication with her." Of course, he didn't repay her online feelings
"Blake saw Gwen's needs and all the drama: her harsh, picky ex husband and her jealousy of him and other women," the source explained
"It's clear Gwen envies his close relationship with dubbing champion Chloe kohanski, and black is tired of trying to convince her of him."



Number  160
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It is the wise as well as morally right course of action.””
“...we help refugees get an education they themselves will take on the harder task of rebuilding the countries whose future peace and security is so important to our own...”
“In the headlines, Jolie has stopped being the serene mother of six, glamorous movie star or compassionate United Nations High Commissioners for Refugees special envoy.”
“More and more the 43 year old Jolie has been accused of being the crazy and manipulative estranged wife who has become increasingly unpopular in Hollywood She s out for blood in the divorce fight or she wants to embarrass and punish the seemingly affable Pitt by portraying him in...”
“...court papers as a deadbeat dad or by apparently trying to undercut his relationship with their children as suggested by a family law judge...”
“Also damning: Page Six reported last week that Jolie had developed “an insane jealousy” jealous of Amal Clooney, the international human rights attorney and wife of George Clooney.”
“Jolie believes “Amal has stolen her identity” as the world’s most glamorous, admired humanitarian, a source told Page Six.”
“But breaking through all these negative headlines Tuesday was a reminder from Jolie herself of her world-class humanitarian credentials.”
“She published an opinion piece on behalf of the UN agency’s efforts to boost educational opportunities for refugee children.”
“The timing of the piece, published on CNN.com, could be coincidental, given headlines this week about how Jolie had hired a new, more aggressive legal team to help finalize her divorce.”


"It's wise and morally correct."
“…… We help the refugees to receive education, and they will take on a more arduous task to rebuild countries whose future peace and security are so important to us.... "
"In the headlines, Julie is no longer a quiet mother of six, no longer a glamorous movie star, no longer a compassionate special envoy of the United Nations High Commissioner for refugees."
"More and more people are accusing Julie, 43, of being a crazy, manipulative divorced wife. She is becoming more and more unpopular in Hollywood. She is bleeding in the divorce struggle, or she wants to get through To humiliate and punish him, he plays the seemingly amiable Pete
“… Court documents, as a dead father, may obviously attempt to weaken his relationship with his children, as suggested by the family law judge... "
"Equally abominable: page 6 reported last week that Julie had a" crazy jealousy "towards Amar Clooney, an international human rights lawyer and wife of George Clooney."
A source told page 6 that Julie believed that "Amar stole his identity" and became the most charming and respected humanist in the world
"But it was Julie who broke through all these negative headlines on Tuesday to remind herself that she has world-class humanitarian credentials."
"She published a review article on behalf of the United Nations agencies in their efforts to increase educational opportunities for refugee children."
"This article was published on CNN." this may be a coincidence, because the headlines this week are all about how Julie hired a new, more active legal team to help her complete her divorce. "



Number  161
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They were left disappointed when the youngest Kardashian-Jenner star didn't appear on the final day of the family's Christmas card as anticipated.”
“Following Khloe's announcement, fans have been urging Kylie to finally share her own baby news too.”
“The 20-year-old Keeping Up With The Kardashians star, who is yet to publicly confirm her baby news, attended her mum Kris Jenner's annual Christmas Eve bash with her rapper beau yet just days later US sources have claimed they have broken up.”
“Radar Online report that the 25-year-old rapper has told his expectant girlfriend, 20, he 'is done' and 'they are not compatible', which insiders claim has left the star 'begging for him to come back'.”
“Scroll down for video Rumours The 20 year old Keeping Up With The Kardashians star who is yet to publicly confirm her baby news attended her mum Kris Jenner s annual Christmas Eve bash with her rapper beau yet just days later US sources have claimed they have broken up...”
“Kylie was first hit with widespread speculation that she is expecting Travis child in September yet since then she has remained uncharacteristically coy on both social media and in the glare of the public eye...”
“Kylie and Travis began dating in April - in the weeks following her split from ex-beau Tyga.”
“After months of questions over the state of their relationship, the couple's pictures together at Kris' party seemed to indicate they are very much together.”
“Just six days later, sources have claimed the couple have parted ways after Travis ended the romance - while vowing to always be there for the tot.”
“Insiders said: 'He finally plucked up the courage to tell Kylie he’s done, that he loves her and will always be around for the baby, but they’re not compatible as a couple.”


"When the youngest Kardashian Jenner star didn't show up at home on the last day of the Christmas card, they were disappointed."
"After Khloe announced the news, fans have been urging Kelly to finally share her baby news as well."
"The 20-year-old Kardashian star hasn't publicly confirmed her baby. She and her rapper boyfriend went to mom Chris Jenner's annual Christmas Eve party, but just a few days later, American sources said they broke up."
"Radar online reports that the 25-year-old rapper has told his 20-year-old girlfriend to be that he is" finished "and" they are incompatible. "Insiders say it makes the star" beg him to come back. "
"Rolling to the video rumors, 20-year-old Kardashian star, who has not publicly confirmed the news of her baby, attended her mother Chris Jenner's annual Christmas Eve party with her rapper boyfriend, but just a few days later, American sources said they had split up..."
"For the first time, Kelly has been widely speculated that she will be pregnant with Travis's baby in September, but since then, she has remained unusually shy in social media and the public eye..."
"Kelly and Travis started dating in April - a few weeks after she broke up with her ex boyfriend, TEGA."
"After months of questioning the state of their relationship, the couple's group photo at Chris's party seems to show that they are very much together."
"Just six days later, it was reported that the couple split up after Travis ended his relationship and vowed to stay with the child forever."
"Insiders said:" he finally got up the courage to tell Kelly that he is finished. He loves Kelly and will always be with her children, but they are incompatible as a couple. "



Number  162
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It’s really helpful.” Still, he added, he’s trying to navigate his new fame, saying, “We also try to, in our private life, keep it separate from the industry and try to keep it grounded and normal and about us.” We think these two are absolutely couple goals!”
““It helps when you get a role and run it past each other and see what they think and read the script and try things.”
“We’re hearing exclusively the two may be ready to take the next step, sooner rather than later!”
“Ariel Winter, 20, and Levi Meaden, 30, have made their relationship work and thrive through busy acting careers and the craziness of Hollywood.”
“Now, HollywoodLife is hearing exclusively that the two are almost ready to get married and start a family!”
““Ariel would like to start a family young and since she is financially stable, she wants to take a little bit of a break from acting and pursue marriage and have some kids after Modern Family is officially done,” the insider revealed.”
““Levi is a little older than her and he is down and on the same wavelength as her, as well.”
“They have a pretty great relationship and they both plan on being with each other forever so why not start forever sooner than later The pair have been together since November 2016 and have proved they are the most normal couple in Hollywood grocery shopping walking dogs and support each...”
“...other in their careers...”
“Ariel is preparing to film the final season of Modern Family, which she has starred in since 2009.”


"It really helps." Even so, he added, he is still trying to harness his new reputation, saying, "in our private lives, we also try to separate it from the industry, and try to keep it grounded and normal around us." We think these two goals are absolutely husband and wife goals! "
"It helps when you get a character and run it between each other, see what they think, read the script and try something."
"We heard exclusively that they might be ready to take the next step, sooner or later!"
"Ariel winter, 20, and Levi midden, 30, have made their relationship work and flourish through their busy acting career and Hollywood craziness."
"Now, Hollywood life exclusively hears that they are almost ready to get married and start a family!"
"Ariel wants to form a family when she is young. Because of her stable economy, she wants to take a break from acting, pursue marriage and have some children after the formal completion of modern family," the insider said
"Levi is a little older than her, and he is just as depressed as she is."
"Their relationship is very good, they all plan to be together forever, so why not start earlier? They have been together since November 2016, which proves that they are the most normal pair of walking dogs in Hollywood grocery stores, supporting each other.... "
“… Other people's careers... "
"Ariel is preparing for the final season of modern family, which she has starred in since 2009."



Number  163
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Share it in the comments below.”
““She’d be beyond thrilled to win an Academy Award for Best Actress — something that’s evaded both her and Angelina.”“He still considers Jen the love of his life,” the source concluded.Have something to add to the story?”
““He wants Jen involved again as he produces and develops more and more high-quality film and cable TV products.”That kind of professional partnership could pay off for Jen, too, since the insider states she wants in on “prestige projects” under his production banner.”
“Machine star wants Jen to be his partner in other pursuits In Touch further reported They worked well together when they formed the production company Plan B in 2001 an insider close to Brad told In Touch...”
“Jennifer has been married to Wanderlust co star Justin Theroux for two years now And while Brad would never dream of ruining his ex s new marriage he would take a second chance at love with Jen in a heartbeat If they can t be romantic partners though the War...”
“Brad keeps telling friends that he’s seeing everything more clearly.”However, these realisations are obviously far too late.”
““And while he’s not in love with Jen, he realises how much he does love her.”
““He has come to realise that leaving Jen for Angelina was one of the biggest mistakes of his life,” the source adds.”
“And now, he’s “in touch with emotions and his true self like never before,” the source says.And it seems like this self-awareness comes with some great realisations.”
“Years later, Brad regrets leaving the Friends star for his now-ex Angelina Jolie, a source told In Touch exclusively.Following his 2016 separation from Angie, Brad sobered up and sought therapy.”


"Please share in the comments below."
"She's excited about winning the Best Actress Oscar - something neither she nor Angelina thought of." "He still thinks Jen is the love of his life," the source said, ending. Do you have anything to add? "
"He wants Jen to be involved again in the production and development of more and more high-quality movies and cable TV products." This professional partnership is also good for Zhan, because people familiar with the matter say she hopes to participate in the prestige project under his production banner
"Robo star wants Jan to be his partner in other fields. Contact further reports that they worked very well when they set up production company plan B in 2001, Brad informed contact..."
"Jennifer has been married to Justin Cyrus, CO star of roamer, for two years. Although Brad never dreamed of ruining his ex-wife's new marriage, if they can't be romantic partners in the war, he will fall in love with her again in a flash..."
"Brad kept telling his friends that he saw everything better." However, it is obviously too late to realize this
"Although he didn't love Jane, he realized how much he loved her."
"He has realized that leaving Jane for Angelina is one of the biggest mistakes of his life," the source added
Now, however, he has "unprecedented access to emotion and his true self," the source said, she said. And then it seems that this self-awareness is accompanied by some great understanding. "
"Years later, Brad regretted leaving friends star for his ex girlfriend Angelina Jolie," a source told touch. Following his separation from Angie in 2016, Brad woke up and sought treatment. "



Number  164
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out the other celebrity men who got male engagement rings:”
“We found some other men who weren't afraid to rock a man ring on their left hand.”
“Gucci and Justin aren't the only celebrity dudes to get engagement rings from their ladies.”
“Even, 24-year-old singer Justin Bieber's wife, 21-year-old model Hailey Baldwin, decided to pick up Justin an engagement ring of his own when they initially decided to tie the knot.”
“ICYMI: When Gucci Mane and Keyshia Ka'Oir decided to get married, Keyshia gifted her man with some pretty big bling!”
“Some people aren’t too fond of a woman doing the proposing, but what if she gets him a little bling in return?”
“It’s an age-old tradition for men to get down on one knee and present their potential fianceé with a big ‘ole diamond.”


"Look at the other celebrity men who got the men's engagement ring:
"We found some men who are not afraid to shake the man's ring on their left hand."
"Gucci and Justin are not the only celebrities to get engagement rings from their women."
"Even the wife of singer Justin Bieber, 24, and model Haley Baldwin, 21, decided to buy Justin an engagement ring of her own when they first decided to get married."
"ICMI: when gucci mane and keyshia ka'oir decided to get married, keyshia gave her man some pretty big jewelry!"
"Some people don't like a woman's proposal very much, but what if she gets a little favor from him in return?"
"It's an old tradition for men to kneel on one knee and present a big" ole diamond "to their potential fiance."



Number  165
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Honor their lives, their religions, sexual preferences and identities, their and their families living conditions, their healthcare, their bodies, and their concerns.””
“The Thor: Ragnarok star tweeted, “Want to honor Veterans today?”
“For Steve Carell, it meant honoring his veteran father, while Mark Ruffalo used the occasion to send a more political message.”
“On Saturday, Kerry Washington, Robert Downey Jr., Chris Evans, Mark Wahlberg, and Reese Witherspoon were among those to post about Veterans Day on social media.”
“Kerry Washington, Steve Carell, and Mark Ruffalo are among those sharing their appreciationSuperheroes, rock stars, and more are sending their thanks to those who have and do serve in the armed forces.”


"Respect their lives, religious beliefs, sexual orientation and identity, family living conditions, health care, health and concerns."
Raytheon: the Ragnarok star tweeted, "do you want to pay homage to veterans today?"
"For Steve Carrell, it means paying homage to his sophisticated father, and mark rufaro used the opportunity to deliver a more political message."
"On Saturday, Kerry Washington, Robert Downey, Chris Evans, mark Warburg and Reese Witherspoon all posted on social media about veterans day."
Kerry Washington, Steve Carrell and mark rufaro are all sharing their gratitude to superheroes, rock stars, and many more to those who have served in the military



**Something goes wrong**
““They started telling friends a few weeks ago,” said the source.”
““Kylie is very happy.”BABY ON BOARD — SEPTEMBER 2017In September, multiple sources told PEOPLE the Kylie Lip Kit creator was pregnant with her first child.”
““They also talked a lot.”
“Later, the couple headed to Boston’s Theater District where Scott made an appearance at Bijou nightclub“He was definitely looking for something intimate,” one club-goer told PEOPLE.”
“Located just outside Boston in the town of Waltham, Bentley was celebrating their annual Spring Day, which always included a big a concert on campus featuring Scott.”
“A SHOW OF SUPPORT — APRIL 2017Jenner headed to Bentley University outside Boston to support her beau.”
“Once he got back, they definitely looked like a couple, cuddled up next to each other among her friends,” said the onlooker, who attended the game and spotted Jenner kissing Scott’s neck.”
“...courtside club anxiously waiting for him to come back to her...”
“According to an onlooker at the Houston Rockets vs Oklahoma City Thunder game where Scott performed before tip off the Keeping Up with the Kardashians star and the hip hop artist were spotted holding hands and definitely looked like a couple During his performance Kylie was hiding in the Rockets...”
“PACKING ON PDA — APRIL 2017Image zoom Credit: Bob Levey/GettyA few weeks after hanging out at Coachella together, the couple seemed to make their love official by getting cuddly at an NBA playoff game in Houston, Texas.”


"They started telling friends a few weeks ago," the source said
"Kelly is very happy." Baby on board, -2017, September, September, a number of sources told people that Kylie's Lipstick maker was pregnant with her first child.
"They talked a lot, too."
"Later, the couple went to the theater district of Boston, and Scott showed up at the bijo nightclub," a frequent nightclub guest told people. "He must be looking for something intimate."
Bentley, in Waltham, a suburb of Boston, is celebrating their annual spring day, when there is always a big campus concert attended by Scott
"Support - in April 2017, Jenna went to Bentley university outside Boston to support her boyfriend."
"When he came back, they looked absolutely like a couple, hugging each other among her friends," bystanders said. He took part in the competition and found Jenna kissing Scott on the neck
“… The stadium club is anxiously waiting for him to come back to her... "
"According to a bystander in the Houston Rockets Oklahoma thunder game, Scott performed" keep up with Kardashian "before receiving the report, and the hip-hop artist was found holding hands. During the performance, Kelly must be hiding in the Rockets like a couple..."
"Package on PDA - April 2017 photo zooming credit: after Bob Levi / gaitia played together in cochella for a few weeks, the couple seemed to express their love by embracing at the NBA playoffs in Houston, Texas."



Number  167
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The Instagram takedown comes after the gossip site reported that, “Gigi Hadid Warns Nicola Peltz About Justin Bieber: He’s A ‘Heart-Breaker’ Who’ll Hurt You,” which has since been taken down.”
“The star as since posted the image once more in the hopes of rallying even more Beliebers behind his cause.”
“...he shared it early Wednesday morning...”
“Let s spam and petition to shut this garbage website down A photo posted by Justin Bieber justinbieber on Jun 15 2016 at 12 11am PDT RELATED Justin Bieber And Nicola Peltz Have Date In Toronto Bieber s first posting of the image has garnered over 700 000 likes since...”
“GO!”
“...and petition to shut them down...”
“The singer has gone public with his hatred for HollywoodLife com claiming that their reports are untruthful and hurtful Let s spam and petition to shut this garbage website down the Sorry singer posted alongside a photo that read the website Hollywoodlife is untruthful and hurtful let s spam them...”
“Justin Bieber has had enough!”


"Before instagram was deleted, the gossip website reported that" Gigi Hadid warned Nikolay Peltz about Justin Bieber: he's a heartbreaker who's going to hurt you, "and that" it's been deleted. "
"After that, the star released this picture again, hoping to win more believers for his career."
“… He shared it on Wednesday morning... "
"Let's spam and petition to close this junk website Justin Bieber. Justin Bieber's photos released at 12:11 a.m. on June 15, 2016 related to Justin Bieber and Nicolas Peltz's date in Toronto. Bieber's first released image has won more than 700000 likes because..."
"Go
“… And ask to close them... "
"The singer made public his hatred for Hollywood Life website, claiming that their reports were untrue and harmful. Let's spam and petition to close this junk website. The singer posted the photo next to it. Read the website Hollywood life is untrue and harmful. Let's spam them..."
"Justin Bieber, that's enough!"



Number  168
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Cachexia, or “wasting syndrome,” comes with a loss of weight, muscle atrophy, fatigue, weakness and significant loss of appetite.”
““She looks cachectic, pale and exhausted,” weight loss expert Dr. Stuart Fischer, who has not treated Angie, told The ENQUIRER.”
“One medical expert is convinced Angie’s condition is once again serious!”
““She looks like she’s lost more than 10 pounds in just seven days,” said a horrified pal of the “Maleficent” star.”
“Barely two months after The National ENQUIRER revealed Angie had undergone rejuvenating “live cell” replacement procedures at a European clinic, new photos show her sporting spindly, veiny arms!”
““Angie looks as bad as she ever has!” cried a stunned pal of the frail and withered 42-year-old Oscar winner.”
“AFTER bouncing back from the brink of death, Angelina Jolie has suffered a dramatic relapse — and wasted away to a life threatening 78 pounds!”
“WALKING SKELETON needs sweater to stay warm in summer!”


Cachexia, or "wasting syndrome," is associated with weight loss, muscle atrophy, fatigue, weakness, and a marked loss of appetite
"She looks cachexia, pale and exhausted," weight loss expert Dr. Stuart Fischer told inquirer, who didn't treat Angie
"A medical expert is convinced that Angie's condition is serious again!"
"She looks like she lost more than 10 pounds in just seven days," a friend of the "vicious" star said in horror
Just two months after the National Enquirer revealed that Angie had undergone a "living cell" replacement operation at a European clinic, new photos showed her slender, striated arm
"Angie looks as bad as ever! "Cried a stunned friend of the frail, haggard 42 year old Oscar winner
After rebounding from the brink of death, Angelina Jolie experienced a dramatic relapse - and lost to 78 pounds of life
"Walking skeletons need sweaters to keep warm in summer!"



Number  169
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“That was more than 10 years ago.”
“Check it out:Here is a photo of Rihanna back in 2006.”
“But Rihanna has never confirmed any nose surgery took place.”
“Based on Rihanna’s latest photos, they bear evidence that she might have enhanced her nose shape deliberately.”
“Sharp noses are always preferred to rounder and bulbous noses.”
“Rihanna is no exception.”
“It seems that many singers and actresses are not happy with their natural noses.”
“Rihanna Plastic Surgery Nose JobOne of the most intense speculation is whether Rihanna went for rhinoplasty or nose job.”
“But whether we love the way Rihanna is dealing with plastic surgery is another matter.”
“Her soaring popularity has seen her working on music together with Eminem, creating hit songs like “ Love the Way You Lie”.”


"That was more than 10 years ago."
"Check out: This is a picture of Rihanna in 2006."
"But Rihanna has never confirmed that anyone has had nose surgery."
"According to Rihanna's latest photos, there is evidence that she may have deliberately enhanced the shape of her nose."
"A sharp nose is always better than a round nose or a ball nose."
"Rihanna is no exception."
"It seems that many singers and actresses are not satisfied with their natural nose."
"One of the most heated speculations about Rihanna's cosmetic surgery is whether Rihanna is going to have a rhinoplasty or a cosmetic surgery."
"But whether we like the way Rihanna handles plastic surgery is another matter."
Her popularity soared, and she collaborated with Eminem to create popular songs such as "the way I love you to lie."



Number  170
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“2RJ Cyler – Power RangersTaylor Lautner – Scream Queens...”
“2Luke Evans – Beauty and the BeastWINNER: Madelaine Petsch – RiverdaleMalcolm Barrett – TimelessChoice Scene Stealer (#ChoiceSceneStealer)WINNER: Camila Mendes – RiverdaleColin O'Donoghue – Once Upon a TimeJosh Gad – Beauty and the BeastMichael Rooker – Guardians of the Galaxy Vol.”
“Apa Riverdale WINNER Lili Reinhart Riverdale Millie Bobby Brown Stranger Things Ryan Destiny Star Choice TVShip ChoiceTVShip BELLARKE Eliza Taylor Bob Morley The 100 WINNER BUGHEAD Lili Reinhart Cole Sprouse Riverdale EMISON Shay Mitchell Sasha Pieterse Pretty Little Liars KARAMEL Chris Wood Melissa Benoist Supergirl MALEC Matthew Daddario Harry Shum...”
“Jr Shadowhunters The Mortal Instruments STYDIA Holland Roden Dylan O Brien Teen Wolf Choice Liplock ChoiceLipLock Chris Pine Gal Gadot Wonder Woman WINNER Dan Stevens Emma Watson Beauty and the Beast Jennifer Morrison Colin O Donoghue Once Upon a Time Matthew Daddario Harry Shum Jr Shadowhunters The Mortal Instruments Melissa...”
“Benoist Chris Wood Supergirl Orlando Bloom Keira Knightley Pirates of the Caribbean Dead Men Tell No Tales Choice Movie Villain ChoiceMovieVillain Charlize Theron The Fate of the Furious Elizabeth Banks Power Rangers James McAvoy Split Javier Bardem Pirates of the Caribbean Dead Men Tell No Tales WINNER Luke Evans Beauty...”
“...and the Beast Priyanka Chopra Baywatch Choice Breakout Movie Star ChoiceBreakoutMovieStar WINNER Auli i Cravalho Moana Deepika Padukone xXx Return of Xander Cage Harry Styles Dunkirk Janelle Monáe Hidden Figures Tom Holland Spider Man Homecoming Zendaya Spider Man Homecoming Choice MovieShip ChoiceMovieShip Chris Pratt Zoe Saldana Guardians of the Galaxy...”
“Vol...”
“2 Deepika Padukone Ruby Rose xXx Return of Xander Cage WINNER Emma Watson Dan Stevens Beauty and the Beast Gal Gadot Chris Pine Wonder Woman Michelle Rodriguez Vin Diesel The Fate of the Furious Zac Efron Dwayne Johnson Baywatch Choice Action Movie ChoiceActionMovie Logan Pirates of the Caribbean Dead Men...”
“Tell No Tales The Fate of the Furious Transformers The Last Knight WINNER Wonder Woman xXx Return of Xander Cage Choice Action Movie Actor ChoiceActionMovieActor Brenton Thwaites Pirates of the Caribbean Dead Men Tell No Tales WINNER Chris Pine Wonder Woman Dwayne Johnson The Fate of the Furious Hugh Jackman...”
“Logan Johnny Depp Pirates of the Caribbean Dead Men Tell No Tales Vin Diesel The Fate of the Furious xXx Return of Xander Cage Choice Action Movie Actress ChoiceActionMovieActress Deepika Padukone xXx Return of Xander Cage WINNER Gal Gadot Wonder Woman Kaya Scodelario Pirates of the Caribbean Dead Men Tell...”


"2Rj Sailor - Power Ranger Taylor Lautner - Queen scream..."
"2luke Evans – beauty and beans award winner: Madelaine petsch – Riverdale Malcolm Barrett – timelesschoice scene Steeler (#choicescenesesteeler) champion: Camila Mendes – riverdalecolin O'Donoghue – once upon a time Josh GAD – beauty and beans award winner – guardian of galaxy."
"APA Riverdale champion Lili Reinhart Riverdale Millie Bobby Brown stranger thing Ryan destiny star chooses tvship bellarke Eliza Taylor Bob Morley 100 champion but Lili Reinhart Cole sprout Riverdale emison Shay Mitchell Sasha pieterse beautiful little liar karamel Chris wood Melissa Benoist super girl malec Matthew dadrio" Harry Shum... "
"Jr Shadow Hunter mortal instrument stydia Holland Roden Dylan o Brien junior wolf chooses lipstick draft Chris pine galgado wizard award winner Dan Stevens Emma Watson beauty and beast Jennifer Morrison Colin o Donohoe once Matthew Dario harrishom Jr Shadow Hunter mortal instrument Melissa..."
"Benoist Chris wood Supergirl Orlando Bloom Kayla Knightley Pirates of the Caribbean Dead speechless to choose the fate of movie villain joysmoville Lane Charlize Theron angry Elizabeth Bank Power Ranger James McAvoy split Javier Baden Pirates of the Caribbean Dead speechless winner Luke Evans beautiful..."
“… And the beast Priyanka Chopra Bay watch to choose breakthrough movie star to choose breakthrough movie star champion Ollie crevalho Mona dipika paduken XXX sand cage's return to Harry style Dunkirk Janel Monet hidden character Tom Holland spider man return zedarya spider man return to choose movie star to choose Chris Platte Zoe so The guardian of erdana is in the galaxy... "
"Volume..."
"2 Deepika Padukone Ruby Rose XXX Xander cage champion returns to Emma Watson Dan Stevens beauty and beast gal gadot Chris pine wizard Michelle Rodriguez Vin Diesel angry fate Zac Efron Dwayne Johnson Baywatch action movie choiceactionmovie Logan Pirates Caribbean Dead..."
"The fate of not telling a story angry transformers the last Knight champion Wonder Woman XXX returns to sander cage to choose action movie actor choice action movie actor brenton Thwaites the death of the Pirates of the Caribbean man the fate of not telling a story champion crisson Wonder Woman Dwyane Johanson angry Hugh Jackman..."
"Logan Johnny Depp's death row in Pirates of the Caribbean never mentions the fate of anger ×× sound cage's return ×× action movie actress talent show ×× sound cage's return winner Gail gadocchio tells the story of Pirates of the Caribbean death row...."



Number  171
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(The MTV VMAs would be eventful for her, too: she met her husband-to-be Russell Brand at the ceremony.)”
“Perry, meanwhile, was fresh off a tour backed by her breakthrough hit I Kissed a Girl, and racking up international accolades.”
“Kanye West’s pro-Beyoncé stage invasion at the MTV VMAs, which would still be a live wire for Swift in 2016 – sit tight, we’ll get there – was several months away.”
“July 2009: Taylor Swift shares the loveWe begin in 2009, when Swift was on the rise as a pop star, but was still recognised as a country singer.”
“Strap in.”
“Here’s a complete timeline – and please, let it be complete – of how two queens of the pop world began, maintained and resolved an unspeakably petty, but quite elaborate, dispute.”
“Who needs Game of Thrones?”
“You Need To Calm Down...”
“That s assuming anyway that the Katy Perry Taylor Swift feud which now dates back almost a decade is truly over and that détente was accomplished with only a literal olive branch a plate of baked goods and now a hug at the climax of Swift s new video for...”
“No matter how many partners you share or steal, how many backing dancers you tempt away, how much astonishingly unsubtle shade you throw online… there will always be friendship in the end.”


"(MTV VMA is also an eventful time for her: she met her husband to be, Russell Brand, at her wedding.)
"At the same time, Perry has just finished her tour, and her groundbreaking work" I kiss a girl "has won international acclaim."
"Kanye West's Pro Beyonce onstage invasion on MTV Vmas is still a live broadcast for swift in 2016 - wait and see, we'll get there - a few months to go."
"July 2009: Taylor Swift shared with us the love that began in 2009, when Swift was rising to become a pop star but still recognized as a country singer."
"Fasten your seat belt."
"This is a complete schedule - please let it be a complete schedule - how the two pop stars start, maintain and resolve an unspeakable trivial but rather complex dispute."
"Who needs a power game?"
"You need to calm down..."
"Anyway, it's assumed that Katy Perry Taylor Swift's feud can be traced back to nearly a decade ago, and now it's really over. Relaxation only needs a literal olive branch, a plate of baked goods, and now it can be completed with a hug at the climax of Swift's new video..."
"No matter how many partners you share or steal, how many dances you seduce, how many amazing and ignominious shadows you cast on the Internet There will always be friendship in the end. "



Number  172
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The couple plan to share custody of Henry and continue to raise him in New York.”
“IMDb credits...”
“As for Aronofsky and Weisz the couple had been planning to reteam they previously worked together on 2005 s sci fi flick The Fountain on a biopic of Jackie Kennedy but that project no longer is listed on either s...”
“She and the 007 star allegedly did some serious Bond-ing while working on the film Dream House earlier this year, though neither has confirmed any romance.”
“Notably, there have been rumors about Weisz and Daniel Craig.”
“Somewhere along the line things changed.”
“Weisz had also gushed to Redbook last year that she and the Wrestler filmmaker were committed "until death do us part" although no official vows had been exchanged.”
“I know it's a funny thing."”
“"It's just a feeling.”
“"Funnily enough, just recently I suddenly felt like I really would like to get married," Weisz said during an appearance on The View last January.”


"The couple plan to raise Henry together and continue to raise him in New York."
"IMDB credits..."
"As for Aronofsky and Wes, the couple planned to work together again. They worked together in the 2005 science fiction film fountains, which is a biography of Jackie Kennedy, but this project is no longer listed in both films..."
"It is said that earlier this year, she and the 007 film star had some serious relationships while shooting the movie" dream house ", but neither of them has confirmed any relationship."
"It's worth noting that there have been rumors about weiz and Daniel Craig."
"Somewhere along this line, things have changed."
Weiss also revealed to the red book last year that she and the wrestler's filmmaker had promised "to die" even though there was no official exchange of vows
"I know it's fun."
"It's just a feeling."
"Interestingly, just recently, I suddenly felt that I really wanted to get married," Weiss said on the show in January last year



Number  173
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Is this a fake rumor, or could Rihanna actually be pregnant?”
“Also, make sure to let us know what you think!”
“Head right here to see the photos for yourself.”
“However, people are noting that the singer has been increasingly wearing loose clothing in recent months, and this could be a sign that she’s trying to keep baby rumors on the down low.”
“Neither the pop star nor her billionaire boyfriend, Hassan Jameel, have given a response to the rumors.”
“Some are also saying that they can see a visible baby bump through her sheer white dress.”
“Although it’s unknown what the shoot was for, the singer appeared to be more full-figured than normal.”
“While there is still no official confirmation, some believe new photos prove that the singer is pregnant…According to MTO News, Rihanna recently took part in a secret photo shoot in Ibiza.”
“By austind03 on March 23, 2018Rumors of a Rihanna pregnancy have been swirling around the pop star for months now.”
“Rihanna Sports Possible Baby Bump In Secret Photo Shoot [PICS]Rumors of a Rihanna pregnancy have been swirling around the pop star for months now, and while neither she nor her boyfriend, Hassan Jameel, have confirmed anything, new photos appear to show the singer with a baby bump.”


"Is this a false rumor, or is Rihanna really pregnant?"
"And let us know what you think!"
"Look at the pictures yourself."
"However, people have noticed that the singer has been wearing more and more loose clothes in recent months, which may be a sign that she is trying to suppress the baby rumors."
"Neither the pop star nor her billionaire boyfriend, Hassan Jamil, responded to the rumors."
"Some also said they could see an obvious baby colliding through her pure white skirt."
"Although I don't know what the purpose of the shooting is, the singer seems to be more plump than normal people."
"Although there is no official confirmation yet, some people think that the new photos prove that the singer is pregnant According to MTO news, Rihanna recently took part in a secret photo shoot in Ibiza
"On March 23, 2008, rumors about Rihanna's pregnancy have been circulating around the pop star for several months."
"Rumors about Rihanna's pregnancy have been circulating around the pop star for several months. Although neither Rihanna nor her boyfriend Hassan Jamil have confirmed anything, new photos show that the singer has a small lump."



Number  174
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Since we don’t believe in the supernatural, the concept of a nontheistic but Satanic ritual seems like an oxymoron.”
“We see ourselves as aligning with a literary figure that is heavily misinterpreted, and undertaking the same mission.”
“For the last few years, I’ve found myself straddling a line between scientific objectivism and emotional catharsis with the subject.”
“I’m also a chapter head for The Satanic Temple, so writing and performing rituals has become a foundational and therapeutic practice for me.”
“New Year’s Eve ritual practiced by Americans in New York every year on January 31st at Midnight in which a giant ball is “dropped” from the top of Time Square and confetti is released to celebrate the arrival of another year.”
“Communion is a Christian ritual in which bread and wine are consumed to symbolically represent the body and blood of Christ being consummated and taken into his worshippers.”
“They are used to reinforce social bonds and structure.”Traditional Oriya Wedding Ceremony in India is a right-of-passage ritual practiced by those of the Hindu faith to ceremonialize the union between two people.”
“The formal definition in that field is:“Rituals are actions with intentional symbolic meaning undertaken for a specific cultural purpose, such as a rite of passage from childhood to adulthood, and may reinforce broader community social bonds, as in a wedding.”
“Coming from an academic background in anthropology, the anthropological definition is engrained in my mind.”
“Rituals have a strange role in my life.”


"Because we don't believe in supernatural phenomena, the concept of non theistic but Satanic Rituals seems to be a paradoxical modification."
"We believe that we are allied with a seriously misinterpreted literary figure and undertake the same mission."
"Over the past few years, I've found myself wandering between scientific objectivism and emotional catharsis."
"I'm also the branch director of the temple of Satan, so writing and performing rituals have become my foundation and therapeutic practice."
At the new year's Eve ceremony held in New York at midnight on January 31, Americans "throw" a big ball from the top of times square and release confetti to celebrate the arrival of the new year
"The Eucharist is a kind of Christian ceremony, which symbolically represents the consummation of Christ's body and blood with bread and wine, and brings it to his worshipers."
India's traditional Oriya wedding is a right of way ceremony held by Hindus to celebrate the union of two people
The formal definition of the field is: "rituals are intentional symbolic acts performed for specific cultural purposes, such as adulthood from childhood to adulthood, and may strengthen broader community social ties, such as weddings."
"From the academic background of anthropology, the definition of anthropology is deeply rooted in the hearts of the people."
"Ritual has a strange role in my life."



Number  175
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"At the moment, she wants more privacy.”
“She doesn’t want to be photographed.”
“"I used to pray that one of you guys would have a baby and now it’s like a faucet that we turned on that won’t turn off," she confessed.”
“Kris Jenner talks grandchildren(Image: Getty)During the upcoming Christmas special of Keeping Up With The Kardashians, the mother-of-six revealed what she was most thankful for – and got very emotional.”
“One fan commented on Twitter: "Half of the Christmas card are looking at something THEY’RE LOOKING AT KYLIE JENNER HOLDING THAT BABY IM TELLING U."”
“Kris and Kourtney are among some of the family members looking off-camera, beaming happily at something - or someone.”
“Fans were still convinced a baby announcement was on the way after spotting a 'clue' in one of the Kardashian Christmas calendar photos.”
“However, Kylie was nowhere to be seen at all, leaving fans sure that Travis Scott's girlfriend was heavily pregnant.”
“(Image: Twitter)Kardashian Christmas cardAfter 24 days of snippets from the famous Kardashian Christmas card, fans were convinced day 25, Christmas Day, would be the big reveal.”
“Photos taken "months ago" from her friend's birthday party, also show Kylie in an oversized jumper, concealing her figure.”


"At the moment, she wants more privacy."
"She didn't want to be photographed."
"I prayed for one of you to have a child, and now it's like we turn on a tap that doesn't turn off," she said
"Kris Jenner, the mother of six, revealed what she was most grateful for on the upcoming Christmas special to keep in touch with the kardashians - and was very emotional."
One fan commented on Twitter: "half of the Christmas cards are looking at what they see, Kelly Jenner holding the baby I told you."
"Chris and Courtney are looking at the camera with some family members, happily looking at something or someone."
"A clue was found in a photo of Kardashian's Christmas calendar, and fans still believe that the announcement of the baby is coming."
"However, Kelly was not seen at all, which convinced fans that Travis Scott's girlfriend was pregnant."
(photo source: Twitter) Kardashian Christmas card after 24 days of clips from the famous Kardashian Christmas card, fans are confident that the 25th, Christmas, will be the big unveiling. "
Photos taken at her friend's birthday party "a few months ago" also showed that Kelly was wearing an oversized pullover, hiding her figure. "



Number  176
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As far as Kourtney’s concerned, this bizarre situation is more proof Scott and his girlfriend are obsessed with her.’”
“But, also so typical of Scott.”
“He just calls her a narcissist and acts like she is crazy for mentioning it, which is so frustrating for her.”
“Advertisement‘[Kourtney] makes comments about it to Scott, and he laughs it off and tries to flip it on her.”
“@alansilfen A post shared by Sofia Richie (@sofiarichie) on Mar 7, 2018 at 7:39pm PSTWe have previously learned that Kourtney did try to discuss with Scott the fact that Sofia keeps on copying her look, but he laughed it off.”
“?”
“@milesrichie ?”
“Fans of KUWK know that all of these style elements are staples of Kourtney’s fashion.”
“Now, however, not only did she dye her hair brunette but her wardrobe consists of mainly dark blazers and crop tops as well as very thin sunglasses.”
“...and was wearing pretty colorful clothes...”


"As far as Courtney is concerned, this strange situation proves that Scott and his girlfriend are crazy about her."
"But it's also typical of Scott."
"He just called her narcissist and showed that she was crazy at the mention, which made her very depressed."
"Advertising" [Courtney] commented on it to Scott, who laughed it off and tried to vent it on her. "
"@ alansilfen Sofia Richie (@ sofiarichie) shared a post at 7:39 p.m. on March 7, 2018. We learned earlier that Kourtney did try to discuss with Scott that Sofia continued to imitate her expression, but he laughed it off."
“?”
"@ milesridge?"
"Cook's fans know that all these style elements are the main elements of kurtany fashion."
Now, however, she not only dyed her hair dark brown, but also had dark coats and jackets and very thin sunglasses in her wardrobe
“… Wearing bright clothes... "



Number  177
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That's the fun of it."”
“Tom already gets whatever he wants, but John draws the line at his wife," the insider said.”
“The Mission: Impossible 6 star also revealed that the movie's title confirming that Top Gun 2 will adopt the lead character's name in the title.”
“The sequel will be called, Top Gun: Maverick.”
“Following the announcement, no other official announcements regarding the movie's cast or plot were shared thereafter as the actor got involved in wrapping up MI6.”
“With no more official word available, a report by Star claims that Cruise has approached John Travolta's wife Kelly Preston to co-star in the movie.”
“Fans would remember that Preston was Cruise's co-star in Jerry Maguire.”
“Trending: Mission: Impossible 6 trailerBizarrely, the news report associates his request to the actress who is associated with Scientology.”
“A source allegedly claims, "Tom thinks she's super talented, not to mention sexy" and wants her in the movie.”
“But Travolta is apparently opposing Cruise's offer because the former resents the fellow Scientologist.”


"That's the fun."
"Tom has got everything he wants, but John is very hard on his wife," the source said
"Mission: impossible 6 stars also revealed that the title of the movie confirmed that top gun 2 will use the name of the protagonist in the title."
"The sequel will be named" top gun: maverick. "
"After the announcement, because the actor participated in the finishing work of MI6, there has been no official announcement about the cast or plot of the film since then."
"Without more official information, according to the star, cruise has approached John Travolta's wife, Kelly Preston, to co star in the film."
"Fans will remember that Preston was Cruise's partner in Jerry Maguire."
"Trend: Mission: impossible traitor No. 6 strangely, the news reports linked his request to the actress associated with Scientology."
It is said that a source said, "Tom thinks she is brilliant, let alone sexy", and hopes that she can play in the film
"But Travolta obviously opposed Cruise's proposal because he hated his Scientology companions."



Number  178
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'It’s time I introduced you to my brother Tony Bieber,' he captioned the photo.”
“In the profile shot, the singer is shown with a pony tail, a weak chin and an elongated nose.”
“...another example of the singer not being afraid to poke fun at himself Bieber posted an unflattering photoshopped version of himself to Instagram on Thursday...”
“Sun kissed Earlier this month the Despacito singer posted a much more flattering series of pictures to his Instagram account Jesus Christ pose In the March 8 photos the sun bathed pop star shows off his toned and tattooed torso as he stood in the sand arms held aloft In...”
“In the March 8 photos, the sun-bathed pop star shows off his toned and tattooed torso as he stood in the sand, arms held aloft.”
“Earlier this month, the Despacito singer posted a much more flattering series of pictures to his Instagram account.”
“...spokesperson for the California based direct marketing company...”
“Pimp le my ride Justin Bieber might need to start using Proavtiv again based on a recent Instagram Story in which the 24 year old showed off a collection of spots on his forehead The star joined the likes of Katy Perry and Jessica Simpson in 2010 to become a...”
“The Baby singer captioned the post: 'Pimples are in.'”
“But it looks like Justin Bieber might need to start using the anti-pimple face wash again, based on a recent Instagram Story in which the 24-year-old showed off a collection of spots on his forehead.”


"It's time I introduced you to my brother Tony Bieber," he wrote under the title of the photo
In the side shot, the singer has a horsetail, a weak chin and an elongated nose
“… Another example of singers not afraid of self mockery, Bieber released an unpleasant version of his own Photoshop on instagram on Thursday... "
"Earlier this month, the desperate singer posted a series of more flattering photos on his instagram account. In the photo on March 8, the sun bathed pop star stood on the beach, holding his arms high, displaying his strong, tattooed torso..."
"In the March 8 photo, the sun bathed pop star stands on the beach with his arms raised, showing his body-building, tattooed torso."
Earlier this month, the singer, despacito, posted a series of more flattering photos on instagram
“… Spokesperson for California direct sales company... "
"Pimp Justin Bieber, my car, may need to start using proavtiv again. According to a recent instagram report, Bieber, 24, showed a series of spots on his forehead. The star joined Katie Perry and Jessica Simpson in 2010 and became a..."
"The Baby singer wrote in her post: 'here comes the zit.'"
"However, according to a recent instagram report, Justin Bieber may need to start using the anti acne lotion again. In this report, Bieber, 24, showed a series of spots on his forehead."



Number  179
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Jen is of course married to actor/director Justin Theroux and they stepped out at the 2017 Oscars together just this past weekend.”
““This is nothing new, he didn’t have to jump through hoops to get Jennifer‘s number.”Brad is currently in the midst of a custody battle with Angelina over their six children – Maddox, 15, Pax, 13, Zahara, 12, Shiloh, 10, and twins Knox and Vivienne, 8.”
““They have been friends for a while and often text,” a source told the mag.”
“According to People, the former couple – who divorced back in 2005 after five years of marriage – have been in contact recently.”
“Jennifer Aniston is reportedly talking ex-husband Brad Pitt through his divorce from Angelina Jolie.”


"Of course, Jennifer married actor / Director Justin Cyrus, and just last weekend, they went to the 2017 Oscars together."
"It's nothing new. He doesn't have to make a fuss about getting Jennifer's phone number." Brad is in custody with Angelina over their six children, Maddox, 15, parks, 13, Zahara, 12, Shiloh, 10, and twins Knox and Vivian, 8
"They are already good friends and text a lot," a source told the magazine
"According to people familiar with the matter, the former couple, who divorced five years after their marriage in 2005, have been in touch recently."
"It's reported that Jennifer Aniston is talking about the divorce of her ex husband Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie."



Number  180
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The couple have been spotted together multiple times, but are keeping their relationship as private as possible for the time being.”
“However, he is currently dating Fifty Shades of Grey star Dakota Johnson.”
“Gwyneth Paltrow and her fiance, Brad Falchuk, are reportedly making some big plans.”
“The couple are not only preparing to tie the knot, but they are also allegedly making room in their lives for a baby.”
“According to a May 21 report by Radar Online, Gwyneth Paltrow and Brad Falchuk are planning for a baby.”
“Paltrow, 45, already shares two children, Apple, 14, and Moses, 12, with her ex-husband, Coldplay frontman Chris Martin.”
“However, she’s ready to build a brand new life with Falchuk and the two are reportedly looking into the adoption process.”
“Sources tell the outlet that Gwyneth and Brad were exploring the possibility of IVF to conceive their own biological child, but changed their minds.”
“The insider also claims that the pair seriously considered using a surrogate to have a child, much like Kanye West and Kim Kardashian recently did.”
“However, after much consideration they came to the conclusion that they would like to adopt a child.”


"The couple have been found together many times, but try to keep a private relationship for the time being."
"But he's currently dating 50 grey stars, Dakota Johnson."
"Gwyneth Paltrow and her fiance Brad falchuk are reported to be working on some big plans."
"The couple are not only preparing to get married, they are also said to be making room for their children in their lives."
"Gwyneth Paltrow and Brad falchuk are planning to have a baby, according to radar online on May 21."
"Paltrow, 45, has two children with Chris Martin, the former husband of Coldplay, apple, 14, and Moses, 12."
"However, she is ready to build a new life with falchuk, who are reported to be studying the adoption process."
"Gwyneth and Brad are exploring the possibility of IVF to give birth to their own children, but they have changed their mind," the source told the media
"The source also said the two had seriously considered using surrogate mothers to have children, much like Kanye West and Kim Kardashian's recent practice."
"However, after careful consideration, they came to the conclusion that they wanted to adopt a child."



Number  181
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“BackgridShelton -- who divorced Miranda Lambert in 2015 -- is also pretty smitten with Stefani.”
“The two were recently spotted strolling down the beach in Playa del Carmen, Mexico, and even ran into Shelton's pal, Luke Bryan.”
“Stefani wore a white bikini top that she paired with a black sarong and a tan sweater, while Shelton sported a blue trucker hat that matched his board shorts and button-down shirt.”
“While they may have been an unexpected pair when they first started dating, Shelton and Stefani have been going strong for some time now.”
“Backgrid"Gwen really loves Blake for who he is and has never once tried to change him or anything about him.”
“She even loves his style!"”
“...the source tells ET.”
“"She thinks he's such a manly man and is incredibly attracted to that about him."”
“When they're not taking romantic walks along the beach, the couple often visit Shelton's house in Oklahoma along with Stefani's three sons with ex-husband Gavin Rossdale, 11-year-old Kingston, 9-year-old Zuma and 3-year-old Apollo.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"Beckgrid Sheldon, who divorced Miranda Lambert in 2015, is also fascinated by Stephanie."
"Recently they were found wandering on Carmen beach in Mexico and even met Sheldon's friend Luke Bryan."
Stefani wore a white bikini top with a black sarong and Tan sweater, while Sheldon wore a blue trucker hat to match his board shorts and button down shirt
"Although they may have been an unexpected couple when they first started dating, Sheldon and Stephanie have been gone for some time."
"Background" Gwen really loves black because of who he is and has never tried to change him or anything about him
"She even likes his style!"
“… Source tells et
"She thinks he's a very manly person and is fascinated by that."
"When they don't take romantic walks on the beach, the couple often visit Sheldon's house in Oklahoma with Stefani's three sons, as well as Gavin Rossdale, Kingston, 11, Zuma, 9 and Apollo, 3."



Number  182
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“MORE : Angelina Jolie furious as she ‘can’t bring kids to UK due to Brad Pitt divorce talks’MORE : Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie still ‘at odds’ over custody of their six children – two years after split...”
“She was allowed to bring one guest – more than most people got, actually – but didn’t have a date to take.”
“Serena William was there with her husband Alexis Ohanian and David Beckham looked dapper with his wife Victoria, whose stony expression inspired the creation of a meme.”
“James Corden, Idris Elba, Oprah and George Clooney were also in attendance, among hundreds of stars.”
“Angelina Jolie however, did not attend the nuptials on 19 May.”
“There’s a rumour going around about why the actress decided the wedding wasn’t for her, and it’s got to do with her children.”
“According to a ‘source’ who spoke to Star Magazine, Jolie had been invited to Meghan Markle and Prince Harry’s wedding, but refused to go because her children weren’t invited.”
“AdvertisementAdvertisementThe source allegedly told the magazine: ‘She was insulted that her kids weren’t invited.”
“‘In the end, she decided to skip it altogether’.”
“If you've got a celebrity story, video or pictures get in touch with the Metro.co.uk entertainment team by emailing us celebtips@metro.co.uk, calling 020 3615 2145 or by visiting our Submit Stuff page - we'd love to hear from you.”


"More: Angelina Jolie angrily said she couldn't bring her children to the UK because of Brad Pitt's divorce negotiations." More: Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie are still "at loggerheads" over the custody of their six children - two years after the breakup... "
"She was allowed to bring a guest - actually more than most people - but without a date."
Serena William and her husband Alexis o'hanian are together, while David Beckham and his wife Victoria are together. Victoria's cold expression inspires meme's creation
"Hundreds of stars, including James Colden, Idris Elba, Oprah and George Clooney, were also present."
However, Angelina Jolie did not attend the wedding on May 19
"There's a rumor that why the actress decided the wedding wasn't for her, it's about her children."
"According to a source interviewed by star magazine, Julie was invited to the wedding of Megan markel and Prince Harry, but she refused because the children were not invited."
"Her child was not invited and she was insulted," the source said to the magazine, according to the report
"In the end, she decided to skip it completely."
"If you have celebrity stories, videos or pictures, please email us with Metro entertainment team at: celebtips@metro.co.uk , please call 020 3615 2145 or visit our submission page - we are glad to hear from you. "



Number  183
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“For the latest celebrity news and interviews, subscribe to our new podcast "In Case You Missed Us" below!”
“For access to all our exclusive celebrity videos and interviews – Subscribe on YouTube!”
“Finalizing the divorce has been a long process because of it.”For more on Garner and Affleck’s post-divorce relationship, pick up the new issue of Us Weekly, on stands now!”
““Jen is hesitant to sign off until she’s certain that the kids will be in the best hands at all time.”
““The one thing she’s not flexible on is sobriety,” the source tells Us.”
“They both want what’s best for the kids and have made a commitment to see that through.”While the estranged couple filed for divorce in 2017, the paperwork has yet to be finalized, partially due to Affleck’s past struggles with alcohol abuse.”
“She tends to find out about things, and Ben is very open with her.”
““She wants him to be honest and he usually is.”
“According to the insider, “Ben understands and has honored her request.”“They’re good friends,” the source adds.”
“As a result, the source notes that one of reasons the Love, Simon actress does not want the Saturday Night Live producer around her kids is “the fact that Ben had an affair with her.”However, the exes are keeping the peace.”


For the latest celebrity news and interviews, subscribe to our new podcast "in case you miss us" below
"To access all of our exclusive celebrity videos and interviews, subscribe on YouTube!"
"The final determination of divorce is a long process, because it's not easy." More about the relationship between Ghana and Affleck after their divorce, pick up a new issue of American weekly, in the stands
"Jane is hesitant to sign until she is sure that the children are always in the best care."
"One thing she's inflexible about is being sober," the source told us
"They all want what's best for their children and promise to stick to it." Although the separated couple filed for divorce in 2017, the paperwork has yet to be finalized, in part because Affleck has been fighting alcoholism in the past
"She likes to know something, and Ben is very honest with her."
"She wants him to be honest, and he's usually honest."
"According to people familiar with the matter," Ben understood and respected her request. "They are good friends," the source added
As a result, the source pointed out that one of the reasons why the heroine of love Simon didn't want the producer of live on Saturday night to be with her children was "the fact that Ben had an affair with her.". However, the ex girlfriends remained silent



Number  184
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Mel C shocked onlookers by walking to Geri’s house at 12.23pm in stark contrast to Victoria, who turned up at 12.20pm in the back of a blacked-out Mercedes.”
“He was followed by Emma, at 12.20pm.”
“32 Scary Spice Mel B arrives to reunion meeting in VW Golf Credit Doug Seeburg The Sun 32 Geri Horner pictured in her Aston Martin on drive to the get together venue Credit The Mega Agency 32 Victoria Beckham arrives in her Mercedes Credit Splash News For the moment she...”
“But yesterday she was the most excited about it.”
““For many years, it’s been Victoria who has put the block on the Spice Girls returning.”
““But she wants that to change and really embrace being back in the spotlight with the Spice Girls.”
““She knows David is viewed as the showbiz force in their marriage and she is now a fashion businesswoman.”
“2 Become 1 Our insider revealed Victoria knows this is the last chance saloon for the Spice Girls their last chance to get back into their hot pants...”
“32 David Beckham recently announced his move back to Miami Credit AFP or licensors 32 Spice Girls reunite with Simon Fuller as they plan comeback 32 Spice Girls were known for their platform shoes and catchy tunes in the Nineties Credit Rex Features Music video for Spice Girls hit single...”
“They ate sushi, kissed and hugged, and shared stories about their kids.”


"Mel C arrived at Gree's house step by step at 12:23 noon, in sharp contrast to Victoria, who appeared in the back seat of a stalled Mercedes Benz at 12:20 noon, shocking the onlookers."
"At 12:20 p.m., Emma followed him."
"32 horror spice Mel B arrives to reunite at Volkswagen Golf credit Doug Sieberg sun 32 greyhona in her Aston Martin in driving to the meeting place credit big institution 32 Victoria Beckham arrives at her Mercedes credit splash news moment she..."
"But yesterday she was most excited about it."
"For many years, it was Victoria who hindered the return of the spice girls."
"But she wants to change that and really wants to go back to the spotlight with the spice girls."
"She knew that David was seen as a new force in the show business in their marriage, and she is now a fashion businesswoman."
"2 becomes 1. Our insiders say that Victoria knows this is the last chance for the spice girls, the last chance for them to put on hot pants..."
"32 David Beckham recently announced that he will return to Miami credit AFP or license 32 spice girls to reunite with Simon fuller because they plan to return to 32 Spice Girls famous for their platform shoes and pop music in the 1990s credit Rex functional music video spice girls play sheet..."
"They eat sushi, they kiss and hug, they share their children's stories."



Number  185
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Follow me on Twitter @NardineSaad...”
“The photo, albeit extremely grainy and pretty innocuous, shows the “FourFiveSeconds” singer and the Oscar-nominated actor, side by side, lighting and holding cigarettes.”
“The Birthday Cake singer and the Wolf of Wall Street star keep fueling dating rumors by attending the same birthday parties but his rep said Tuesday that he s single and has been for some time The two were was first linked in the tabloids in January when they both...”
“...hit a birthday bash at the Playboy Mansion according to several reports...”
“They were spotted at another birthday party at a West Hollywood hotel shortly after.”
“The latest b-day fiesta to kick up romantic speculation was the Barbadian beauty’s own -- her 27th -- on Feb. 21 at Jim Goldstein’s mansion in Beverly Hills.”
“On Monday, a photo surfaced showing them together for the first time, E!”
“News reported.”
“AdvertisementNow, we mean “together” in the loosest form of the word.”
“Hey, it isn’t cake, but it’s the first time they’ve actually appeared with one another in a pic.”


"In Twitter@NardineSaad Follow me on the Internet... "
"This picture is extremely rough and harmless, but it shows the 45 second singer lighting a cigarette side by side with the Oscar nominated actor."
"The birthday cake singer and the wolf of Wall Street star attended the same birthday party, fueling rumors of dating, but his agent said on Tuesday that he had been single for some time and that they were first linked in the January tabloid when they were both..."
“… A birthday party was held at Playboy mansion, it was reported that... "
"Soon after, they were found at another birthday party at a hotel in West Hollywood."
"The latest b-day carnival that sparked romantic speculation was the Barbados beauty's own - 27 year old - Jim Goldstein's mansion in Beverly Hills on February 21."
"On Monday, a picture came to the surface, showing them together for the first time, e!"
"News coverage."
Now, we use the most relaxed form to mean "together"
"Hey, it's not a cake, but it's the first time they've actually appeared in a picture."



Number  186
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I haven’t had that feeling in awhile.””
“It feels good.”
“The Weeknd reportedly wants to start a family with girlfriend Selena Gomez.”
“According to Hollywood Life, the “Starboy” singer, 27, is hoping to welcome a baby girl with Selena, 25.”
“(And now all we can think about is how freaking cute their child would be.)”
“He has thought about starting a family with Selena at some point down the line maybe in a few years and he has told her that he would want to have a girl because nothing would be better for him then to have a cute little Selena look alike bouncing...”
“...around a source told the website...”
“He s mentioned to her many times that two of her would always be better than one MORE Selena Gomez Opens up About Her Relationship With The Weeknd Says She Loves Tremendously Big Photo Credit Getty Images It makes sense that The Weeknd real name Abel Tesfaye would be thinking...”
“...about babies before marriage...”
“During a February 2017 cover story interview with GQ, the Grammy winner — who began dating Selena in January — told the magazine that becoming a dad is more important to him than tying the knot.”


"I haven't felt that for a long time."
"It feels good."
"It's reported that this week she wants to marry her girlfriend Selena Gomez."
The 27 year old star boy singer hopes to greet a baby girl with 25-year-old Serena, Hollywood Daily reported
"Now all we can think of is how lovely their children will be."
"He once thought about forming a family with Selena sometime in the next few years. He told her that he would want a girl, because there is nothing better for him than to make a lovely little Selena look like a bouncing girl..."
“… A source told the website
"He mentioned to her many times that two are better than one. Selena Gomez has made public her relationship with the weekend, saying that she likes big photo credit cards very much. The real name of "weekend" is Abel tesfaye, who thinks... "
“… About premarital babies... "
"In an interview with GQ magazine's cover story in February 2017, the Grammy winner started dating Selena in January this year and told the magazine that it was more important for him to be a father than to get married."



Number  187
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She’s sick to death of Blake carrying on in interviews about how Gwen ‘saved my life’ and saying he was ‘at rock bottom, in the middle of hell’ after their divorce.”Scroll through the gallery to relive Blake and Miranda’s cutest moments!”
““Miranda is tired of Gwen incessantly gushing about her romance with Blake,” said another source.”
“She’s also taken issue with the constant gushing Gwake does over each other in public.”
““Miranda would welcome a showdown with Gwen, to get everything in the open once and for all,” a source previously told In Touch.”
“The “Little Red Wagon” singer moved on shortly after with Anderson — though these ladies have been at odds ever since the mother-of-three started dating her co-star.”
“It was revealed in November of that year that Gwen and Blake started dating.”
“The couple announced back in July 2015 that they finalized their divorce after four years of marriage, which was right around when Gwen filed to end her marriage from the Bush front man.”
““I just want to say thank you for letting me release my heartbreak and sharing it with me,” she said.”
“None of them need to be living in the past!”Even though Miranda has moved on with Anderson East, who accompanied her to Sunday night’s show, she still made it a point to bring up the “heartbreak” that her ex-husband caused.”
““Gwen struggled to get over Gavin [Rossdale] but she did it and now it’s all about her relationship with Blake.”


"She told Blake in the interview about how Gwen" saved my life "and said that he was" in the bottom, in the hell "after the divorce and felt sick to death." Scroll through the gallery and revisit the most lovely moments of black and Miranda
"Miranda is tired of Gwen talking about her romance with black," another source said
"She also expressed dissatisfaction with Gwak's constant talk to each other in public."
"Miranda will welcome a showdown with Gwen to make everything public once and for all," a source told the contact earlier
The "little red car" singer soon broke up with Anderson - though the women have been at loggerheads since the mother of three started dating her partner
"In November of the same year, Gwen and black started dating."
"The couple announced as early as July 2015 that they had finalized the divorce agreement four years after their marriage, when Gwen proposed to end the marriage to President Bush."
"I just want to say thank you for letting me release my heartbreak and share it with me," she said
"They don't need to live in the past! "Although Miranda has been with Anderson East, who accompanied her on the Sunday evening show, she has deliberately mentioned the" heartbreak "caused by her ex husband."
"Gwen tried to overcome Gavin (rosdale), but she did. Now it's all about her relationship with Blake."



Number  188
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
““It kills a few birds with one stone!”We pay for juicy info!”
““What better way of pledging his loyalty to America by saying his vows here,” added the source.”
““George is feeling a lot more sociable since he eased up on his work duties, and he’d love to organize a fancy wedding in either New York City or L.A,” said the source.”
““This is a great way of throwing a gigantic party for their A-list pals, as well as celebrating their homecoming in a romantic and classy way.”The Money Monster actor is planning to help with preparations in a major way.”
““It’s always bugged George that so many of their friends couldn’t attend the first time around in Italy,” a source told Radar of Clooney, 56, who tied the knot with 39-year-old Amal in Venice in 2014.”
“Amal & George Clooney To Renew Vows Couple plans star-studded ceremony in the U.S.RadarOnline.com can exclusively reveal George and Amal Clooney are planning to renew their vows in a star-studded Hollywood ceremony, which will coincide with their full-time return to America!”
“Amal & George Clooney To Renew VowsHere Comes The Bride — Again!”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"Kill two birds with one stone! "We pay for interesting information!"
"What better way to guarantee his loyalty to the United States, say his oath here," the source added
"Since George relaxed his job responsibilities, he feels more sociable and would love to have a fancy wedding in New York or Los Angeles," the source said
"It's a great way to hold a huge party for their A-list friends and celebrate their return home in a romantic and elegant way." Money monster actors are planning to help with the preparation in a major way
"Many of their friends can't attend the first time they come to Italy, which has been bothering George," a source told radar. Clooney, 56, married Amar, 39, in Venice in 2014
Amar and George Clooney will have a starry wedding in the United States. RadarOnline.com The website can exclusively reveal that George and Amar Clooney plan to renew their contracts at Hollywood's starry wedding, which will coincide with their full-time return to the United States! "
"Amar renewed his contract with George Clooney. Here comes the bride again!"



Number  189
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Ben Affleck Spotted Out With Playboy Model Shauna Sexton Again Amid Romance RumorsBen Affleck's Reported Playboy Model Dinner Date Further Fuels Romance RumorsJennifer Garner and Ben Affleck's Divorce Case Could Be Dismissed...”
“"It’s strange to me," Shookus said of her newfound notoriety.”
““They really tried to make it work and they just couldn’t right now,” the source says.”
““Their families came first, but ultimately having a bi-coastal relationship was difficult.”
“They’re amicable.”The news comes after the 46-year-old actor has been snapped two times with 22-year-old Playboy model Shauna Sexton, sparking romance rumors.”
“On Sunday, the two were all smiles going through a Jack In the Box drive-thru in Los Angeles, and last Thursday night, they were photographed leaving Nobu Malibu together.”
“Another source, who is close to Sexton, tells ET that Affleck and Sexton are currently “having fun, it’s light,” noting that the couple just recently met.”
“ET has reached out to Affleck's rep for comment.”
“Meanwhile, Shookus has since deleted her Instagram account.”
“Shookus and Affleck were last spotted together in June, when they enjoyed dinner with her parents in Santa Monica, California.”


"Embedded code restart" content: Ben Affleck and Playboy model Shawna Sexton once again spread rumors. Ben Affleck reported that Playboy model's dinner date further encouraged romance. Rumor has it that the divorce case between Jennifer Garner and Ben Affleck can be rejected... "
"It's strange to me," shookus said of her new reputation
"They're really trying to make it work, they just can't now," the source said
"Their family comes first, but it's difficult to have a coastal relationship in the end."
"They are very friendly." The news came after the 46 year old actor and 22-year-old Playboy model Shawna Sexton were filmed twice, sparking romantic rumors
"Last Sunday, the two were smiling as they passed by in a" Jack in a box "car in Los Angeles. Last Thursday night, they were photographed leaving Malibu together."
Another source close to Sexton told et that Affleck and Sexton are "having a good time and relaxing" and pointed out that the couple just met recently
"Et has contacted a representative of Affleck for advice."
Meanwhile, shookus has removed her instagram account
The last time shawkes and Affleck were found together was in June, when they had dinner with her parents in Santa Monica, California



Number  190
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“To finish out the week, the real estate star is answering all your questions about her successful TV series: from everything about flipped houses to flip flops.”
“Home during fashion week to show us how it's done.”
“Whether she's tiling walls for a renovation project or switching to mom duty with her two children, this is one woman who's always on the move—and she took over E!”
“In addition to starring in one of HGTV's most popular shows, Flip or Flop, Christina is a real estate investor and interior design expert.”
“'s celebrity guest editor for lifestyle and home.”
“Christina El Moussa has signed on as E!”


"To end the week, this real estate star is answering all your questions about her successful TV series, from all about flipping houses to flipping flip flops."
"Go home during fashion week and show us how it works."
"Whether she is laying tiles for decoration projects or taking her two children to become a mother, this is a woman who is always moving. She took over e!"
"In addition to starring in one of HGTV's most popular shows, flop, Christina is also a real estate investor and interior design expert."
"Celebrity guest editor of lifestyle and family magazine."
"Christina al Moussa has signed e!"



**Something goes wrong**
“Then again, he's managed to crossover into fashion on his own terms and breaking into the food industry may be no different — so long as he can sell comfort food like Yeezys.”
“Few celebrities have actually thrived in that space, as just today brought the closure of Jessica Biel's West Hollywood restaurant Au Fudge.”
“While the idea of a Kardashian-approved restaurant in Calabasas seems too impossible to fail, West would be taking a risk in venturing into the food and service industry.”
“Another thing that would likely delight West is being able to design custom uniforms for his restaurant staff.”
“Whatever does end up on the menu, it would be shocking if it didn't include ice cream, which is one of the few things guaranteed to make West smile.”
““You guys don’t understand, I’ve been making this food since high school, so when I started this post all of my high school friends were DM’ing me saying, ‘Blast from the past!,'” Kardashian explained earlier this year.”
“...host Terrence J who said You made me a believer...”
“While Kardashian received some backlash after first sharing photos from her meal back in July of 2016 she later posted testimonials from people she s cooked for like Kevin Hart who told her You did that and actor and TV”
“...her SoulFoodSundays...”
“West could always pad the menu with recipes from his wife as she s shared her love of cooking on social media showing off her own fried chicken cornbread mac and cheese sweet potatoes and collard greens as part of...”


"Once again, his success in entering the fashion world in his own way may not make any difference as long as he can sell comfort food like yeezys."
"Few celebrities really thrive in this field. Today, Jessica Bell's Au fudge restaurant in West Hollywood is closed."
"The idea of opening a restaurant in Calabasas that Kardashian approved restaurant seems unlikely to fail, but west will venture into the food and services industry."
"Another thing that may please West is the ability to design custom uniforms for restaurant staff."
"No matter what's on the menu at the end, it's shocking if it doesn't include ice cream, which is one of the few things that guarantees West to smile."
"You don't understand. I've been cooking this dish since high school, so when I started writing this post, all my high school friends were saying to me," from the past! Kardashian explained earlier this year
“… The host Terence J said, "you made me a believer..."
"Although Kardashian received some backlash after sharing her first meal photo in July 2016, she later released her recommendation letter for cooked food objects such as Kevin Hart, who told her that you did, as well as actors and TV."
“… Her soul's food... "
"West can always fill in her wife's recipes on the menu, because she shares her love of cooking on social media, showing off her fried chicken, corn bread Mac and cheese, sweet potato and kale are..."



Number  192
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“In the […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“The magazine claims the actor wants to “thank his wife” for “sticking by his side for better and for worse,” but Gossip Cop has learned he doesn’t actually intend on walking down the aisle again to do so.”
“Adam and Jackie Sandler are not renewing their vows, despite a made-up report from Star.”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
"In ] IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
The magazine claimed that the actor wanted to "thank his wife" and "support him for good or bad", but gossip police already knew that he did not intend to go down the aisle again to do so
"Adam and Jackie Sandler didn't update their vows, even though star made up a report."



Number  193
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“...until the babies birth We pay for juicy info...”
“...continued the insider George 55 and 39 year old Amal reunite in the mornings for a snuggle and so he can feel his twins jumping about in her tummy But she has zero libido right now and they both need their sleep so he knows he s in the room...”
“She booted him out and he didn t complain either said the source who notes that neither of them have been getting any sleep He snores like a monster especially after a few tequilas while she s up every hour virtually needing to use the bathroom Despite their overnight separation...”
“According to an insider, Amal banned her husband from the bedroom now that she’s in her third trimester, RadarOnline.com has been told.”
“George & Amal Clooney Sleeping In Separate Bedrooms ‘She booted him out and he didn’t complain.’George and Amal Clooney are sleeping in separate beds — but not for the reason most might assume!”
“Trouble In Paradise?”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
“… Before the baby is born, we pay for interesting information... "
“…… People familiar with the matter, George Amar, 55, and 39, went on to say that they got together in the morning and cuddled together so that he could feel his twins bouncing in her stomach, but now she has no sexual desire and they all need to sleep so that he knows he's in the room... "
"She drove him out, and he didn't complain," the source said. He noticed that both of them didn't sleep well. He snored like a monster, especially when she got up. Although they separated overnight, she went to the toilet almost every hour... "
"According to people familiar with the matter, Amar is now in the third trimester of her pregnancy and her husband is not allowed to enter the bedroom, RadarOnline.com The website has been informed. "
"George and Amar Clooney sleep in different bedrooms." she kicked him out, and he didn't complain. "George and Amar Clooney sleep in different beds - but not for what most people might think!"
"Trouble in heaven?"



Number  194
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“What's the biggest surprise in terms of being on set and making a movie, was there something you were really shocked about?”
“It's cool that they loved all of it and cool that they could be useful.”
“Hildebrand: It's awesome, yeah, for my character development it was really great because I could literally give her my own biography, I could give her whatever I wanted her to be.”
“...advertisingYour character was only in one comic book before she was killed, so I'm curious, you get to create this character for the audience, so what's it like to take what little there is and build off it?”
“They don't really get along but they're on the same side, so, yeah.”
“Her relationship with Deadpool is friendly, it's like a brother-sister relationship.”
“So she runs at things and explodes at them, and she's Colossus' sidekick.”
“She is a 15 year old psychic, she reads the future, and she also is her own personal cannonball, she’s a warhead.”
“Image via 20th Century FoxBrianna Hildebrand: I am Brianna Hildebrand, I play Negasonic Teenage Warhead.”
“Question: Start by introducing yourself and your character and her relationship to Deadpool.”


"What's the biggest surprise in setting and making movies? Is there something that really shocked you?"
"Cool, they like it all, cool, they can be useful."
"Hildebrand: it's great, yes, it's really great for my character development, because I can give her my own biography, I can give her anything I want."
“… Advertisement: your character only appeared in a comic book before she was killed, so I'm curious. If you want to create this character for the audience, what's it like to replace it? "
"They don't get along very well, but they're on the same side, so, yes."
"She has a friendly relationship with Deadpool, just like a brother and sister relationship."
"So she's running at things, exploding at them, she's the giant's partner."
"She's a 15-year-old psychic, she reads the future, she's her own shell, she's a warhead."
"Picture from 20th Century Fox Brianna Hildebrand: I'm Brianna Hildebrand, and I'm playing a young Caucasian warhead."
"Question: first, introduce yourself, your character and her relationship with Deadpool."



Number  195
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She gives the actress credit for exploring another religion.”
“Lifestyle.”
“Story continues@lindsaylohan is getting fitted for a hijab on her insta live right now and I am LIVING #Traditional — Evan ☕️BlackWhite (@EvBenjamin) February 17, 2018Can we deep, a whole fabulous @lindsaylohan repping at London Modest Fashion week @HauteElan!”
“Some people really into this look were impressed by her interest, including the designers.”
“Lohan’s efforts to respect Muslim traditions are getting mixed reactions.”
“They were referencing the Muslim diet and referring to avoiding non-halal makeup.”
“!” according to their social media post.”
“According to halal/vegetarian/vegan makeup retailer HawaCosmetics, Lohan stopped by their booth and told them about “how she’s into halal cosmetics and what she’s actually wearing on her face today was all halal!”
“Not only did she wear the right clothing, she also wore the right makeup.”
““Fashion doesn’t always have to be so naked and can be adventurous and still beautiful, with a strong group of women behind it,” Lohan said.”


"She praised the actress for exploring another religion."
"Lifestyle."
"The story goes on @ LindsayLohan is installing a headscarf on her insta live. I live a traditional life - Evan ☕ Blackwhite (@ evbenjamin) February 17, 2018 can we deep, a whole fabric@lindsaylohan  repping at London mustude Fashion  week@hautelan ！”
"Some people who really like the look are impressed by her interest, including designers."
"Rohan's efforts to respect Muslim traditions have received mixed responses."
"They mean Muslim diet, they mean avoiding non halal cosmetics."
"!" according to their social media posts. "
According to Hawa cosmetics, a retailer of halal / vegan / vegan cosmetics, Lohan came to their stall and told them "how she likes halal cosmetics, she's wearing halal on her face today!"
"She's not only wearing the right clothes, she's wearing the right make-up."
"Fashion doesn't have to be so naked. It can be risky or beautiful. There is a strong female group behind it," Rohan said



Number  196
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[10]References [ edit ]”
“...high school...”
“Monica also tells a crestfallen Joey that she will not be cooking a turkey because of Will's, Chandler's, Rachel's and Phoebe's aversion to the poultry.”
“Will is completely dumbfounded by this revelation, but takes pleasure in the fact that Ross got Rachel pregnant but is not going to marry her.”
“They agree to be civil and reveal to Will that they are now having a baby together.”
“...that they have too much of an important history to fixate on the past...”
“Rachel demands that Ross recant the rumor by calling everyone from school but Monica puts them both in their place by reminding them that Rachel s rumor put Ross on the social radar that Ross and Will s rumor had no effect whatsoever on Rachel s queen bee status and...”
“Rachel feels betrayed by Ross, until Monica reminds her that she started a rumor of her own that Ross made out with the school's 50-year-old librarian, though a horrified Ross confirms it as true.”
“Rachel is immediately attracted to Will unable to recognise him but Will is openly hostile and this culminates in his proud announcement that he and Ross founded the I Hate Rachel club in high school and initiated a rumor that she was a hermaphrodite which was spread throughout their entire...”
“Throughout the episode, Joey battles the enormous turkey, eventually changing into Phoebe's maternity clothing to ease the strain on his stomach.”


"[10] reference [Edit]"
“… High school
"Monica also told dejected Joey that she couldn't make Turkey because will, Chandler, Rachel and Phoebe hated poultry."
Will is stunned by the news, but he's glad rose got Rachel pregnant and doesn't want to marry her
"They agreed to be polite and revealed to will that they are having a baby together now."
“… They have too much important history to focus on the past... "
"Rachel asks Ross to call everyone in the school to turn down the rumors, but Monica reminds them that Rachel's rumors make Ross get the attention of the society. Ross and will's rumors have no influence on Rachel's status as queen bee, and...."
"Rachel felt betrayed by rose until Monica reminded her that she started spreading rumors that rose was making out with the 50 year old librarian at the school, even though a frightened rose confirmed that it was true."
"Rachel was quickly attracted by will, because will could not recognize him, but will openly expressed his hostility to him, which made him proud to announce that he and rose set up" I hate Rachel club "in high school, and launched a rumor that she was androgynous, which spread all over their family..."
In this episode, Joey fights with the huge turkey and finally changes into Phoebe's maternity dress to relieve the pressure on her abdomen



Number  197
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The couple announced their engagement few months later and they have now three children together.”
“Two years after his retirement from the sport, the once-married former NFL player started dating singer Jessica Simpson.”
“The following year he got re-signed by the team, but the Saints released him for good on July 31, 2008.”
“He remained with the San Francisco 49ers until 2006, and he signed a one-year contract with the New Orleans Saints in 2007.”
“But still, he did miss all of the 2003 and 2005seasons, due to injuries.”
“When healthy, he was a big contributor to the 49ers passing game.”
“He turned pro after he was drafted by the San Francisco 49ers in the seventh round of the 2001 NFL Draft.”
“He was the one to catch 21 receptions for 244 yards in Yale's come-from-behind victory against Harvard in 1999, including the game-winning touchdown catch.”
“Athletically gifted Johnson first got the chance to flaunt his football skills on a wider scale at Yale, where he played as a wide receiver.”
“Born Eric Maxwell Johnson on September 15, 1979, in Needham, Massachusetts, US, he played as a tight end in the National Football League.”


"The couple announced their engagement a few months later and now have three children together."
Two years after retiring, the once married former NFL player began dating singer Jessica Simpson
"The next year he was re signed by the team, but the saints released him forever on July 31, 2008."
"He stayed with the San Francisco 49ers until 2006, when he signed a one-year contract with the New Orleans Saints in 2007."
"However, due to injury, he did miss all the seasons in 2003 and 2005
"When he's healthy, he's an important contributor to the 49 man pass game."
"After being selected by the San Francisco 49ers in the seventh round of the 2001 NFL draft, he became a professional player."
"He was the man who received the ball 21 times at 244 yards in the 1999 Yale Harvard game, including the touchdown that won the game."
"For the first time, the athletic Johnson had a chance to show off his football skills on a larger scale at Yale University, where he was a catcher on the wing."
"Eric Maxwell Johnson was born in Needham, Massachusetts on September 15, 1979. He is a tough guy in the National Football League."



Number  198
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s all a fake story," he told Metro.”
“"I didn’t comment on anything, I didn’t comment on anything, it was a fake story.”
“The 20-year-old, who shares baby Stormi with boyfriend Travis Scott , proved once and for all that she's still got it as she posed up in nothing but a white swimsuit.”
“In a pair of pictures she posted on Instagram, Kylie, who recently ditched her lip fillers, gives the camera a sultry gaze as she shows off her curves.”
“"Good morning," the Keeping Up With The Kardashians star captioned the sexy snaps, and her fans couldn't get enough.”
“(Image: Splash News)In the first picture, lip kit mogul Kylie lies on her side in the white swimsuit, which features mesh detailing on the body and mesh sleeves.”
“She clasps her hands together, revealing a neutral shade on her famous talons, as she stares into the lens.”
“Her lips are noticeably smaller after she got rid of her fillers and her brunette locks flop over onto the bed with her nude lips and brown eyeshadow giving her a much more natural look.”
“In the second snap, Kylie lies on her back with her eyes closed and her hands placed on top of her head.”
“"In love w/ you," one fan commented.”


"It's all false stories," he told the metro
"I didn't comment on anything. I didn't comment on anything. It's a fake story."
"The 20-year-old shared baby stormi with her boyfriend Travis Scott, and she proved time and again that she still had baby stormi because she posed in a white swimsuit."
"In a pair of photos released on Instagram, Kylie (Kylie) recently abandoned her lipstick. When she showed her curve, she gave the camera a sultry look."
"Good morning," said the star who kept in touch with Kardashian, adding headlines to these sexy snapshots, which her fans couldn't satisfy
(source image: splash News) in the first photo, Kylie, a lip kit tycoon, lies on her side on a white swimsuit with mesh details on the body and mesh sleeves. "
As she stares at the camera, her hands clasp together, revealing a neutral shadow on her famous paw
"After she took off the filling, her lips became smaller. The dark brown locks were tossed on the bed. Her bare lips and brown eye shadow made her look more natural."
"In the second shot, Kelly lies on her back with her eyes closed and her hands on her head."
"I'm in love with you," one fan commented



Number  199
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...was originally published on globalgrind.com...”
“Did Kanye West Make A Diss Track About Donald Trump?”
“Maybe he and President Trump aren’t such long-time friends after all.”
“The news of a fake Trump diss by Kanye comes just after reports that ‘Ye deleted all of his pro-Trump tweets from Twitter.”
“However, Kanye’s team is speaking out about the fraudulent project, saying that West has nothing to do with it, and he’s already put his lawyers on the job to get his name and art removed from the track.”
“He even used Kanye’s Twitter avatar as his cover art, leading people to believe that the famous rapper had some involvement.”
“TMZ reports that King Myers dropped a track called “Propaganda” and put ‘Ye’s name on it as producer.”
“The G.O.O.D music CEO is being used by a rapper trying to get his come-up by bashing Donald Trump and forging Kanye’s participation in his music.”
“Kanye West usually loves having all the attention on him, but sometimes he just doesn’t want his name in the midst of the madness.”


“… Originally published on the World Wide Web... "
"Did Kanye West follow Donald Trump with diss?"
"Maybe he and President trump are not so long-term friends after all."
"Just before kenye released the fake trump diss, it was reported that" kenye deleted all his tweets supporting trump from twitter. "
"However, Kanye's team openly talked about the fraudulent project, saying that West had nothing to do with it. He had his lawyer to work and removed his name and art from the track."
He even used Kanye's Twitter avatar as his cover art to convince people that the famous rapper was also involved
TMZ reported that King Myers gave up a song called "propaganda" and wrote Ye's name on it as a producer
"The g.o.o.d. music chief executive is being used by a rapper to try to improve himself by attacking Donald Trump and Kanye for their involvement in his music."
"Kanye West usually likes to focus all his attention on him, but sometimes he just doesn't want his name to appear in the madness."



Number  200
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
The total pass rate is  0.25806451612903225
Correct number is  48
Total number is  186
(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ 
